Do not go gently into that good night,  Blog, Blog against the dying of the light.
Pica edited his comment to be more accurate, so I will now remove my complaint.  Thanks Pica.
[Migrant Mother Sheds Her Wrinkles](http://www.museumofhoaxes.com/hoax/weblog/comments/2842/). Many of these photos can be saved with the help of Photoshop.
Life itself is unsafe, everyone dies of it!
dude, why are you laughing already?
(3) Drag to trash, use the shortcut key or menu item, confirm. (2) Drag to trash, Right-click (or control-click, or prolonged-click) trash on dock and choose empty. I wouldn't empty the trash right away, however. Sometimes you make mistakes.
I meant, that elected officials in general for any country/ peoples.  you could even be a village tribe and your cheftian would be the rep for your people.
That would have been written, "US troops shoot dead, pregnant Iraqi".
I'm sorry, but there are actually three types of people in this world - those who can count, and those who can't.
a proton walks into a bar and orders a drink.  The bartender give it to him and he slams it down in one gulp.  "I'll have another" states the proton.  "Are you sure?" asks the bartender.  "I'm positive."
What do you call a deer with no eyes?  No idea.
And yet, what would those IT people have been developing if they didn't have to implement all those reports? As for small publicly traded companies, there probably aren't many compared to the proportion of small private companies, but you're also less likely to hear about small companies than large ones.  Although, there will be even fewer in the future as a result of SOX.
It was several years ago.  I started to take his line to heart.... then after reading him for a while I came to realize that ALL his advice was geared to maximize HIS profits, not to maximize the employability nor the salary of those he counsels. If you listen to this guy all you wind up doing is making money for headhunters.... you  don't help yourself.
Where the hell do you get these ideas? The Chinese students were protesting for their right to participate in the democratic process. They erected their own Statue of Liberty. The tank and troops pictured refused to kill their fellow countrymen so the govt ordered units from another part of china with a different ethnic background in. They turned off CNN and started rolling through killing and injuring thousands. All this is very well documented by people that were there.
Evidently you weren't around to hear Michael Jackson and company sing "We are the World" in the 80's. That makes it true. 
What do you do when the dishwasher stops working? Slap her!
&gt;(2) Drag to trash, Right-click (or control-click, or prolonged-click) trash on dock and choose empty. I may be misunderstanding your post, but I think what you're trying to say is that you can reduce it to two steps if you disable the confirmation dialog. That's possible in all of the environments mentioned in this thread, but it's not the default in any.
I was a bit disappointed that the version of Camino used was a quite dated 0.8 (it is currently at [1.0.1](http://www.caminobrowser.org/)).  I'm not sure of the details, but version 1.0 had a much more recent version of the Gecko rendering engine, and to me feels a bit more snappy than Safari.
&gt; The caffeine-addled herd of self-righteous, pseudo-technical, hypersensitive web dorks claim 1: a method of causing a stampede of the group referenced above claim 2: the same, as accomplished by means of a computer network claim 3: the same, as accomplished using public television displays . . .
Q: What's red and not there?  A: No Tomatoes.
Tequila
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
"I think, therefore I am".
&gt; biggest self-aggrandizing egomaniac douchebag the world has ever seen I think there is some competition for that title. The man doesn't even have his own Television Show fer Cthulhu's sake.
i agree, solutes precipitate upon cooling, not heating.  some better answers can be found here:  http://ask.yahoo.com/20030930.html  http://www.straightdope.com/classics/a2_098b (scroll down)  both suggest it happens only with certain conditions, and both suggest there still is no one accepted solution.
"I am an expert in all levels of security." Ah, no...
I heard this thusly: How many flies does it take to screw in a lightbulb? Two, but... how'd they get in there?
Ok I'll bite.  How does not giving your salary history benefit a headhunter?
... a moment of realization
"Ask me what the secret of comedy is." "What is the secr..." "LOCATION LOCATION LOCATION"
What's the difference between a pregnant woman and a light bulb. You can unscrew a light bulb!
I first heard about it [here](http://groups.google.com/group/comp.lang.lisp/browse_thread/thread/bc998b55df652729/fce629040b79bc9d), but I found it boring at first. More users certainly helped with that, but I think comments are what really did it for me.
What do you tell a woman with two black eyes? You already told her twice!  What makes you think anything else will work?
q: What's got four legs, is fuzzy and green, and would kill you if it came out of a tree at you? a: A pool table. 
A priest, a rabbi and a minister are fishing in a canoe on a lake. The priest says "I'm gonna get some beer", steps out of the canoe on to the water and walks to shore. A short time later he walks back, with a 6 pack. The minister cannot beleive his eyes. After some beer, the rabbi says "I need to take a leak". He stands up, steps onto the water and walks to shore, uses the bathroom by the docks, and walks back. The minister is mad with curiousity, but doesn't want the others to know that he's not holy enough to walk on the water. Well, the minister decides to try it himself. He announces "I'm going to get some sandwhiches!", and steps off the boat. *SPLASH!!!* The priest turns to the rabbi and says: "I guess we should have told him about those stepping-stones!"
q: What's black and tan and looks good on a lawyer? a: A Doberman. 
Harvard's math &amp; physics departments are pretty good for a "finishing school for the elite."  The finishing schools for the elite are places like Colby and Middlebury.  You can't have a finishing school with a math requirement.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
I was around.
Am I the only one that read "Moisten-ite"?
Three guys walk into a bar.  You'd think the third one would have ducked....
Sounds like you might want to expand how much of the galaxy you know.  Or change the coefficients you're plugging into the Drake Equation.  Either way, I promise you they are out there. but you might need to expand your stomping grounds.
Nuh uh ... normally y is a function of x, in which case y=e^x, so x=ln(y), and d/dy would turn him into 1/e^x. :-)
Paul Graham. Gave it a look but didn't really catch my eye. A bit dull looks. Came back after a while when the name popped somwhere else a couple of times.
this is reddit, you can leave your SA acronyms at the door
... unless you set it on fire.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
My favorite ethnic joke.  I've got a friend known for off-color jokes, and he'd been cracking a few during a meeting at my workplace.  Just after we left the meeting, he remembers one last joke and yells it out to me across the cubicles full of our co-workers. Him: "Hey!  What do you call a black guy that flies a plane?!?" Me: (under my breath) "Oh, god.  He's going to get us both fired." Him: "A pilot, you racist!" For maximum impact it's important that you tell this joke within earshot of the largest, most politically-correct crowd possible.
He thinks not therefore he is not.
Q: What's green and has wheels? A: Grass.  I was just kidding about the wheels.
Q: How many Dadaists does it take to change a lightbulb? A: A penguin. 
Two men walk into a bar.  You'd think they would have seen it.
What's the difference between God and a medical school graduate? God doesn't think he's a doctor.
Q: How many Frenchmen does it take to defend Paris? A: Nobody knows, it's never been tried.
what on earth are you talking about? If you live in Silicon Valley you just buy your computer and electronics at Fry's. Nobody (besides you, maybe?) buys stuff from a shop run by "Taiwanese" insisting on "green cash." I'd like to know a name of one of these shops because it sounds like an interesting place to visit. Alternatively, you could order your stuff online like everyone else has for the past five years...
Wow, stupidest thing I ever read that people thought was smart.  How does this guy manage to totally ignore that the biggest factor is the $110,000 more you would owe. This is typical day to day budgeting that is the source of so many people's financial woes.  What will the situation when these two homeowners have to sell their houses?
An Englishman, a Frenchman and a Pole are in town for the Olympics, but they don't have tickets.  The Englishman suggests a plan: "See that pile of construction material over there?  We can take something from there and pretend to be an athlete, and they'll let us in." The Englishman takes a long pole and carries it to the stadium gate.  He tells the ticket taker, "Robertson, England, Pole Vaulting," and he is allowed in. The Frenchman picks up a hammer and goes to the gate, saying "Danton, France, Hammer Toss."  He too is let in. The Pole grabs a roll of chain-link fence.  At the gate, he says, "Koslowski, Poland, Fencing."
Sonny was late for a very important meeting, circling around looking for a parking spot. "Please God" he says, "if you find me a spot, I promise to come to Mass every Sunday for the rest of my life!".  Almost immediately a spot opens up, and as he drives into it he again lifts his eyes heavenwards and says: "Never mind, I found one myself..."
Q: What does a PASCAL programmer say to a C programmer? A: "Would you like fries with that?"
The close-quarters fighting in the Bourne movies was extraordinary. If that's "not-so-impressive", I can't wait to see the real thing...
Q: What do you call a girl with only one leg? A: Eileen Q: What if she's Chinese? A: Irene --- Q: What do you call a guy with no arms or legs floating in the water? A: Bob Q: What if he's hanging on the wall? A: Art
They likely got into a routine. Kids with no life experience; anything seems doable/sustainable once you've pulled it off once.
Yeah, most MSM journalists are parrots, not reporters. http://norvig.com/reporters-and-parrots.html
[Bigger versions of the screenshots](http://img513.imageshack.us/my.php?image=deletingashortcut1sd.jpg)
Q: And if only his arms and legs are on the wall? A: Pieces of Art.
And just in case: [i2p-bt](http://forum.i2p.net/viewforum.php?f=21)
Harvard, being the wealthiest non-profit organization in the US, by about 7 billion dollars, is in the unique position of being both a finishing school for the elite and the world's premiere university. The undergraduate population includes the typical undergraduate high achievers from the USA and overseas. However, surely during your tenure there, you must have noticed the seeming correlation between the more average Harvard students and their financial backgrounds. Of course, rich people can have smart kids, but it did appear that the richer an undergraduate's family was, the duller they seemed. You have to wonder if part of the admissions process included points for how much money a potential graduate's inheritance might be donated to the endowment someday... I don't know who goes to Middlebury and Colby. The sons of managers at investment banks? The children of the truely elite do not go to college - they go straight to lounging around on the yacht in Monaco, or to party with celebrities in LA or New York.
The guy gets screwed at the end. *Much better*.
The US thinks everybody should be like... the US.  But we loose a lot of diversity if we become homoginized.  Google doesn't help.   Solution:  Halt traffic and minimize communication between countries.  Parts of the world will suffer but we will increase our overall chance for long term survival.
Duh.  Obviously, losing $110k in value sucks.  This post was a response to a comment someone had made that lower prices and higher rates equal out because the payments will even out.  The point was that there are many disadvantages to buying high, even at low rates.
Pretty cool article, but the carbon arrangement visually-overlayed on the diamond picture is actually of graphite, the kind of chemical that breaks against paper. ; )
I thought he used logs. :) (Either that or had a grad student work it out for him.)
but it wouldn't actually _be_ more death-sentences, just more convictions and possibly painful death, depending on the nature of experiments. trust me, you don't want to be an experiment.
all aboard, the PiratPartiet is set to sail!
Paul, Well, yes, Harvard is an exceptional research institution.  I did overreach there.  But in applied sciences and engineering, it isn't on the same level as MIT, Stanford, or Berkeley.  Ask your typical high school grad to name the most "elite" university in the US (or the world), and they'll say Harvard.  Personally, I think you have to be strong in Engineering and applied sciences to have a claim on that spot.  I'd give it to Stanford, with Berkeley a close second. You might be interested in an article from the washington monthly that ranks colleges by "what they do for the country". http://www.washingtonmonthly.com/features/2005/0509.collegeguide.html. This isn't meant to sidetrack the discussion into arguing about rankings (which is pretty clearly a waste of time), but what the connection between research universities and startups is clearly strong.   
&gt;The photograph of Dukakis in a tank did not change the world. Didn't it, though?
In fact, I think they're specifically weeding out all the best candidates that way. Anyone who's any good, and realizes it, will realize that they can find a better option than the kind of place Praetorian42 describes. They'll do just what s/he did. It's only the poor sods who are too desperate, who *need* a job so badly that they'll do anything the employer asks, that will stand for such behavior. So this company is making sure that only the bottom of the barrel even apply there. (If Praetorian42 had mentioned a security clearance as well, then it'd make sense, but since it's not mentioned, I assume the company were just being jerks.) 
I'm pretty sure in the Bay Area, the "experts" who build their machines just go to Fry's as they stock the same components as everywhere else, and probably have it in stock, and you can also buy batteries, soda, and an ipod replacement while you are there. I don't know many expert programmers who waste time building their own machines, unless it is for a hobby project like a robot or car navigation system. Paul Graham uses a powerbook... http://www.paulgraham.com/mac.html In the Bay Area, it probably won't be a white man running any kind of store, aside from maybe a gun shop.
HEY 
"When society sends its police at the young generation for their listening to music and watching movies, it's not the young that are in error. It's society that needs to get a grip." Wonderful quote.
Tune into Rush Limbaugh and his millions of true believers for a week. You'll be disuaded of that moderate stance pretty quickly. They don't view Rush as infotainment -- for most, it's political gospel.
not his best, but very fitting.
no.
I thought that he spent three paragraphs too much explaining his point but that it got made. In most states property taxes can go up faster than that and they drop very, very slowly.
Paul Graham defines funny as "surprising." So, as long as they work.
Ours makes a humming noise about a fifth of the time. It appears to be completely random. Some times, giving it a good rap stops the humming. Other times, placing it on a pile of soft cover children's stories stops it. Still other times, it buzzes relentlessly all night and I finally get up wanting to stomp it into tiny pieces. Mostly I just hate getting up at 5:30 AM, but such is life. :)
The Pope met with his Cardinals to discuss a proposal from Benjamin Netanyahu, the leader of Israel. "Your Holiness," said one of the Cardinals, "Mr. Netanyahu wants to challenge you to a game of golf to show the friendship and ecumenical spirit shared by the Jewish and Catholic faiths." The Pope thought this was a good idea, but he had never held a golf club in his hand. "Don't we have a Cardinal to represent me?" he asked. "None that plays very well," a Cardinal replied. "But," he added, "there is a man named Jack Nicklaus, an American golfer who is a devout Catholic. We can offer to make him a Cardinal, and then ask him to play Mr. Netanyahu as your personal representative. In addition to showing our spirit of cooperation, we'll also win the match." Everyone agreed it was a good idea. The call was made. Of course Nicklaus was honored and agreed to play. The day after the match Nicklaus reported to the Vatican to inform the Pope of the result. "I have some good news and some bad news, your Holiness," said the golfer. "Tell me the good news first, Cardinal Nicklaus," said the Pope. "Well, your Holiness, I don't like to brag, but even though I've played some pretty terrific rounds of golf in my life, this was the best I have ever played by far. I must've been inspired from above. My drives were long and true, my irons were accurate and purposeful, and my putting was perfect. With all due respect, my play was truly miraculous." "There's bad news?" the Pope asked. "Yes," Nicklaus sighed. "I lost to Rabbi Tiger Woods by three strokes."
No, they're video game characters. America doesn't have casualties in war any more.
A group of Yale students are travelling around the South on their Spring Break.  They pass an old man, sitting on a porch.  "Where you boys from?" asks the man.  "Yale," they reply.  The old man stands up and asks "WHERE YOU BOYS FROM!"
What's the difference between a truckload of dead babies and a truckload of bowling balls? You don't unload the truckload of bowling balls with a pitchfork.
Q: What do you get if you cross the atlantic with the titanic? A:  About halfway.
See! You guys [spez and kn0thing] should have added those gradients I was telling you about.  Screw the content, the people want looks!
Q: What if he's in a pile of leaves? A: Russell
"Knock knock." "Who's there?" "Interrupting vegetarian." "Interrupting vege..." "DO YOU KNOW WHAT GOES INTO A HOT DOG?"
How many lawyers does it take to shingle a roof?  Depends on how thin you slice them. How many lawyers does it take to grease a turbine?  Only two if you run 'em through real slow...
This is because the incompetence of the military in Iraq is no longer news.   Have you noticed that the press no longer bother to report on a few US soldiers getting killed.  Less than 10 in one swoop or a few journalist is what it takes at this point.
from the article blurb:  European political correctness allows Muslims to resist integration, argues the culture editor of Jyllands-Posten. Instead, Muslims should be treated just like all Europeans -- including being subject to satire. He argues that publishing the caricatures was an act of "inclusion, not exclusion."
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
The buddhist walks up to the hot dog vendor and tells him to "make me one with everything." (wait for it) ...The vendor gives him a hot dog and the buddhist gives him a twenty dollar bill.  After a moment of waiting, the buddhist asks, "Where's my change?"  The vendor smiles and says, "Ahh, change must come from within."
&gt; Perhaps, but you study unarmed combat or knife weapons forms? I've trained with chukas (nunchucks), but not with knives.  Had I progressed a few more belts I'd have learned some swordsmanship, but my dojang only taught how to defend against a knife, not how to use one.
Under your car?  Jack.  In front of your door?  Matt.  Being carried to his grave?  Paul.  In a hole?  Doug.
A woman is in the maternity ward, having just given birth to her baby.  The doctor comes in, cradling the child in his arms.  As he is about to give it to the woman, he drops it on the ground, kicks it into the wall then throws it out the window. "OH MY GOD, WHAT ARE YOU DOING TO MY BABY?!?!?!" The doctor turns to her, smiles, and says, "April Fools.  It was a stillborn."
Slashdot.
My photoshop skillz are mostly limited to Alt-I A A and Alt-I A U, so due credit. What impresses me is just how much beautiful people benefit from the abstraction of photo retouching before the public gets to see them up close.
From Matt's website: &gt;Ditch the Cookie Cutter Approach and Deliver the Website Solution Built For Your Company's Needs Lame. Suggested alternatives: We make websites that make you money. or We make custom websites. 
hahaha excellent
I've heard it with emus and acorns.  It's an alright joke.  When people tell me there's a faster way of doing a task, I always ask "What's time to an emu?".  Occasionally I'll tell them the joke afterwards.
holy crap, I won't ever down-mod you again.
&gt; A generic, ad hominem comment with strong lazy overtones. If you think I got something wrong, how about pointing it out and refuting me, instead of merely throwing adjectives? Paulie... you're a bit of a jackass. ;-)
Only about half them work in Firefox. I'll have to brush up on my GIMP skills clearly.
According to at least a few shows on the Food Network, you CAN cook with a car, though. :-)
What's the difference between a bucket of gravel and a bucket of baby guts? You can't gargle gravel.
They just did a special on PBS that had video of the Chinese Army repeatedly shooting Chinese citizens for no other reason than to keep them away from the square.
Yeah, I gotta agree with this one.
haha excellent
Why are women's feet so small? So they can stand closer to the kitchen counter.
How do you turn a dishwasher into a snowblower? Hand the bitch a shovel.
Not sure which lisp-related site I saw it on first, but I read a discussion of how reddit was using lisp... then a few days later I read about how they switched to Python...
I discovered it back when it [looked like this](http://flickr.com/photo_zoom.gne?id=157714531&amp;size=o). But I kept using it anyway. edit: please also notice that I was the one who submitted the "Boffins Create Zombie Dogs" story.
Beyond a doubt, blogging has a bright future. It's tempting to get carried away by all the exuberance being generated. Bill Gates says blogging "will fundamentally change how we document our lives". While this may well be true, we must resist the temptation to get carried away. Let's analyze blogging's prospects as a 'personal technology', or a technology that individuals use to improve their effectiveness or productivity, or simply to have fun. Blogging needs to clean up its act on a few fronts. 
I should put my previous reply above in &lt;sacarsm/&gt; tag The whole point of my reply was that women are women and men are men. It is stupid to say the women love diamonds because they are brainwashed. They love it because it's beautiful. If it is okay to say women are brainwashed by Debeer to love diamonds, is it not even more ok to say women are brainwashed to love flower, barbie, fashion, cosmetic?  Flower are everywhere, even more rich than diamonds. Why do you like it when your boyfriend gives you flower? Couldn't you just buy it yourself? Do you also feel as happy if he bought you a burger at the same price instead? As you said, it didn't make much sense to women to love action movie or guy to like romantic movie. It also don't make sense to say women like diamonds just because they are brainwashed. It's the same as guy liking to but gadgets even though they rarely use all the feature. If you have to use reasoning in everthing, you'll lose all the romantics. Appearantly it cost me alot of downmod because of misunderstanding.
Towards a measure for the success of blogging.   We try and arrive at a “measure" for how successful blogging has become, and how much more it is capable of achieving. 
hotness bars ftw!
Delusional?  Marginal?  Is Bill Moyers talking about himself again?  Didn't he get in trouble earlier when he talked about this, when he used a fabricated quote to imply that a Reagan official believed we didn't need to protect the environment because Jesus was coming? I wonder what would happen if Bill Moyers called Jews or Muslims delusional. 
By the way, whatever happened with the Chandra Levy case?
Three statisticians went duck hunting.  A duck flew out and the first statistician took a shot, the shot went a foot too hight.  The second statistician took his shot and the shot went a foot too low.  The third statistician said, "We got it!"
I bought a house because there's no way I could rent a 3 bedroom, 2 bath house on 3/4ths of an acre (dogs must have room to run!) for $970 a month.  Subtract from that the equity I'm building up (only about $40/month now) and taxes, and it is significantly cheaper than any house/apartment I could rent. Yes, keeping the house in good repair is expensive, but that argument is void- you're paying for all of that repair when you rent, you're just paying for it every month, instead of when something breaks.
Yeah, no security clearance.  It was a Java programming job at one of those apartment finder websites.
I finally went here, like most others, after PG mentioned it for about the 4th time.
Why is he a "victim"?  The quote marks are unnecessary editorializing.
I'm assuming the overall length of the bars is the number of votes and the red/orange is up/down. I like that idea - I'm not sure if just displaying the score is better or not. Any opinions I express tonight may be influenced by the fact that I'm sleep-deprived, overcaffeinated and in the process of writing a library in Common Lisp to track shipments on the major services. I've already submitted the USPS interface to [The Daily WTF](http://www.thedailywtf.com/) for requiring XML in the URL's query string.
Same here.  It was before the Startup School in Boston last fall.
from a paul graham essay, learn of paul graham from slashdot, learned of slashdot from some guy 6 years ago in columbus who was shocked that i hadn't heard of slashdot, met him after I got temporarily famous from making idchip.com
So where are you living out of interest?
Swartz mentioned it on one of his blogs/sites way back when - agree that having more users makes a difference
An Italian, an Irishman and a Chinese fellow are hired at a construction site.The manager points out a huge pile of sand and says to the Italian, "You're in charge of sweeping". To the Irishman, "You're in charge of shoveling" To the Chinese guy, "And you're in charge of supplies". "Now, I have to leave for a little while. I expect you guys to make a dent in that pile." So the manager goes away for a couple of hours. And when he returns, the pile of sand is untouched. He says to the Italian, "Why didn't you sweep any of it? The Italian guy replies, "I didn't have a broom. You said the Chinese guy was in charge of the supplies, but he disappeared and I couldn't find him" So then the manager turns to the Irishman and asks why he didn't shovel. The Irishman replies, "I couldn't get myself a shovel. You left the Chinese guy in charge of supplies and I couldn't find him." The manager is really pissed now, and storms off toward the pile of Sand looking for the Chinese guy. Just then, the Chinese guy springs out from behind the pile of sand and yells, "SUPPLIES!"
See, just outside of Pittsburgh I rent a 3 bedroom, 1 bath duplex, with a 1 car garage and large yard for $600.
How's that irony? Irony would have been that the source code they used to run the servers would have been made available by someone else on the net and Pirate Bay suing them for copyright infringement.
interesting info on this page.
Paul Graham couldn't stop raving about it. First and last site he visits everyday apparently...
Could you tell us more on the Swedish angle on copyright law. We'd be interested to know.
Captain Pugwash?
Posted earlier on reddit: [owning vs renting calculator](http://reddit.com/info/6wos/comments)
paul graham 
yep, sure can't get "grep -o 'pattern'" anywhere else.  definitely not from   &gt; sed -n 's/.\*(pattern).\*/\1/p' glad we have a crack team bloating grep. 
The other reason was that the US had perfectly good anti-biotics at the time that could be mass produced, whereas fages need to be tuned to an individual's needs, so they don't lend themselves to mass production.
&gt; Google doesn't help. What has Google got to do with homogenisation? Google just indexes what's on the web (US and non-US sites) and makes it search-able. Google just reflects what the web is like. &gt; Solution: Halt traffic and minimize communication between countries. Parts of the world will suffer but we will increase our overall chance for long term survival. Worst solution ... ever. This whole new look into Phages is *because* of communication between the USA and Russia.
You do realize that these are iranian jokes, don't you? And you do know why they are told?
use a permanant link.  not the front page 
Just in case you've been living in a hole for the last 20 years let me fill you in: both the Republicans and Democrats are hopelessly corrupt and working together to trade power only between themselves.  I'll never vote for either party ever again.
I started getting into Lisp about a year and a half ago.  Found my way to Paul Graham's site to download the out of print Onlisp book and stayed around to read some of his essays.  I found out about this website when it first came up, but didn't register until later, I'm suspicious that way.   Just so you know, Reddit had way better articles posted than it does today.  Its all politics and idiocy now, back then it was Lisp, programming and entrepreneurialism. Joseph
"A mind once stretched by a new idea never regains its original dimension" . Thanks
also just in: grass is green.
&gt;back then it was Lisp, programming and entrepreneurialism. What's really sad is that people *complained* about that.
When will people finally acknowledge the one true graphical interface: [curses](http://www.gnu.org/software/ncurses/ncurses.html)+[ssh](http://www.openssh.com/).. hah
He had $100m in revenues, not profits, so his take-home pay was less than that.   Anyone have any idea what the profit margins are in marijuana smuggling?
goodluck my spaniards friend!
What do you get when you cross an elephant with a rhinoceros?  Hell-if-I-know
I'll raise you that, and, I had to sign consent forms and have the following done: -high school transcripts  -university transcripts  -piss in a cup  -10 years of addresses lived at for more than 1 month  -10 year job history, including manager's name/contact, salary, bonuses, job role  -credit check in 3 countries (all which i had been in for more than 6 months)  -criminal check in 3 countries  -ssn, sin #'s  -passport photocopy of bio page
Ditto.
[Of course you know this means war!](http://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Groucho_Marx) Now while I enjoy the occasional nonsensical joke (Two ducks are sitting in a bathtub, one says, "Pass the soap," so the other says, "What do I look like, a typewriter?"), that's not why I find the "difference between a duck" joke so funny. Now a joke isn't funny if you have to explain it, but so many people have been expressing their incredulity at it that I feel compelled to defend it (and hopefully clear myself of the charges of witlessness). I always thought it was a very unique kind of joke; I haven't heard any quite like it. First, I think the question itself is funny. Why? Because it *just* fails to make sense at the last moment. Any way you attempt to parse it you get thrown for a loop. I guess it's a matter of taste whether you enjoy that or not. The first answer continues in that vein with the same singular/plural confusion: It would make sense if it was "One of its legs is the same as..." or "Both of its legs are the same." Pieces of it make sense but not the whole put together; I think it's something like a linguistic equivalent of the Penrose triangle. Actually, I think it *is* the equivalent, because that's exactly the same sense of amusement I get. The second answer is the same, but additionally you can have fun trying to visualize the ludicrous image of a duck banging its head together when it walks. The last one is just funny because it's absurd. I can't explain, just try to imagine acting it out to somebody. By now, apart from thinking the joke is unfunny, you're also thinking what a loser this guy is trying to explain a bad joke and making a fool of himself in the process, so I'll just shut up now. But not before telling you the one about... *(Edit: Bah, it's been [posted already](http://reddit.com/info/6xmp/comments#c707v).)* ...the Buddhist who walks up to a hot dog vendor and says, "Make me one with everything." ... Oh, and when the guy hands him a hot dog, the Buddhist pays him and asks for his change. So the guy smiles and says, "Change comes from within."
right now you have the possibility to visit the russian, dutch, french, ...,  version of reddit. There you have exclusively russian or dutch or french or ... posts. The problem is that the posts are not updated very often (the last post in russian dates from 4 days ago, the last in dutch 22 days). Most of the users speaking russian, dutch, french or ... probably understand English. That is why I propose to introduce, instead of proper language pages that are not frequently used because of the smaller community, to give every user the possibility in his preferences, to see posts in the languages he choses, instead of seperating all those languages into isolated reddits. This is already possible in feeds.reddit.com, why shouldn't it be possible in the main reddit?
same
Does anybody not find this a little scary: "In 2004, there were an estimated 1,367,009 violent crimes nationwide"   
Excellent! :-)
yup me too me too
mythbusters?
interesting
One of my friends emailed me the site
To quote 90% of the slashdot-comments: RTFA Here's the opening paragraph from the article:  &gt; CSS does not make a site accessible.  &gt; CSS does not make your site rank higher in search engines.  &gt; Good CSS does not make you an elite web programmer.  &gt; I don't code CSS.  &gt; CSS is misunderstood. Maybe you don't see the last line, where he says CSS is misunderstood, but I see it. THAT is what the article is about. Now if you'll excuse me, I'm going to go dream about a utopia where people actually read more than the headline before making dumb comments.
In doing my own research for creating a Digg-type site, I was Googling Digg-alternatives. I came across someone mentioning Reddit on blog. That was sometime last summer before there was a comment system; the site has changed quite a bit since then. But holy crap a lot of you people came because of Paul Graham. Is the limited audience a good or bad thing? At least for the most part Reddit is comprised of smart people, but the way people are finding out about the site seems to be from a few niches. I didn't even know who Paul Graham was and what Lisp was before I visited Reddit. I've learned a whole lot from Reddit, though, and I'd love to see the programmer community here grow a bit more and be a bit more diversified.
Horse walks into a bar.  Bar tender says "Why the long face?"
not if it gets eaten by the sharks.
Likewise. *Edit: Will we run out of synonyms for 'me, too!' before we run out of people who found Reddit through Graham?*
I applaud your pragmatic and generous sentiment, but you are missing something in your reply.  The real point is these people have absolutely no problem forbidding MY daughter to abort her rapist's child at two weeks.  Of course they'll grant themselves exceptions per your argument because of their spiritual entitlement.  What fuels this virulence is not religion, which is merely the host (albeit a very reliable one), but the need to control and, if necessary, oppress or destroy the "other".
How long ago was that? Its kind of neat actually.
Very shortly after we first brought reddit into the world: July 1, 2005.
Isn't this a stephen segal movie?
What do you call a guy who hangs out with musicians?  A drummer.
What does a stripper do with her asshole before she goes to work? She drops him off at band practice.
This is what my girlfriend said, and you know basically I agree with her: NameWithheld42: If I had a ring, and the ring had a stone, and that stone was this cool thing, and you were guaranteed that this specific stone had come from a meteor, that would be beyond cool. NameWithheld42: But NameWithheld42: If it were synthetic, I'd be like, meh NameWithheld42: I know that's kinda stupid NameWithheld42: But I really like the idea of having an outer-space ring
What do you get when you drop a piano down a mine shaft?  A flat miner.
Have you *tried* doing that kind of photo manipulation? It's trickier than it looks.
If you were John Keats, it might work, but you're not, so you might want to cast your line in another pond.
This article is ridiculous. The author is trying to make money by selling the idea that you avoid almost every bug by paying one guy to do nothing but read all your code.
A blonde speeder is pulled over by a blonde police officer. The blonde cop says "I need to see your license".  The blonde driver digs through her purse for awhile, and says "I can't find it.  What does it look like?". So the cop, making a rectangle with her hands, says "it's rectangular, and has your picture on it".  The blonde driver searches through her purse but can't find it.  She finally comes up with the only rectangular item, a small mirror. She looks at it, shrugs, and hands it to the blonde cop.  The blonde cop looks at it, shrugs, and hands it back to the blonde driver.  "Oh, you can go" the blonde cop says. "I didn't realize you were a cop".
So, I am very confused. All I see on the page are a big fancy title saying Best 'Looking For A Job Ad', Ever!, and the thing at the bottom saying it's powered by ME and copyright and so on. It seems that everybody else is seeing something much different. I have firefox 1.0.8. What am I missing?
Stone Mountain, GA
I noticed it after the front-page link on PG's site, but didn't become particularly interested. For some reason, can't remember why, I came back to it at some point in September or October, at which point 'Extreme Thinking' was the top link (with 123 points-- it went on to take the top spot on the 'top' list too, with not that many more points). I decided that Extreme Thinking was the best thing since sliced bread, credited Reddit with the discovery, and joined. Agree that articles were somewhat better back then, but not hugely so.
Of all the things, it was mentioned in ##c at freenode. 
Please God tell me you didn't put up with that crap.
That reminds me of the time we put a can of beans on the campfire.  Oh boy, heat + sealed containers == fun.
&gt; you're paying for all of that repair when you rent, you're just paying for it every month, instead of when something breaks. Maybe you are, maybe you aren't. If the real estate market had perfect information, was completely rational, and had no transaction costs, then renting and buying would always be the same cost, modulo people's preferences for risks (both renting and buying have their own risks) and doing home maintenance. But the real estate market is none of those three.  Maybe the landlord can recoup the cost of mortgage payments and taxes and insurance and repairs each month, but maybe not.  In fact, if you consider the fact that two different landlords in identical buildings could be paying drastically different amounts on their mortgages, there's no reason to assume that PITI == rent.  Maybe the property is cashflow positive, maybe it's negative. Some landlords assuredly have negative cash flow on their property.  In these cases, the renters are *not* paying for repairs. There's all sorts of reasons landlords find themselves in a position where they have to rent at a loss.  Most of them have to do with the state of the rental market -- if the market won't pay enough to cover costs, well, tough cookies.  Leaving it vacant doesn't really decrease the cost of maintaining the property that much, so they might as well rent. In fact, if you consider the fluctuations of the rental markets from year to year, it's even easier to poke holes in the PITI == rent equation. All this said, I found the article's analysis to be too simplistic.  I worked the numbers myself and the 12,500:100 ratio was **way** low for me.  More like 25,000:100.   
Same here. Reddit's biggest value has always been for researching and staying current with the latest, however obscure, technology. Well, considering the politics loving simpletons that are attracted to reddit these days, I'd say there's nothing wrong with slowly growing a quality audience. Then again.. "I'm just a geek with no money" and reddit is still headed in the right direction.
The question is "How violent?". If they count every punch on  the nose in the schoolyard that heals itself this isn't very high (0.3% chance for a given citizen to be the victim of a violent crime in one year). If they only count cases where an ambulance was called or would have been necessary this is very high.
And Paul Graham is, of course, the supreme arbiter of funny.
Michael has Muscular Dystrophy and his old van is falling to bits and about to go belly-up on him. Make a small donation to help boost his 'new van fund' and get a warm fuzzy feeling for helping out a fellow human being. :o)
OR dream about Utopia where author make the title reflect what article actually says. How about making article named "CSS is all you need" then talk about benefit of Java/XML/Database/Design Patern, nothing related to CSS. Supposed that it was a really good article. Most people agree with its content. Is it ok to say "Most people agree with 'CSS is all you need'." He could just make it says "CSS is miunderstood" or at least  make a question "Is CSS Useless?". But no, in the original article (not reddit title) the title was "CSS IS WORTHLESS" (no question mark).
All of them work in Firefox for me. Of course, I am on Windows and using Bon Echo a3.  On the other hand, his rclick popup is just silly. It also fires on middle-click - and someone should really tell him that as a method against saving the files it is totally useless.
&gt;sed -n 's/.\*(pattern).\*/\1/p' Shouldn't that be: &gt;sed -n 's/.\*\\(pattern\\).\*/\1/p' edit: OK, looks like reddit ate your backslashes.
How many stupid images must I vote down before reddit stops recommending them?
From your mom
Many life-long friendships have started from a pen pal online e-pals relationship and it’s a great way to get to know people from across town or across the world.
This is serious stuff.  My cousin has this, and has been in and out of the hospital for the past few months.  Was a very difficult diagnosis, and he is not responding well to treatment.
an online meeting place for people with a disability to find Pen Pals, Friendship, Dating and Relationships or just someone to talk to for support and encouragement who has been there themselves
married dating and married affairs
&gt; I can do more damage with my hands No.  You can't.  A knife impales organs, punctures lungs, cuts arteries, and causes major blood loss.  It also concentrates force -- punch someone in the ribs hard and cause a bruise; use the same amount of force with a knife and you probably break the bone. Dan Inosanto (Bruce Lee's buddy) did a lot of training with police officers and made training tapes.  They found that if you have a holstered gun, someone with a knife within 15 feet can probably close and stab you, possibly to death, even if you manage to eventually shoot him.  He has a good chance to grapple with you and prevent you from even drawing your gun, being that he can cut you as you both struggle. I know movies always show superficial line cuts from knives but in reality getting stabbed is an effective way to die.  Incidentally, getting a slash across the face will sever nerves.  Cheaper than Botox, I suppose... &gt;and I'd run the risk of having it taken away and used against me. Which would make things a lot safer since they'd be doing less damage!  Next knife-fight I get in, I am going to toss him my switchblade, thus rendering him completely ineffective and defenseless against my Dim-Mak. I want to see a gang rumble where one gang puts their knives away and the other gang is like "oh shit, what do we do now?" 
same
Q. What do accountants use for birth-control?  A. Their personalities. In the middle of the forest, a turtle and a snail have a gruesome head-on  collision. The snail is rushed to the emergency room, where a doctor asks  what happened. On the edge of consciousness, the snail responds, 'I don't  know, Doc. It all happened so fast.'   
Not that this is what the article says, but just for the sake of the argument: making money by claiming that software is meant to be buggy and frustrate its users is even more ridiculous... or outrageous.
I think the whole situation sucks.  A girl -- who is a minor -- falls in with probably a sucky boyfriend, who robs people, and one guy had a knife and probably stabbed her boyfriend so she jumped on him and got stabbed herself.  That'd be my guess.  It doesn't say whether shots were fired; it's possible they were using unloaded guns to intimidate and things got out of hand.   Obviously what they were doing was messed up but that doesn't make it happy that someone got stabbed to death. 
One argument I'm suprised no-one has made is that of stability. In the four years since I graduated, I had to move house 5 times due to places I was renting being available only for limited periods of time. On top of that, I've gone from spending 250 UKP/month on a large-ish (approx 15'x15') bedroom in a city centre house, complete with decent sized garden, two bathrooms, dining room and a utility room, to spending 300 UKP/month on a 10'x10' bedroom in an ex-council house. The scary part is I've been lucky, relatively, most people are paying even more for even less. So, the point is, sure, I can deal with that now (although it doesn't help my attempts to save for a house of my own), but 40 years down the line, when I'm looking at retiring, do you really think I want to have to worry if my rent will skyrocket because the area I'm in suddenly becomes more popular?
Article in the Guardian Newspaper last year sometime.   Now one of my favourite sites.
The Reagan official in question was one James Watt (Secretary of the Interior).  As to the "fabricated" quote:  1) It wasn't Moyers' quote, he simply cited it.  2) He apologized to Watt for the offense.  3) If you know anything about Watt you'd soon discover that, fabricated or not, the quote more than likely represented his real views. But misquoting was never a core problem for Mr. Watt.  He managed to screw up his own reputation up on a regular basis with such insights as this shiny pearl issued when speaking about his staff: *We have every mixture you can have. I have a black, a woman, two Jews and a cripple. And we have talent.* 
You can see the ad [right here](http://jayg123.googlepages.com/smugglerad.jpg)
I was just poking at the definition.  I think wealth would better be defined as "the satisfaction of people's wants".
Upvoted for stealing the words out of my mouth, you bastard! ;-)
&gt; I want to see a gang rumble where one gang puts their knives away and the other gang is like "oh shit, what do we do now?" Dance them to death? ;-)
Actually I didn't state this list to side track the disscussion about the elite (or non elite) universities in the US. Really :-) I hardly know anything about that (besides knowing these universities and that's about it).  I've mentioned these universities to show that they were one of the first to have and use DARPANet and eventually the Internet and to show that 3 of them are in California.
One of them was saved from a life of crime! :-D
spam.  ignore.
OK, I haven’t technically sorted out the long-running Parades issue just yet, but I think I’ve got a viable blueprint, provided the communities in question have the leadership and resolve to pull it off.
That and intimidation is the game. It seems several homes have been raided as well, with personal computers confiscated.
An American, a Japanese man, and a man from a Botswana are in a sauna. There is a ringing sound; the American makes his hand into a phone shape, whispers, "Phone call," to the other two men, and answers it. Then, there's a beeping noise; the Japanese man taps his wrist several times, and says, "I'm being IM'ed." The Botswanan goes to the bathroom, and when he comes back, there's toilet paper trailing from his ass. The American says, "You know, uh, you have some toilet paper back behind..." "I'm getting a fax."
paulgraham.com
When deoderant cans are outlawed, only outlaws will have deoderant cans.
Post your own favorite; I've heard that one before. :P
I don't like them because they restrict my freedom, so I won't buy them and I'll encourage everyone else who values their freedom not to buy them either. Where's the slope, and in what way is it slippery? Where's the fallacy for that matter?
People now bet, sitting at home, during the match watching it on TV
I was praying in the woods, when a native american appeared before me and told me to start my own religion called reddit, unfortunetly the domain name was already taken... but I discovered a great site :D
moi aussi
&gt; Obviously what they were doing was messed up but that doesn't make it happy that someone got stabbed to death. I thought it was funny as hell. She likely would have mated with him and produced more criminals. 
竜巻？？
Football has always caught the imagination of the considered bettor. With a record amount of money expected to be matched.
You have to give it a few seconds to load up the swapped jpeg.  However, it does have dubious javascript which causes problems with various browsers...
Surprise! :-D
The secret of comedy is, um...  ........................................................  ...........................................................  ...........................................................  ...........................................................  ...........................................................  ...................................................  timing.
but of course, the BA who wrote the article probably had no business telling the IT guys how much of what ingredient should go in, just what ingredients the business requires.  Other than that, okay article, nothing new here.
A man walks into a bar with an apple on his head, and the bartender asks "Why do you have a pear on your head?" He replies, "It's not a peach, it's a plum!"
The Dalai Lama walks into a pizza hut and says "Make me one with everything."
Found it through that site with all the articles of that one dude... What's his name again? He really likes LISP and startups and all. Something with a P.
Hey I suddenly notice the TOP list is gone! Why is that?
Argue all you want, Al Gore is still right.
Ah, whatever.  It's a relephant. (say it out loud)
That's awesome!  Two Gentiles meet on the street. The first one says," You own your own business, don't you? How's it going?" The other Gentile says, "Just great! Thanks for asking!"
i want interview questions and answer also,so that we know the answers.  Thanking you   Priya.....
Q. How do you keep the neighbor's kids from playing in your yard?  A. F*ck one of them.
What really likes LISP, startups and running in a wheel?  Paul Grahamster
Every suburban kid in America is on a soccer team and we still don’t care.
Writing a poem and letting all her friends hear it can be interesting, but an engagment ring is more of a symbol. It means that you plan to marry this woman. A poem can be read over and over again, it can be framed or kept in her wallet, but none the less - it's still basicly a piece of paper, no matter how touching and heart-warming the writings on it are. A poem just can't symbolyze everything that a ring can.
Nice colloquial touch at the end.
Some Django article I think
The Daily Telegraph's LA correspondent Catherine Elsworth blogs on how money can't buy love, but it can buy lawsuits
This is awesome stuff. Just wondering, is it legal to print it out for personal use? If there's a published version, I'd gladly buy it too.
A sculptor, a civil engineer and a computer scientist were arguing about the primacy of their professions.   "God created man out of clay," said the sculptor, "and so was clearly a sculptor." "Before that," said the engineer, "He separated earth and waters from the chaos -- an immense feat of civil engineering.  God was an engineer first." "And how do you think," answered the computer scientist, "the chaos was made?"
Interesting maybe I should learn OCaml.
I learned about reddit from a post on [SDF's](http://sdf.lonestar.org/) bulletin board.  SDF user [adnam](http://adnam.twenex.org/) recommended the site to SDF's members.  I wonder if that 'adnam' is the same as [this one](http://reddit.com/user/adnam/)?
Not even dead?  Well, I guess the second one is...
Excellent call.  The BA shouldn't specify the amounts of the recipe only the outcomes required.  It's the artistry of the cook (programmer) that bring it all together into a cake (solution.
Intersesting site for cheap car hire in France, Spain &amp; destinations worldwide.
Hey, what if by an incredible twist of fate the USA met Iran in the World Cup Final.   How many Americans would watch it then ?   What would happen if America lost ?!   Come on guys, its only a game of football ?! :-)
paul graham
&gt; Religion operates more as a background story than a complete blinder, and most of the policy-involved religious people I ran into were using a religious political ideology as a cognitive shortcut to avoid engaging the hard stuff: In short rounding off the argument, avoiding the complexity where the real answers can be explored. From what you say this is the reason we have separation of church and state. In .au under section 116 of the constitution we have the following ... *'... The Commonwealth shall not make any law for establishing any religion, or for imposing any religious observance, or for prohibiting the free exercise of any religion, and no religious test shall be required as a qualification for any office or public trust under the Commonwealth.  ...'* [1] for good reason. Then I read comments like this *Claim Abbott warned pharmaceutical industry against marketing RU486*. [2]  This (poor) thinking has to be questioned everywhere. It is not just confined to a loony American minority and should be persued with vigour, wherever it occurs.    **Reference** [1] wikipedia, 'Separation of church and state, 5 Countries with separation' http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Separation_of_church_and_state#Countries_with_separation [Accessed Thursday, June 1, 2006] [2] ABC Television Transcript, Margo O'Neil, 'Lateline, Claim Abbott warned pharmaceutical industry against marketing RU486. Broadcast 31/05/2006' http://www.abc.net.au/lateline/content/2006/s1652360.htm [Accessed Thursday, June 1, 2006]
No, it really didn't. Unless you want to be pedantic and go on the chaos theory kind of thing and say that everything is related and a butterfly flapping it's wings in the amazon... etc. By that logic, you could say every photo on Flickr is one that has changed the world.
Don't talk about my fast car like that! He'll be mad.
I sometimes read the comments before an article, and a little summary can be helpful. Although this is short enough it might have been better in the title, somehow. Did those down-modding him not notice he submitted the article, and this was the first comment?
No, it's not clear whether that's actually worse, which is distracting. Just leave out the "one": What's worse than a baby in a trashbin?  A baby in two trashbins!
america cares enough to put every game on tv for me, which is good enough for me...
if usa met iran, the losing country's president should be executed on the field following the match.  it's a win-win situation for everyone.
The version I've heard (which I like better) is  "A priest, a lesbian, and a penguin walk into bar..."
**O Rly!?** As you probably don't know, many other software developers use the BitTorrent technology to distribute their work:   The Linux community is using the BitTorrent network for years to distribute easily (and freely) the installations of Linux OS. [Here are some legal Linux .torrents for you](http://linux.mybookmarkmanager.com/). Other software companys such as [Java](http://www.java.com/en/), [OpenOffice](http://distribution.openoffice.org/p2p/), [Mozilla (Firefox)](http://bittorrent.mozilla.org/) will be more than glad if you'll share their products on the BitTorrent network. Please notice that I'm not even mentioning tons of other free &amp; legal software that you could get from ThePirateBay (such as the newest versions of Skype, DirectX, Spybot Search&amp;Destroy, Icq, MSN, various BitTorrent clients and more). In addition, you could download *ANY .TORRENT* from ThePirateBay for you personal use, *without nessisarily violating any law*.  You could edit it, study it, collect it, use it to create your own BitTorrent client or print it and hang in on the fridge, *without braking a single law*.  Remember that the law does not forbid anyone to post  information nor files online which have basicly no use. A good example to this are the hundereds of coding sites that let you download programming code, that is 100% useless to the avarage person. In conclution, the main difference between ThePirateBay and Illegal sites (that should be taken down, like) WareZ sites is that while WareZ sites let you download hacked software and pirated movies, ThePirateBay didn't share any illegal files on it's servers. It only provided the .torrent files. As I said earlier, providing torrents is like selling kitchen knives - if somebody kills a person with that knife, you can't blame the store.
... which means that Americans may be smarter than many people like to think
Death to all fanatics!
Neither you or I know what research jedberg's Professor is doing, so it seems a bit silly to speculate over how many lives it may or may not save. I only wanted to point out that new research is always useful.  "You'd think all that animal testing would have made us understand everything about humans aleady." Having just finished an undergrad physiology degree I can tell you that there is a bucket load of stuff we don't understand. Try picking up a couple of scientific journals and actually researching a topic before spouting off about it. One of the academics in my department was performing the following research project: "Physiological experiments in vivo to demonstrate that epithelial cells are not secretory and that chloride ion dependent secretory diarrhoeal disease is a modern myth." A waste of time and animals you may think, but his results seemed to support his conclusion that the current theory of epithelial secretion is wrong. His research requires the use of anaesthetized rats and call me crazy but I think that understanding how diseases like cholera work might be important enough to sacrifice some rats bred specially for the purpose. I never said that pharmaceutical compainies didn't want better computer models, computers are less expensive than animal labs, so of course they would prefer them. How do you think we can create these more accurate computer models? This is the point I was making, anti-vivisectionists do not seem to understand that the only way to create more accurate models is to understand how the system works in the first place. How do we understand the system? The 'basic research' you sneered at before maybe?
You can use the contextual-menu for the trash in the dock -- you do not get a confirmation dialog. If you use the menu item you do get a confirmation dialog.
NOT via Paul Graham, in any way, shape or form. Ha!
I posted it here, but seems like my title was to obscure. http://reddit.com/info/6xn0/comments
How many psychiatrists does it take to change a lightbulb? One; but the lightbulb has to want to change.
the language reddits do not have a large enough community to have a decent reddit for themselves, and besides, most of them understand English and are inclined to surf to the english version anyway. Why not mix the two?
Mentioned in an article on digg.com about sites like digg and slashdot.
paul graham. em... what does this say about other startups that don't have paul graham linking to them...?
Has your father repeated the experiment?
That's Beautiful.
What?
Living in the UK myselfm, I can fully understand your dilema. I'm also renting, thankfully quite cheap. A mortgage on the full value of the house I am in would be about double what I pay in rent! Regarding your retirement, this is something that also worries me. But my only consolation is that eventually the government will have to stick me in coucil housing once I receive my pittance of a pension. And because I am not a home owner, I won't first have to sell my house in order to get access to a care home!
A baby seal walks into a club.... 
Wow!!111 Make pasionate love to me geekboy!  &lt;/sarcasm&gt;
Pingo Gives International Prepaid Calling Card Discount To Its Customers With Prepaid Calling Card Local Access Numbers
Am I the only one who didn't get this one?
- It is legal to make a copy for your own private use and lend it to friends.  - It is not legal to break copy protection. A DVD region protection is not considered to be a protection.  - It is not legal to either make copyrighted available on the net or download it.  - To make links available is legal. This is however a gray area and I suppose that it will be tried here.  - There is also the possibility (of what I have heard) that they have had copyrighted material available and will go down for that.  - There are also rumors that they lived on welfare and got money from the ads (i.e. tax fraud) A summary from http://kommentar.typepad.com/k/juridik/index.html . Very interesting, but in swedish. Anyone with some spare time can perhaps translate some more.
Why did the possum cross the road? He wanted to cross-over to the other side. Made that one up myself...
well this sounds quite ironic...
&gt;please also notice that I was the one who submitted the "Boffins Create Zombie Dogs" story. Good for you!
it was in a installation CD I got in a cereal box. It took over my machine and it is the only website my Firefox can open.
I ever found Reddit. It found me.
Actual link:  https://www.unwiredbuyer.com/ Check out their Privacy Policy, too - looks like they happily share your info with others... WhoIs for UnwiredBuyer:  http://www.coolwhois.com/d/unwiredbuyer.com
Can anyone explain how is Al-Gore fits here?
or alternatively proves beyond all reasonable doubt what we in the rest of the world already suspected....
This is amazing - vote it up!
yep!
"Balance" is a false journalistic value, promulgated by shameless partisans using a media entity to advance an agenda. Usually, it's possible to determine the truth of a situation, but just because, say, a President says something, it automatically assumes the force of authority and must then be counterbalanced, if at all, with actual facts.  Those facts tend to show up in the latter half of the article, and are often cited by people who otherwise have no credibility. A common method in the New York Times before the Iraq War was to quote the Iraqi foreign minister saying that the UN weapons inspectors weren't finding anything - instead of quoting, you know, the UN weapons inspectors. Since anything an Iraqi spokesperson says about what Iraq is doing is self-evidently a lie, these articles completely poisoned the well, even though they were nominally stating the facts.
...and everything you say to each other is saved on Google's servers for who knows how long...
Sure, at some point it *is* cheaper to rent than buy. Not sure it's at $12,500. But there are other reasons to own the place where you hang your hat.  Maybe you'd like a fancy new fridge even though the current one still works fine. Try talking the landlord into that!
well there are lot who care!
A fine city.  Home to art, poetic photography and graphic work, love and that.  A new view on the world.
Direct Amazon.com "Fishbowl" link:  http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/browse/-/16305491/ref=amb_link_394622_1/002-5666785-9856822
I don't know how these things work in the UK, but in the US if prices skyrocket you'll still get forced out because your property taxes will rise along with property values. So you're basically renting your house from the government, even when you own.
so you're using a 6 letters password. hmm..
Digg
I'm not talking about fundamentalist christians. Just religious folk in general. And their delusion based decisions _do_ impact directly on my life. For example: The guys that flew the planes into the twin towers. Their decision has had a large imapct on my civil liberties. ANd I don't even live in the US. This decision, while not motivate by religion, was definitely influenced by it. Similarly the war on iraq has directly increased the risk of terrorist attacks in the uk where I live, and the two men who spearheaded that war are both christians, and both have openly discussed their religions influence on their decisions.   
this is so cruel!
al gore for prez!
I thought "save the world" is rather a Google than an Apple stock quote.
There are still tickets selling!!  Iran vs. Angola anyone??
After reading this explanation, they'll quit trying to understand.
I'm hungry.
That actually happens in Shrek 2. I was just delighted. :)
i was reading a blog called girlspoke, when i came accross the reddit icon. i knew about digg, newsvine and some others. but nothing about reddit. i like how you can like and dislike stories.
beware of your chic's
Well, I'm glad he's got over any NT inhibitions on throwing stones. I don't know whethe he has considered Jesus's description of his relations with the existing scripture--unless perhaps the Buddhist ones. I suppose that describing fundamentalists for the Huffington Post readership is a bit like describing the Himalayas to someone who's never left Florida: minute accuracy is not required. Has he done any studies on charitable giving etc. among these people? Finally, the thought is not new, and has been better expressed. From Emerson's _English Traits_, courtesy of U.Va.: ***  The doctrine of the Old Testament is the religion of England. The first leaf of the New Testament it does not open. It believes in a Providence which does not treat with levity a pound sterling. They are neither transcendentalists nor christians. They put up no Socratic prayer, much less any saintly prayer for the queen's mind; ask neither for light nor right, but say bluntly, "grant her in health and wealth long to live." And one traces this Jewish prayer in all English private history, from the prayers of King Richard, in Richard of Devizes' Chronicle, to those in the diaries of Sir Samuel Romilly, and of Haydon the painter. "Abroad with my wife," writes Pepys piously, "the first time that ever I rode in my own coach; which do make my heart rejoice and praise God, and pray him to bless it to me, and continue it."  ***   
lo mismo
q: what's brown and sits on the piano, steaming ?  a: Beethoven's 5th movement.
171,574 frogs have been made to suffer in boiling water to test this hypothesis
Might be useful if the site wasn't so annoyingly laced with google ads.  Also, it seems like any advice they have for existing sores is mostly to recommend perscription drugs-- something only a doctor can do anyways. Finally, no "helping to prevent cold sores" section which is what I was hoping for :\
I Beta-tested OneCare on 3 PCs for just about a year, and although it's an easy all-in-one anti-virus/back-up/firewall solution, I deleted it last month.   First and foremost, an all-in-one security package is not a good idea: if something goes wrong with it (as it did several times during my testing), it shuts down.  That means you have no anti-virus and no firewall.  Nothing.  Of course, it was a Beta product I was using, but it automatically upgrades itself each time MS fixes bugs, and 3 weeks ago, it was the "final" product...  As I said, I had it on 3 PCs, and last month, 2 OneCare installations completely crapped out--so much so that their support people told me to uninstall &amp; reinstall (online, of course, meaning I was connecting to the web completely unprotected), edit the registry, run a few MS uninstaller products, etc.  That was a pain in the ass, but the support instructions were even worse, and the follow-up was literally non-existent. Tech Support is not available 24x7, so if you have a problem at night or on a weekend, you're screwed.  Worse still, the instructions they gave me were useless; I had to figure it out myself.  Even after I wrote to 4 different MS support units, I never got a response, until I posted a message on a MS board, detailing their horrible customer service for Beta testers.  And to add insult to injury, the new instructions they gave me were impossible to complete, since the old instructions messed up my registry, which disallowed a fresh installation of OneCare! Anyway, for the casual PC user who doesn't want to bother with security, OneCare is fine.  But for anyone who actually uses his/her PC regularly, avoid OneCare &amp; use separate security products.   After finally getting OneCare off my PCs, I opted for NOD32 antivirus and Kerio firewall, and they're a breath of fresh air.
Isnt this the same site that was absolutely 100% sure that Rove was going to be arrested within 48hrs about 2 weeks ago?
Snopes &gt; some guy's dad
Not specifically about this article, but about the spirit that lies behind this and many other articles we will see over the next month: Americans are unsophisticated because they don't care enough about sports. Specifically, my favorite part of the World Cup hype comes when people who spend most of 4 years complaining about how Americans are brutes for watching too much sports on TV suddenly start complaining about how Americans are brutes for not watching enough sports on TV. Soccer (and no, it's not a sign of barbarism to call it by a different name) is a lovely game, but it's not particularly popular in the US. Perhaps this is because with, depending on region, 3 or 4 major sports, people don't have room for another. In any case, the qualities that make soccer great are not inherently better than those that make baseball, basketball, or American football great.
What does soccer have to do with the football world cup?
I was looking for an example of "python" and here I am
I agree. I like the idea of specifically labelling the mod buttons "interesting" and "boring" rather than up/down. Makes it very clear what message you're sending about the article.
0.o   ~
I don't think I'd ever buy something as major as a house on a loan that isn't at least partially fixed. I'd spend all my time in bed lying awake worrying that interest rates would go up and I'd be completely ruined.
You need to find an ideal way of organizing and supporting your business. You can develop your own style, embrace your inner talents, find “your and only your” way to Success.
Well that is great for you but what about young guys like myself looking for their first place?  Should I buy the 143k townhouse and expect it to be 250k in three years?
This is a short video clip to why  Rally directors take out section of course. I think you'll find this amusing...
Yeah... I didn't think that was better expressed at all, actually.  Thanks for trying; please play again.
If he was such a security expert he wouldn't have been caught :P Just kidding.  Interesting post.
I don't care what everyone else thinks in America. And to be honest, let the beer swilling, Hee Haw loving, Nascar watching fans stick to watching cars race around an oval track. Eventually, America will come around and root for their own team. However, being a fickle bunch we either need proof or a great story. While the 2002 campaign was a great story, it had a poor ending (damn that German handball!). I think 2010 will be the year things begin to catch on if Adu can develop into a star.
Here it is by far the most well-known and loved TV Show. [Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/El_Chavo) suggested it would be even more popular in the US, but I guess this is far from truth. =P
From a comment on Slashdot that suggested Reddit as an alternative. I used to read Slashdot a few times a day on average but immediately switched to using Reddit/Digg, then later still gave up on Digg too.
"There ought to be a term that would designate those who actually follow the teachings of Jesus, since the word 'Christian' has been largely divorced from those teachings".   Jeesites.
One possible way out of this vicious cycle - user pref 'weights for different categories in my.reddit' to allow me to decide how much each feature vote should count for in deciding the mix of stories in the browse tabs.
eweek magazine
I've noticed a trend.. people vote down a story that speaks about horros in Iraq, but oddly enaugh, like a story that mocks Bush. Why American people can't accept responsibility about what happens in Iraq? Are you ashamed? Then you should do more about it. See these sites if you dare: http://peacetakescourage.cf.huffingtonpost.com/animations/wwjd.html http://thewomaniwasblog.blogspot.com/ Please vote down this link showing your real support
http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;q=tiannamen+square
Peter Foster, the UK's Daily Telegraph South Asia Correspondent, finds it difficult to explain football mania in India - a country where is it virtually non-existant.
Where in the US do you live?  Here (upstate NY) it's generally the case that the property values are only updated every 5 or 10 years, and they do the whole neighborhood at once.  If the values go up, they lower the rates some to keep the total tax revenue from spiking.  The main exception to this is if you add on to your house, which does cause a spike in your taxes.
Knowledge of the existence Reddit and [Woz's signature](http://www.zoo-crew.org/~droid/images/blessed.jpg) were the two useful things I got from the first Startup School.
So all the possible functions are having a party. They're drinking, dancing, chatting each other up, and generally having a great time.  Somewhere off in an n-dimensional corner, e^x is sitting all by his lonesome. A group of expenential functions is standing nearby. So 2^x comes up to e^x and says "Come on, man, don't sulk like that, integrate yourself with the rest of us", to which e^x replies "What for, it wakes no difference??"
classic pun - "russel" sounds the same as "rustle", the sound leaves make.
This is similar in the UK, but it is based on "bands" of property and the way it is implemented is completely undemocratic because the top band starts at start about 500K (not uncommon in the UK, especially in the south) and goes to "infinite", which means that all these football player with their mansions pay the same council tax as a slightly above average family in London. I may be wrong on the figures, but the principle of the bands is wrong.
Excerpt: Electronics companies are promoting fuel cells as an environmentally-friendly and convenient alternative to traditional lithium ion batteries.
&gt; Thoughtful Americans have long wondered how it is that fundamentalist Christians--followers of someone who preached pacifism and tolerance--became the poster boy for hate speech, touting "moral values" indistinguishable from those of the Taliban. Hate speech? While there are obviously some Christians that do hate, I don't believe that saying homosexuality is wrong is hate speech. You can dislike what someone does and not hate them. Sometimes I really dislike what my friends do to me, but I never hate them. But if he's talking about the "God hates fags" stuff, then yeah, that's hate speech. &gt; They wonder why, for example, fundamentalist Christians so seldom quote from the New Testament--which is supposedly what Christianity is all about--but prefer citing the Torah and Old Testament prophets. They are legalists, Pharisees. They existed in Christ's day and they exist now, and it really shouldn't be suprising. Man has used everything possible to exert their control over other human beings, whether it be money, power, politics, and religion is another great way of doing it. But Christ got pretty hardcore about those people. They were really the only group he completely lashed out at. *"Woe to you, teachers of the law and Pharisees, you hypocrites! You shut the kingdom of heaven in men's faces. You yourselves do not enter, nor will you let those enter who are trying to.* - Matthew 23 They forget what is important: *"Nor are you to be called 'teacher,' for you have one Teacher, the Christ. The greatest among you will be your servant. For whoever exalts himself will be humbled, and whoever humbles himself will be exalted."* - Matthew 23:10 &gt; One reason is that the Old Testament is full of murder, vindictiveness, and genocide--all supposedly ordered by God. So when fundamentalists want a Biblical excuse for hate speech and hate crimes--which they seem to need with considerable frequency--they turn to Old Testament sources. The problem I have with that is while the OT is full of murder, vindictiveness, and genocide, much of it is recorded, but much of it isn't approved of by God. One thing that shows to me that the Bible is a realistic book is that it never tries to whitewash the Jews' history. David, Israel's most celebrated king, slept with a woman and then had her husband murdered. Now the Bible was clear that God was very upset with that, but instead of omitting that from the record and trying to act like it never happened, the Jews recorded it and wrote about God's reaction to it, because in the end the Bible is still a story about God and his interactions with man, including the good and bad of man. &gt; Christian homophobes, for example, carry signs saying 'God hates fags', which they justify by claiming that Leviticus 18:22 (condemning male homosexuality as "abomination") is the 'word of God'. Yet more than a third of the entire book of Leviticus is devoted to God's detailed instructions on the proper manner of making burnt offerings of animals to Him. (The rest deals with keeping Jewish dietary laws, avoiding pollution from inadvertent contact with menstruating women, forbidding haircuts and beard trimming, justifying slavery, and saying anyone who swears should be stoned to death). Why doesn't God hate those who fail to make offerings in the exact manner He so carefully spelled out in chapter after chapter? Since fundamentalists feel comfortable ignoring 95% of the 'word of God' in Leviticus, why have they latched onto this isolated phrase? If "God hates fags", then God must feel positively murderous toward people who don't make burnt offerings of animal carcasses in the precise manner so carefully indicated, and in such extreme detail. (God must also hate people who eat lobster, shrimp and pork, which are also "abominations" according to Leviticus). The "God hates" fags stuff sickens me, but the mention of homosexuality being a sin is repeated in the New Testament in Romans 1 (it may be 2). &gt; It's startling, in fact, how rarely fundamentalist Christians mention the sayings of Jesus. 'Morality' to them means the sexual inhibitions of ancient Middle Eastern patriarchies. They seem to be nostalgic for the pruderies of the 1950s, when the Hays office decreed that movies couldn't show pajama-clad married couples in bed together lest it incite teenage moviegoers to fornication. This obsession with sexuality is surprising, since Jesus seemed to have very little interest in the topic. In the four Gospels there are only four statements about sexuality, and these deal with adultery and divorce rather than sex per se. That is, with relationships--with causing injury to another. Christ made the statement, "I tell you the truth, if you look at a woman lustfully you have committed adultery with her in your heart." It would thus lead one to believe that anything more than that (fooling around, looking at porn, etc) would also be seen as adultery. That being said, there isn't anything wrong with sex itself, and Christians that try to restrict it even among married couples are nuts. &gt; for these texts were written in societies that were misogynistic, militaristic, and rigidly authoritarian--written, furthermore, by men who believed the earth was flat. Yes, the OT is very militaristic and authoritarian because Israel was developing as a nation and needed stringent laws, otherwise they would end up like the nations around them, sacrificing their children to pieces of stone (which they did end up doing, unfortunately). This is also why Christ comes along and says that while he has not abolished the law, he has fulfilled it. The laws that applied to a theocratic Israel don't apply to Christians as a whole now in many cases. However, the OT is also a beautiful book of laments, wisdom, and remorse, which I find that many people often overlook. I think some of the most fascinating things are passages such as Psalm 22 which literally detail the entire crucifixion scene 1,000 years before it happened. But they believed the earth was flat? I believe it is Psalm 40:22 which says, "God sits above the circle of the earth." &gt; The reason why so many fundamentalist Christians are so notoriously "unChristian" is simple: for the majority of Christians (Quakers are among many notable exceptions) Christianity isn't about the teachings of Jesus, and never was.  Bingo. &gt; The early church fathers knew that Jesus' rather Buddhist message of nonviolence and voluntary poverty wouldn't fly in the Graeco-Roman world, let alone in the Middle East. The idea of a Redeemer on the other hand--someone who would voluntarily sacrifice Himself for humanity and their sins--was very popular. Instead of having to give up their worldly goods and espouse non-violence, all the Romans had to do was believe in the miraculous stories surrounding Jesus' birth and death, which was easy for them, since such stories had been told about pagan gods and heroes and were already familiar. If this was true the church would have never spread as it did before Constantine came to power, while it was still heavily persecuted. Jesus was also a very "un-Roman" god. Christ the Jewish man dying naked on a cross crapping all over himself isn't nearly as appealing as Jupiter. &gt; Christianity as it exists among fundamentalists isn't about behaving like Jesus. It's all about faith--about believing the story. The underlying message seems to be: you can behave any way you want as long as you believe the story and say you're sorry before you die. Following the teachings of Jesus is much too demanding, whereas with the Christianity of fundamentalists all you have to do is shut your mind off. Which is why James says, "Faith without works is dead." &gt; There ought to be a term that would designate those who actually follow the teachings of Jesus, since the word "Christian" has been largely divorced from those teachings, and so polluted by fundamentalists that it has come to connote their polar opposite: intolerance, vindictive hatred, and bigotry. "Christian" is the word. Christian literally means "little Christ." If people don't act like Christ, they can't be a "little Christ" aka Christian. If all I did was write HTML, I could call myself a programmer, but that doesn't make me one. Its my actions which give me a title. Sorry for the long post, but you guys know I like discussing this.
What?!?!? If you're drinking to get drunk, you gotta drink MANICHEWITZ.
is that a trick question?
mesmamente
from project aardvark vid from fog creek
Sloganı "orijinal fikir-farklı kalıp" olan bu site "insanların düşüncelerini, özgürce ve seviyeli bir şekilde sunabileceği bir paylaşım alanıdır"
The author overlooks two big points.  First, in most cases people buy a much nicer place than they would rent, so the extra money goes to a better standard of living.  If money is all that matters, renting might be *cheaper*, but it's not always *better*.  Second, the $12500 to $100 ratio works out ok as a rule of thumb, but should be calculated over the life of the lease/mortgage.  That is, rent goes up every year, but mortgage payments don't.  Not a big deal if you plan on moving every year or two anyway, but if you will be in town for five years or more, it makes a big difference.
i read about it in a boston globe article...
Haskell is prettier than OCaml, imho. And the lazy stuff can be pretty cool. It mostly reads just like math.
Same here.  I was reading /. comments about the demise of /. and I was begining to get very frustrated with the whole crowd over there and the kinds of stories they'd post.  Luckily, someone pointed out Reddit and Digg, although I'm not nearly as fond of Digg.
Meeting: two musicians and one drummer Q: How do you know a drummer is ringing?  A: It's getting faster. Q: How do you know a lead guitarist is ringing?  A: It's getting unbearable load. Two musicians are walking by a bar Q: How many bass players does it take to change a light bulb?  A: None, the keyboarder does it with his left hand
comp.lang.lisp
Apurva's quite upset with Stardock.
paulgraham.com.  sorry. yawn.
not very nice if /path/to/file is really long
Yeah, via me, who found it via Paul Graham, so :P
He forgot to consider what happens after you pay off your house. Of course, renting is cheaper WHILE you are paying your mortgage (and PITI). Duh.
Hah, that's even funnier.
That Coffee machine is way too cool.
The very fact that they would speak of the earth as a circle is interesting, as a sphere is obviously circular in nature. My point was that while there isn't any conclusive evidence in the Bible that they knew the earth was not flat, there also isn't anything conclusive to say that they did think so. It seems apparent that ancient cultures knew more than we often give them credit for.
Nah, more a comment the game not being called by its proper name.
Slater is the one focusing on hate speech: not Christians. Score -1: Flamebait.
Here in Massachusetts it's the same.  I think jgalt02453 is overstating the problem.
a snare drum and crash cymbol fall out of a tree.. baduumm, tssshhh
I'm just a sucker for this kind of discovery. It reminds me of how I felt as a child, reading Jules Verne's &lt;cite&gt;Journey to the Centre of the Earth&lt;/cite&gt;.
One hot summer day, a man is filling up his black pickup truck at the local gas station. He isn't very careful, and he gets gasoline all over his jacket's left sleeve. He ignores it, and leaves the station after paying for the gas. As he's driving down the highway, the heat of the sun on his truck's black paint is enough to ignite his jacket sleeve. He drives faster, waving his arm out the window in an attempt to extinguish the flames, but they burn hotter! As he speeds down the highway, a state trooper sees the situation and pulls him over. He jerks the man out of the truck and rolls him on the ground until the fire is extinguished. As the man dusts himself and thanks his rescuer, he sees the officer is writing him a summons! Confused, he asks, "You're writing me a ticket!? What for?"  The officer replies, "Posession of an illegal fire arm."
That's Isaiah 40:22, btw.
I call hoax. ..but just in case Im getting together all the aerosol cans in the house. Anyone have a match?
I'd given it a seond look, but forgotten about it. The lisp-&gt;python hoohaa, brought me back, and then I stayed for the comments.
When I hear the title "Investor Geeks", I immediately think of Long Term Capital Management and Enron. Sad connotation, but there it is.
"A fan in England bought insurance that will pay close to $2 million if he suffers “mental trauma” from the British team making an early exit" Newsflash for yanks: there is no 'British' football team, there are however English, Scottish, Welsh and N.Irish teams. Its the English one that is in the World Cup this year...
shii ftw
Agreed!
Nobody is complaining that US don’t fancy football (soccer), but it is kind of strange when you consider how extremely popular it is everywhere else. (no hidden sarcasm)  In general I'm not especially interested in football but to me the World Cup is the exception. It's so important to so many people around the world that it has some cozy unite-the-world feeling that is impossible not to be caught up with. Picture three strangers from Trinidad, England and Iran who are trying to find something casual to talk about and you see my point.  
Its not really accurate though. It just reads your local system clock, which in my case is our central server clock that is always 12 minutes slow, for reasons beyond anyones understanding.   
&gt;&gt;The reason why so many fundamentalist Christians are so notoriously "unChristian" is simple: for the majority of Christians (Quakers are among many notable exceptions) Christianity isn't about the teachings of Jesus, and never was. &gt;Bingo. Do you really believe that?  I don't think that the majority of Christians aren't focused on the teachings of Jesus.
I noticed.
hey those are useful.
So what if America doesn't care about football world cup. I don't watch superbowl nor NBA and I do not feel bad about not caring...
Now that's my kind of editorializing in the headline. ;)
no, what happens after you pay off your house is the whole point of the article.  if, in fact, it is cheaper to rent than to purchase, then the differential between renting and purchasing is money that can be invested.  the question, then, is whether the house you own will be worth more than the value of that invested difference.  once you factor PITI and maintenance into the cost of the house, that difference (after a typical 30-year mortgage and against even a basic 4% savings account) can be massive, even when we allow for a reasonable rate of appreciation.  there's every possibility the renter would be able to simply purchase the house outright with the cash saved over the term of a typical mortage. duh, indeed.
And the energy is comming from where?
&gt; Specifically, my favorite part of the World Cup hype comes   &gt; when people who spend most of 4 years complaining about how   &gt; Americans are brutes for watching too much sports on TV   &gt; suddenly start complaining about how Americans are brutes   &gt; for not watching enough sports on TV. You get that a lot, do you? Foreigners complaining about your level of TV sports watching? Must be annoying.
heh
Reading between the lines is necessary when listening to politicians. What is being left unsaid here? Ok. Give up? We won't talk about citizenship for now. Let's do the border control then when the time comes to talk about citizenship, well... You will have to guess prom the previous vote in the house where people stand regarding citizenship.
(Translated article from a swedish news site)[http://reddit.com/info/713g/comments]
anch'io :-)
Oh, how didn't I think of that???
I would be diappointed, and my husband didn't even get me an engagement ring. As Fedia points out, it's a symbol. I noticed about 40% of people would glance at my finger whenever I told them I was engaged. No shit. I felt like I had to have a ring. So I wore a ring that belonged to my grandma. It was opal, anyway, and not diamond.
My favorite reason was #7. Basically, think about all the other things you could buy for the same amount of money that a big fancy ring costs. Most compelling: a fantastic honeymoon. As an engagement ring, I wore an opal ring that belonged to my grandmother. Then my husband and I spent 2 months travelling in Europe. I think we did the right thing.
Only with the new USB-SarcasMeter-Pro!
product placement is already there.  Ever notice once the hatch opened up, everyone on the island was using Nalgene bottles?  Or how about the washer and dryer in the hatch... they look pretty new.
Easy to use contextual ads technology for Amazon products. Useful product details preview. Style the ads with CSS.
Hmm... When I was training for an olympic-length triathlon (years ago), I regularly did 34 miles in 2 hours.  I wasn't in great shape-- I was 2 months into training after a long period of typically geeky inactivity. My route was neither flat nor clear and I was on a mountain bike rather than a road bike, so I figured in ideal conditions, it wouldn't be too tough to average higher than that. ...Maybe I should enter some races.  ;)
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
Yeah, so is the lady is question going to lie? "What did he get you?" "A moissanite ring". Still doesn't work. No, I've never seen moissanite, hope I never do. Sorry to be mean. moral of the story, just get her what she wants and don't be mean.
His name is Robert Paulson. His name is Robert Paulson. His name is Robert Paulson. His name is Robert Paulson. His name is Robert Paulson. His name is Robert Paulson.
true! why does that bother some people so much?
I think it was a yahoo pick of the day about a year ago. If not, I don't remember.
If Ubuntu can't get Linux to the mainstream, nothing will. I've love to see a hardware company come out and produce well-designed, but relatively inexpensive stuff based around Ubuntu. Sort of like an Apple for the common folk.
Well you're better than PG so there. *awaits barrage of insults from all PG lovers on this site*
The same is right for me
I think it is me. I don't know any others enough to have a favorite, so I like me best.
Another misguided post.  People need to stop bashing everything the govt does and for once think for themselves why the govt. does certain things. Reading through, it seems the choice is this -  do you conduct more research for a short-term goal ( &lt; 10 years of happiness ) -or -  do you conduct more research towards a long term goal  I certainly don't know which is better but since I don't have extensive knowledge on whats going on with these researches I will put my trust in my elected govt. for better or worse.   And no, trusting someone is not a bad thing.
on the charcoal grill, with black pepper, garlic, and worscheshire (sp?) sauce. About 4-6 minutes on each side of a thick fresh steak (I prefer NY strip steak), check for moderate pinkness. Served next to a baked potato and fresh Broccoli.
Download the torrent (i386)  http://releases.ubuntu.com/6.06/ubuntu-6.06-desktop-i386.iso.torrent
http://mitworld.mit.edu/video/291/
Ok, I'm no soccer afficianado, but was that really that spectacular? He just kicked it really far. I mean, I bet that was hard, but I'm sure there are more "unusual" shots, like bouncing off the goalkeeper's head or something... I'd be curious to know how a soccer player felt about this shot -- anyone care to comment?
And then Rush jumps up out of the tub and announces, "We're the Aristocrats!"
I live in Canada and as much as it pains me to admit it, the US and Canada are fairly similar. Just because we North Americans could care less about professional soccer doesn't mean nobody watches the World Cup.  I have followed every World Cup starting in '94 (I was too young before that) and I could probably name atleast one player on most of the teams in the competition.  I know who's expected to win and I know who is pretty much a guarantee to go out in the first round. While I would say that I know more than 95% of the people around here, most people still get interested in it, especially if they are a first, second or third generation immigrant from one of the countries competing. Even without the immigrants, people still get into it.  Even during the Euro Cup last time most people knew that Greece was doing well and that this was a bit of a suprise. People may not know who all the players are or anything about the strategy, but they still get interested in it, even if they forget about it a few days after its done.
Kind of like [The Scratchpad](http://web.okaygo.co.uk/apps/scratchpad/flashcom/)
I think it would explode. then it would be mostly red and green, with touches of yellow.
some math in the article I don't like.  Mainly the 8%-12% presumed annual market returns.  If you are not allowed to presume home appreciation, you shouldn't be able to presume such exceptional investment returns.  6% after tax is realistic, but still aggressive.  If you live in a country without mortgage interest tax deduction, it's comparable to interest payments. So you can compare home ownership to investment ownership without complicating mortgage costs... compare owning outright. The cost of home ownership are property taxes, insurance maintenance, and RE commission on sale.  Tax and insurance adds up to 1.1% of value on my property.  Maintenance tends not to vary so much with home value, but lets just make it 0.4% anyway.  1.5% total.  Hope for 5% appreciation to cover 5% RE commission. By my calculation, $7500/yr in rent is equivalent to owning $100000 of home, if you presume no home appreciation.  This is approximately the comparative rent levels in my area. If instead of presuming 6% aftertax investment return, you presume just 4% higher investment returns than home appreciation (after RE commmission) which is actually the historical rates, then $5500/yr ~$460/mo per $100,000 home value. So it boils down to expected returns from alternative investments, deducting 1.5% from home ownership. You can get 5% from US government bonds.  If you think there is a housing bubble, don't buy.  If there is going to be a soft landing on housing, with just slow price hikes from here, then its a bit better to own home.
You know guys, instead of saying 'me too' or something, there is a little up arrow next to TronXD's name that symbolizes you like what he's said, or in this case, that you're in the same boat as him.
Its an unusual goal I agree, but not really involving much skill. Its purely chance. The best goal I've ever seen is where some African dude goalie dribbled the ball all the way to the other end and scored a goal.  Think about that - a goalie actually dribbling the ball through and through and scoring a goal on his own.   If someone can help me remember who the goalie was and has a link, I'd be very appreciative.
In my mind, the main reason to rent is this: Buying has high transaction costs.  When you have to pay 5% of the full cost of a property to a realtor, you better be sure you will be staying on one place for a long time before buying.
The only thing that sucks is it is every 4 years! I really enjoyed watching the US team in 2002. They had some really great games and almost pulled it out against Germany. You don't appreciate how good those guys are until you get out there and play a little soccer yourself; that is one demanding sport. Its kind of difficult for American crowds to get excited when 1) soccer isn't popular here anyway and 2) I had to stay up until 4 AM to watch the US play in 2002 when the tourney was in Korea. In the end, though, I think its only a matter of time until basketball suprasses soccer as *the* worldwide sport.
What a stupid thing to say. You're the reason why fanatical ideologies exist you know where.   You may say it in jest but fanaticism is slowly born out of such strong opinions.
Why are Florida Senators fighting against offshore drilling when 51% percent of their voters support the exploration?  Know the facts..check the site..
I had never heard of Digg until I went to reddit. To me, Reddit seems literally twice as good by comparison.
I didn't mind the "Evil Bible" story but this is just flamebait. To my eyes there are many fundamentalists who do take Jesus' call to charity and forgiveness seriously. Not so seriously that they impoverish themselves, but it's well known that Americans do give a lot to charity. The fundamentalist leadership seems pretty awful, but that's the case in just about every organized religion. I do have concerns that the dominionist message is gaining more traction over even the watered-down Christianity, which is as scary as the author depicts. 
&gt; But they believed the earth was flat? I believe it is Psalm 40:22 which says, "God sits above the circle of the earth."   Yeah. A circle is flat. The Earth is a sphere.  
LOL some funny ones.   However, what I find these days is that there is some stupid automated voice that keeps talking instead of a human.
I think it's a valid article. Part of the reason that it's important for (married) couples to be really open with each other about their expenditures. I know current fashions dictate having separate bank accounts, but I think sharing one really forces accountability.
From digg.com  after it started getting polluted with too many stories and all the losers from Slashdot starting coming to digg. Still visit digg though
paulgraham
I have a problem with trusting this administration when it comes to anything regarding SCIENCE.
Such as?
You guys will have to start writing your senators, governors, etc... to stop them from taxing the internet. Wait a minute, that includes me :)
45 minutes is 25% faster than 1 hour.  17mph *1.25 ~ 21.2mph  over 1 hour that is pretty good.  17mph is about 70 RPM in top gear on a mountain bike. In the 2004 Tour, Armstrong completed the 55km individual time trial with an average speed of 49.39 km/h... thats 29mph. "When I was training for an olympic-length triathlon" right there... that substantially exceeds the common understanding of "decent shape"
Russian variant: Holmes and Watson have come out of a country pub at the end of a long night of quaffing warm ale. As they wander down the road, they can just make out a tree in the darkness and head over to answer the call of nature. As they are mid-flow, Holmes asks Watson what he can deduce from the sound of his stream. Watson replies that he believes the tree to be an oak of between 100-150 years with some disease in the past causing a hollow in the centre. As he expounds further, Holmes cuts him off and snaps, 'From the sound you are making I deduce that you are pissing on my shoes'.
Yeah they do, and how ;)   There are still a lot of Irish startups though, and many grow to be successful SMEs/lifestyle businesses.  Our medium size companies often get bought before growing big or get rebranded as US companies (e.g. Smartforce, IONA) because often that's the primary market and that's were they have their IPO.  Overall I'd say Ireland rates quite highly on many of the factors highlighted by Paul (particularly immigration, capital gains, the quality of our Universities isn't bad (there are many successfuly spin offs from both Trinity College and UCD e.g. Trin Tech, Changing Worlds) &amp; Dublin is a great city to live in). Not surprising we've been the fatest growing European Economy for the past decade and a half..
I think the issue at hand is there is a lot of ways that we can conserve our energy consumption in the short term, and that these program's costs were modest at best.  The hydrogen car, for example, has several strikes against it, the first being the chicken-and-egg catch-22. Nobody's going to buy a hydrogen car until they can get hydrogen fuel to fill up. Nobody's going to sell Hydrogen fuel until people are buying Hydrogen-powered cars.  The second is that creating hydrogen from water via electrolysis is expensive, energy-wise. To meet that demand, without causing undue environmental damage, we would have to construct more nuclear power plants. While I'm not against that, the fear of a meltdown would no doubt upset many communities, and the rallying cry of "Not In My Backyard" would no doubt win the day.  Developing decentralized, low-cost, energy-efficent power plants that would continue to operate and supply their neighborhoods with power after a disaster would not only strengthen our nation's infrastructure, but lower energy costs and create jobs.
The Daily Telegraph's Washington correspondent Alec Russell warns the new US policy to open talks with Iran could yet lead to military action.
So there are bad Christians in the world. Some of those bad Christians are involved with a lot of other bad things (like bad foreign policy, prejudice, etc.). It doesn't take a lot of critical thought to make a distinction between the worst representatives of a group and the group itself. That's a pretty basic step of reasoning, and one of the key steps to avoiding prejudice. There are some bad Christians/Muslims/Jews/Hindus out there, and some bad Whites/Blacks/Asians/Latinos/etc. Reasonable people don't condemn these groups outright because of the actions of some of their members. Unfortunately, there are a lot of people on Reddit these days who aren't reasonable. And please don't make either one of these arguments: 1 - Christians are ignorant and intolerant towards others, so I can be ignorant and intolerant towards them. OR 2 - Christians are in power, unlike Jews/blacks/gays, so I can hate them. Both of these arguments are so full of holes that I'm not even going to bother dealing with them. &lt;/RANT&gt;
This morning this was at the bottom of my browser window so it looked like "Fight Creative Uses for Old PC Parts."   And after seeing those dumb pics I think it is more appropriate. Ok, I admit that the caffine machine is cool..
In America, Christianity has become synonymous to some with what is essentially a neofascist political movement. If there are Christians who don't like this, they need to speak up against the use of their faith by smarmy political ideologues. EDIT - one more point This is why the seperation of church and state was established. It was not to promote atheism, although one certainly has a right to be an atheist. Rather, it was more to *protect* religion from the corrupting influence of politics. Get this through your thick skulls you religious right morons: politics is war. Anything that embeds itself in politics becomes fair game for political attack. By eroding the church-state boundary, you turn religion into a political franchise and therefore make it fair game. Politics is a worldly game of money and power. 
I keep hoping the next version will include Cedega pre-configured so it can play DirectX games out of the box. If it did that, I'd dump my Windows partition.
"People need to stop bashing everything the govt does" This government does what it does to convince the public that the government can't do anything right. So far, they're succeeding. "I will put my trust in my elected govt. for better or worse." As the Gipper sai, "Trust, but verify."
Type INTERNET in the search bar and find out how your politicians really stand regarding porn, taxing the internet, etc... It's an archive so you can surf articles all the way to last May. Our politicians do a good job of forgetting what they said last year. Let's NOT do the same.
The book's title is *High: Confessions of a Pot Smoker* http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0679312781/sr=8-1/qid=1149172954/ref=pd_bbs_1/002-4496498-0832840?%5Fencoding=UTF8
Does it though?  Since the payments are equal, esentially your choices are: 1. Give $1 to the government, get about 30 cents back.  2. Pay down $1 of principal. You don't earn any interest on either, so wouldn't you rather pay down more principal?
Actually, it is quite unusual and spectacular. In the sense that it almost never happens, mostly because it's really difficult to beat the goalkeeper from such a distance. It happened here for 2 reasons:  (1) The goalkeeper was way off his line  (2) The ball took a really awkward bounce. Had quite a bit of spin on it. I have to stress that there's no way the opposing keeper meant to do this :-)
I've argued against Christianity in one way or another for a decade now.  That's how long ago I renounced my faith. It feels so futile to continue the same cyclical arguments.  Most of the time I feel like no one changes his or her mind, but I know this isn't true.  Because 10 years ago, I did change mine. Recently, I have changed my mind again.  No, I've not taken up the cross again.  But I have decided to let Christians be.  They have the right to believe whatever they like.  I still believe some rather fantastic and unproved things. | - On to the real point... - | However, the MOMENT that anyone, regardless of how they may describe their belief system, attempts to restrict, retard, or deny any man or woman's intrinsic human rights, I will be at their throat with more verbal browbeating than god ever managed. Believe that homosexuality is wrong.  That’s your right.  But the second you try and restrict a man or woman’s right to marry another man or woman, you’ve crossed the line. Believe that all abortion is wrong.  That’s your right.  But the second you try and restrict a woman’s right to extract a cell cluster that exhibits NO brain function from her body, you’ve crossed the line. Believe that drugs are bad.  That’s your right.  Don’t do them.  But the second you try and tell me what I can and cannot put in my body, you’ve crossed the line. You will note that every one of these is a victimless crime.  And that’s the point… Live and let live, as long as you don’t harm someone else.  A man raping a man hurts the man.  Aborting a living, thinking baby hurts the baby.  Drinking and driving hurts other drivers. Know where the lines are, and Christianity can co-exist in a free world.  Blur the lines, and, well… you’ll get to listen to me bitch. 
That's just the thing. There are millions of Christians who do speak out against it, and millions of others who disapprove silently. But Tom DeLay is much more visible than Sojourners.
They might be equal outlays, but paying down $1 of principal on the loan seems better than giving $1 to the government just to get 30 cents back.
Bwaa ha ha haaaa. The U.S. is one of the most religious countries in the world.  http://www.umich.edu/news/index.html?Releases/2003/Nov03/rel_graphs Yes, we have a formal separation of church and state, but that's narrow because politicians are in office by a religious electorate.  As a thought experiment, consider whether an athiest would ever be elected president.
I think the title of this submission is misleading. In the quoted e-mail, it says: "Please note that Google Base has replaced the Froogle Merchant Center.", not that Google Base has replaced Froogle itself. "**Along with Froogle**, your content should also be viewable on http://base.google.com ."
Just treat the offer on its own merits. Maybe you were overpaid in your last job and should expect to make less money. Maybe you're trading a higher stress position for an easier one. And maybe the company is just lowballing you. Whether an offer is fair has nothing to do with what you've previously made. Judge the offer on its own merits in the current market. 
I couldn't agree more about the separation of church and state. And most Christians would agree with me, although there are some who don't.  But what's the deal with this: "Get this through your thick skulls you religious right morons"?
From Ambrose Bierce's _The Devil's Dictionary_: ABSTAINER, n.  A weak person who yields to the temptation of denying himself a pleasure.  A total abstainer is one who abstains from everything but abstention, and especially from inactivity in the affairs of others.
Get Visible. Martin Luther King Jr. was "just" a preacher -- until he and Rosa Parks read up on grassroots organizing and decided to STAND UP.  Remember, the civil rights movement did have a 'religious' edge to it -- as in, many religious believed in racial equality, for its not the color of your skin, but the character of your soul that matters to God (Disclaimer: Agnostic here, just giving the argument.) Yes its harder to get noticed by the traditional, mainstream media. Yes, people are more 'afraid' or 'hestitant' to get involved today. Those aren't good excuses -- especially since your opposition is a horrible corrupting influence in America. The next election could be determined by who acts "more holy" -- and honestly, we saw how that played out in the past two elections.
I agree. There are good reasonable Christians. Here's the problem. When I free associate with Christianity the following things come to mind: war, hate, Bush, televangelism, fascism, megachurches, ignorance, anti-science, etc. You've got a PR problem and you've done it to yourselves by allowing yourselves to be sold out to the wolves. The Christian religion is now the property of political PR firms. (Note that I didn't just say Republican... the Democrats are getting in on this game too... your faith will be sold to the highest bidder.) If you want to take back your faith, start with the hypocrite pharisees like Pat Robertson. I'll give you a hint: when they say that "God" wants something, they mean that they do. I wonder how much it costs to get Robertson to get a "message from God?" Can you buy it on eBay? 
Isn't California the "land" of immigrants? Whay are our gubernatorial candidates mum (hehehe. English term :) about immigration? 
I don't think a *dead* baby is in any danger of drowning.
I recently moved from Canada to the States. On my first day here, a Sunday, I turned on the television and saw a fundamentalist preacher. Behind him was a photo collage of Blackhawk helicopters, explosions, and a map of the middle east. He eagerly anticipated a coming Armageddon where one out of ten Arabs would die, according to his interpretation of Biblical prophecy. He repeated that over and over. I wanted to crawl back under the covers and not get up again that day. I've lived among Christians my whole life. But I've never seen any of the crazy stuff that's going on in the States right now. In most other countries, the real Christians would be first in line to get this guy thrown off the airwaves. I think the insanity that's going under the name of Christianity is provoking those of us, like me, who were atheists but willing to live and let live. It's obvious that organized fundamentalist Christianity in the USA is becoming a threat to civil society as a whole, as they are the core supporters of the Bush administration's agenda.
Wow. If you put it like this it suddenly all makes sense. Where can I sign up?
&gt;I agree. There are good reasonable Christians. Can you verify that? ;)
Of the six questions posed at the end, I couldn't answer any.
Yeah. I've met a few, and I read them sometimes on the 'net. They exist. 
oh, so christians aren't in power?
hey, i'll be the first to admit i'm a fanatic.  i'm fanatical about soccer.  and metal.  metal and soccer are my two fanaticisms. oh, and public executions too.
Pat Robertson is a great example and a hard one to deal with. Believe it or not, most Christians--even conservative Christians who voted for Bush--can't stand Pat Robertson. He has a small, core following of extremly conservative (funadmentalist) Christians, and that's it. But he has a TV show, and there are pundits out there who watch his show just waiting for his next absurd statement. That isn't true for more reasonable Christians. If you take a look at a responsible article on Robertson--for example, after he called for the assasination of Hugo Chavez--you'll see other Christans condemning him. It is that latter group--and not Pat Robertson or Jerry Falwell--that most evangelical Christians listen to.
That is a missleading title
Yeah, whatever happened to those anyway?  They were great!
I found it the same way -- because I was going to try and create the same thing.  Sadly, they had the Paul G. PR machine, so I knew I was beat. ;)
There is a big difference between large metropolitan areas in the US vs. the rest of the country. I live in a dense city where a 1000sq.ft. condo sells for $500K. My parents live in a sprawling city where a 3000sq.ft. house sells for $350K. My brother lives in a small city where a 1500sq.ft. townhouse cost $220K. Each of us made a different decision based on our local real estate market: I rent; my parents' home value has remained flat; my brother made 70K in 7 years. The writer is in the New York metro area where housing prices are insane. His advice matches my own experience, but not my other family member. It may not apply to you, depending on where you live. So stop complaining. 
Evidently you haven't been paying attention to politics in the U.S. recently. Listen to some talk radio for starters. The seperation of church and state is regularly attacked, and there are plenty of me-toos in the echo chamber. I'm a little angry here because I don't want to see our wonderful, free, advanced, post-Enlightenment society retreat back into the dark ages like Muslim culture did.  Muslim culture used to be way more advanced than ours, remember? What happened? The fundamentalists took over. Now they're poor and stupid with among the highest illiteracy rates in the world. 
I'm "religious right" and not totally thrilled at being called a thick-skulled moron. Nevertheless, I'm modding you up for this: &gt;This is why the seperation of church and state was established. It was not to promote atheism, although one certainly has a right to be an atheist. Rather, it was more to protect religion from the corrupting influence of politics. Not many realise this; the popular assumption seems to be that church-state separation was invented in order to kick the Catholics out of government positions in Europe. Curiously enough, the idea that political and religious leadership should be separated is present even in the Old Testament: [King Saul is severely rebuked for offering the sacrifice that the prophet Samuel should have offered](http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=1%20Samuel%2013:5-15;&amp;version=31;). (Contrast this with the pagan religions; I believe in Egypt, for example, the Pharaoh was considered to be divine...)
Yeah, but that only generates the first one. Anyhow, generating the match doesn't strike as a complicated feature; it already knows what the match is when it hits it, so printing the match, instead of printing the line, is a small and straightforward change. One hopes.
Well, yes and no. They certainly are much more established than other religions in America. But that is not the point. The point is that "Christians are the plurality religion" is not an excuse for cheap shots and generalities.
&gt; could care less You mean "could**n't** care less".
&gt; However, the MOMENT that anyone, regardless of how they may describe their belief system, attempts to restrict, retard, or deny any man or woman's intrinsic human rights, I will be at their throat with more verbal browbeating than god ever managed. And I guess, that is the key issue: what are our "intrinsic human rights"? &gt; Believe that homosexuality is wrong. That’s your right. But the second you try and restrict a man or woman’s right to marry another man or woman, you’ve crossed the line. I personally don't think I'll ever have any political issues with homosexuals getting married (I'm not much of a political person anyway). The only problem I have there is homosexuals adopting kids. There's just not enough conclusive evidence (considering how recently homosexuality in this nation has been embraced) to show what the psychological effects are on a kid raised by a homosexual couple. But hey, if homosexuals want to get married, let them get married. They exist in society anyway, I don't think its gonna make much of a difference if they have a slightly different legal status. &gt; Believe that all abortion is wrong. That’s your right. But the second you try and restrict a woman’s right to extract a cell cluster that exhibits NO brain function from her body, you’ve crossed the line. This is the main thing I'll disagree with you about and one of the few things I will actively campaign against. I don't care if fetuses don't always have brain function, they will at one time become living human beings (given the natural course of things). If a woman does not want to get pregnant, she quite simply should not be taking an action which naturally leads to that. She needs to be ready to rais e the child or at least carry it to term and put it up for adoption. Its called responsibility, and I think it is absolutely wrong to kill off what will be (or is) human life simply because it isn't convenient at the time. If it wasn't conventient, you shouldn't have done things which might inconvenience you. As I've stated before on this site, in cases of rape, incest, or the possible death of the mother, I feel that the boundaries are stretched a bit more. But I still believe it is wrong and will actively fight against convenience abortions. &gt; Believe that drugs are bad. That’s your right. Don’t do them. But the second you try and tell me what I can and cannot put in my body, you’ve crossed the line. And you've crossed the line if in doing those drugs you've put yourself into a state that is a danger to me, my family, or my friends (eh, I think you pretty much said this). I don't think a society full of pot heads and coke addicts benefits anyone, though. &gt; You will note that every one of these is a victimless crime. And that’s the point… Live and let live, as long as you don’t harm someone else. There is not such thing as a "victimless" crime. The kid that has emotional issues because they were raised by two men is a victim. The baby that was never born because its mommy had sex and then didn't want to raise it is a victim. The kid neglected because its father is a coke addict is a victim. Obviously these are negative instances while these situations aren't always negative - however there are some actions which have a higher-rate of producing negative instances. But "live and let live" can never work because what some people are hurt by is what others consider a normal life. Finding that balance is hard; we don't want to live in a legalistic restrictive society, but we also don't want to live in a wide-open one which causes more problems than it solves. Everything has some kind of effect, even if it is extremely minute. These are things that we have an extremely hard time determining. Will legalizing weed be detrimental to our society? Obviously it will negatively affect somebody, but even the best things in life cause problems sometimes. So what is truly good and what is truly bad? That's one of the reasons that I think without an absolute truth, an absolute right/wrong, and a God, you run into all kinds of difficulties. I can't think of anything bad that could possibly happen to the person who truly followed all of Christ's commands. They'd probably be one the most content people in the world.
You have to pay for Cedega, not so for Ubuntu, tell the Cedega people what you want.
is that not linux for human beings? (D'oh)
My favorote one is to roll up a newspaper, then ask the telemarketer to hold for a second.  Whack the paper really hard, then scream, "Get back in your cage, you lousy kids!".  If the telemarketer keeps talking, stop a little later and yell, "I don't care if he's bleeding out of his head an not moving, we're not going to the hospital!"  That usually shuts them up.
I'm pretty sure hoshimoto is hoshii motto, which means "I want more". I think you want "chigai ano."
&gt;Reading through, it seems the choice is this - do you conduct more research for a short-term goal ( &lt; 10 years of happiness ) -or - do you conduct more research towards a long term goal -or- do you cut spending elsewhere and do both the above?
"Sort of", in the sense of, "Server not found"?
NOT WORKSAFE
The price/rent ratio has reached a historic high. Look at [this chart](http://www.cepr.net/publications/housing_bubble_2005_09_12.htm)
If we start enough wars the flying saucer will come and take us to heaven! It's called the rapture! You didn't get this with your immigration packet? Are *you* rapture ready? www.raptureready.com 
&gt;gone up all over in the last twenty years... my parents' Toronto house has almost tripled in value; they'd never be able to afford it at the current valuation 20 years... if they invest well (meaning they get an *average* return) their money should double every 8 years.  2^(20/8) = 5.66.  Compare that to tripling their money and they could have done much better. This does not factor in rent costs, because they would have to live somewhere (a strike against renting). Also does not account for how much money they had vs how much of a house they bought, but that should be ~cancelled out by the mortgage % they had to pay. All I'm trying to point out is that just because a house value goes up, even by a lot, it doesn't mean it was a good investment.
Indeed a tragedy for both families - Prayers and confort for all of them.
I'm confused.  The article says it's naturally occuring, etc.  Then the wiki entry that the article links to says it's man made.  Any clarification on this?
That's Bill, he's our PR guy.
Well, I'm gonna need a $20 deposit and then we can get started on processing the paperwork. ;)
My question is, are the people who support "net neutrality" the same ones who oppose internet taxation?
&gt;2. Kansas City Hyatt walkways, 1981  Walkways crisscrossing the hotel’s multistory atrium collapsed, domino-style, raining debris and hundreds of people onto the packed dance contest below. The cause: grossly negligent design and use of beams that could support only 30 percent of the load. The description on Wired.com is not very accurate.  There's a detailed explanantion in Mario Salvadori's book *Why Buildings Fall Down*.  Salvadori's explanation, which I summarize below, is corroborated by [this description from the Mechanical Engineering department at the University of Utah](http://www.mech.utah.edu/ergo/educate/safety_modules/KC/) . The design was to have vertical hangers from the ceiling that could support the design load.  The hangers would be threaded, and each one  would have a nut in the middle and a nut at the bottom.  The middle nuts would support the upper walkway on the hanger and the lower nuts would support the lower walkway on the hanger. When time came to do the implementation, the contractors couldn't figure out how to put a thread onto the middle of a fifty-foot-long hanger and get a nut onto it.  So they asked the structural engineer if they could cut the hanger in two, put a nut at the bottom of the top half of the hanger to support the upper walkway, then hang the lower half of the hanger from the upper walkway and put a nut on the lower part of the hanger to support the lower walkway. The problem with this design is that the upper nut is now supporting both walkways instead of only the upper one.  When people on the walkway were dancing and stomping to a band in the lobby below, one of these nuts gave way, leading to a progressive failure of the rest of the nuts, and both walkways fell into the lobby. The negligence trial focused on the crucial question of whether the structural engineers had approved the changes to the hanger design. The trial found that they had. 114 people died, and 200 more were injured.   
Fundamentalists tend to worship earth-based power more than serving the poor.  For example, the mega-church next to my house [constanty proclaims love for the troops, the police and anyone who is in charge](http://www.brainshrub.com/honor-the-powerful).  I've never seen them proclaim the need to honor the poor.
&gt;And I guess, that is the key issue: what are our "intrinsic human rights"? Life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness… &gt;The only problem I have there is homosexuals adopting kids. There have been numerous studies that children adopted by gay couples are no more or less likely to be abused than children with heterosexual parents. This is an irrational fear, and though you are welcome to have this fear… don’t make laws restricting freedom based on it. As far as psychological effects go, evidence of that is very hard to collect one way or another. &gt;I don't care if fetuses don't always have brain function, they will at one time become living human beings (given the natural course of things). Unfortunately, potential for life is not life. We have a legal definition of death. That is, when brain activity ceases. Why then, is the opposite not the definition of the beginning of life? Genesis of brain activity. Also, I note that you use the phrase “convenience abortions”, so I assume you make exceptions for rape and incest? &gt;And you've crossed the line if in doing those drugs you've put yourself into a state that is a danger to me, my family, or my friends. That’s why I used the drinking and driving example… There are plenty of instances where drugs DO put other people in danger. These can be illegal. But there are also plenty of instances where drugs do NOT put other people in danger. That’s not to say someone under the influence of drugs might not do something else illegal. But then again, a sober individual may do so as well. &gt;There is not such thing as a "victimless" crime. There are. Anything that is illegal, but which does no harm to any man, woman, or child is a victimless crime. 
&gt; Moyers is right, and his message is important. What to do about it, though, is not to tell the world's many religious people, "Your god is false," Moyers is a Baptist and an ordained minister. See his [Wikipedia entry](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bill_Moyers#Early_life).
People on reddit are disturbed by religious fundamentalism, not Christianity in particular. They are all a threat to liberal, democratic and secular societies. Islam has a very large and growing fundamentalist movement threatening the world. Hindu fundamentalists have stoked racist riots and murders in India. Noone has a problem with religion, per se. But when they try to force their religious views on everyone else by grabbing political power, then the rest of us have a responsibility to oppose it.  So chill out, jhd.
Yea but god doesn't even know what a circle is, he thinks Pi is 3: "And he [Hiram] made a molten sea, ten cubits from the one rim to the other it was round all about, and...a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about....And it was an hand breadth thick...." — First Kings, chapter 7, verses 23 and 26
Nope, not so much foreigners. More self-flagellating Americans with the sense that if other countries like it, and we don't, we're fools. See the submitted article. This all may well be true of many things, like universal health care, quality beer, aversion to unilateral preemptive military action. It's a bit annoying when it comes to sports. My point is more that the American columnists and commentators who will complain, with some self-satisfaction about the lack of ratings that the world cup gets, are probably not jumping up and down with glee when the Super Bowl gathers great TV ratings. And I've yet to see them berate the American audience for not watching enough basketball (the most rapidly globalizing sport played here).
jesusphreak,   I feel that you got read too much into the details about the gay thingy. They main thing (to me) in this article is that it highlight the difference between Jesus said and what Christians believe. The following quotes hit home for me:  &gt;…the New Testament--which is supposedly what Christianity is all about. &gt;…for the majority of Christians […] Christianity isn't about the teachings of Jesus, and never was. The early church fathers knew that Jesus' rather Buddhist message of nonviolence and voluntary poverty wouldn't fly… You obviously know a lot about the subject, it would be interesting to hear your take on the above statements.   
Fidelity Magellan (FMAGX) made 18.32% annualized total return from 3/31/76 to 3/31/06, although this is an exceptional return.  The S&amp;P 500 had a total return over that period of 12.32% The point is that with returns like these (or the 10% historical average), you'll be able to pay your rent from the interest on the money you saved and then invested. And the median sale price of existing houses has gone up 6.66% on average from 1968-2005, according to the National Assoc. of Realtors, so yes, he's too conservative to exclude that.
This is a fake story, published by anti-Semites.  It is well known that Jews have been living in Palestine continuously for millions of years.  These shrimp were not there first! The shrimp will be evacuated to their side of the apartheid wall so that settlers can move into the cave.
I think there was a confusion.  I was saying the *war* on drugs was immoral, dangerous, and dehumanizing.  heh
It's an older article, but I found it an interesting read.
I'm not sure if you really meant consistently, but not only is that doubtful... it's also unnecessary. How about this: since Vanguard started VFINX to peg the S+P 500 in 1976, it has averaged **12.03%** return per year. And if you are worried about consistency, the S+P 500 is most likely the most consistent stock investment you can make.  Do you feel it? Do you feel the sting of being wrong?
great resource for bankruptcy attorneys and family law attorneys who want to add value to their practice.
&gt;Unfortunately, potential for life is not life. We have a legal definition of death. That is, when brain activity ceases.  Would you be opposed to jesusphreak lobbying to change the definition of death to "when the potential for brain activity ceases" or something like it?   If you would oppose that change, how do you know that the current definition is correct and unchangable?   If you would not oppose that change, then if he were successful, using your logic, a new definition of death leads to a new definition of life which makes a fetus alive.  If he were successful, would you agree that a woman no longer has a right to an abortion because the legal definition of death changed?
&gt; There have been numerous studies that children adopted by gay couples are no more or less likely to be abused than children with heterosexual parents. This is an irrational fear, and though you are welcome to have this fear… don’t make laws restricting freedom based on it. &gt; As far as psychological effects go, evidence of that is very hard to collect one way or another. Abuse isn't my concern, its the psychological effects, but as you've said, those are hard to determine regardless. I have a very hard time thinking that a kid raised by homosexual parents won't be affected in some way when the status-quo for as long as recorded history goes has never been homosexual couples raising children. Even in Rome and such where they openly practiced homosexuality, children still were never raised by same-sex couples. &gt; Unfortunately, potential for life is not life. We have a legal definition of death. That is, when brain activity ceases. Why then, is the opposite not the definition of the beginning of life? Genesis of brain activity. Potential for life is still a chance at life regardless. The dead person (when they are completely dead) can never come back. There is no chance that they will experience life again. The fetus on the other hand, does have that chance, and they deserve the right to see it through. "Life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness..." Doesn't the fetus have the right to life, even if its only potential life? I do not feel this way about abortions simply to punish the woman or what not. I feel this way because I have a genuine concern for that fetus. This is their one and only shot at life (and what an amazing thing life is). The mother may be inconvenienced for 9 months, she may even have to drop out of school or whatever else, but she still has life after that. The fetus never has that chance again. It would be a bit of a different issues if babies were just randomly generated in a woman's womb - something she would have no control over. But she DOES have a level of control over whether or not she gets pregnant and she needs to accept those consequences - not thinking about herself but thinking about that life inside of her. &gt; Also, I note that you use the phrase “convenience abortions”, so I assume you make exceptions for rape and incest? Right, you may have missed the part where I mentioned those two exceptions. Anyway, thank you for the conversation wockyman. It has been a respectful and enjoyable one.
That's all true, of course. But it's also true that there are many millions of Christians who are intolerant, ignorant, and hell-bent (heh) on establishing a fundamentalist theocracy in the U.S.  So while there are plenty of non-fundie Christians, I see nothing wrong with underscoring the efforts of the whackos. They are a powerful political force and people need to know what they're up to. Doing this much doesn't necessarily smear all Christians, especially so if you don't count yourself among the kooks.
Though I'm an atheist who supports unfettered access to abortion, I completely understand why Christians oppose abortion so intensely. If they believe that a cluster of cells is a child, then it's their duty to try to stop abortion. From their perspective they are trying to stop the slaughter of millions of children. It is NOT a victimless crime from their point of view. I just wish they showed the same dedication to helping homeless, starving, and/or AIDS-stricken children around the world.
Reading... reading... reading... Ah ha, the Jack Thompson quote!
I think our current definition of life cessation is an accurate one.  I would definitely be opposed to the addition of "potential" to the definition, since there is ALWAYS potential for brain death.  The new definition would make us all zombies.  :-)
Oh, I know.  I was kind of just thinking out loud.  It's to bad Cedega went down the pay to subscribe route. Ubuntu is really slick and I use it on my laptop, but my desktop is still running XP because, ironically, I'd have to pay to play games in Linux.
&gt;There is not such thing as a "victimless" crime. Not to be picky but there are plenty of victimless crimes. A couple of examples (at least in my country):  1) Using any drug except Alcohol.   2) Drawing a picture that could be classified as child pornography.   
Look at the graph - it's not consistent. Yes, average might be 12.03%. But tell that to people who bought S&amp;P 5 years ago. They still didn't make ANYTHING out of it. http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=%5EGSPC&amp;t=5y&amp;l=on&amp;z=m&amp;q=l&amp;c= 
Or the spoken alternative: Q: What's the worst thing about having sex with twenty five year olds? A: Nothing!  I mean, there's twenty of them!
I really don't blame him for being homesick for Malibu! If I was in a foriegn country away from that beautiful place I would be homesick too!!!!
Its the little churches and the "nobodies" that you never hear about that are truly out there making a difference. A lot of those megachurches are just happy to have their seats filled and their coffers full. I was privileged to work for a short time at a small church in south Dallas. The had probably about 200 members and the church building was pretty much one-room. They also had no ties to any major Christian conventions, yet despite all this they worked extremely hard helping the homeless, the poor, and the addicted with all kinds of things. The pastor probably worked 100-hour weeks. I visited the area a few months ago (its been about 2 years since I've worked there). Where as that area was once infested with drugs, prositution, and murder was common (there were 2 shootings within the first week of me being there), you could actually walk down those streets and feel safe. The little piece of land across the street that had once been pretty much a dump had become a park of sorts. That little church is literally a light to that community. You often can't see that in the larger churches. They are too busy building bigger *things*. I'll guarantee you, though, that little church in south Dallas was very much fundamental, but they just decided to truly serve the community instead of themselves.
What is the /deal/ with this site?  Every day I check it, hoping to find some interesting articles, and occasionally I do, but mostly the "hottest" articles are either bashing Bush or trashing out Christianity.   Reddit used to be a cool place to find cool links.  Now it's just become a big bashfest.
Ah, yeah, I did miss that.  Anyway, It's always nice to discuss things without it turning into a shouting match.  hehe
&gt; Individuals also overrate themselves. As a consequence, the average person claims to be 'above average' in skill--a conclusion that, in aggregate, defies statistical possibility. Really? I'd say that it's quite possible that people who claim to be "above average" in a particular skill actually are above average overall, if not in the particular subset of those people who also make use of that skill.
My girlfriend told me this joke on either our first or second date, when we were exchanging tasteless jokes.  She won **big time** Q: How do you make a five year old cry twice? A: Wipe your bloody dick on his favorite teddy bear. My reaction was simultaneous serious laughter and cringing.  We're still together two years later.
who wouldn't want angelina jolie!!??? I mean don't get me wrong, i am a female, but dang, that woman is hot!!! (also, i'm not a lesbian.) Girls have the right to rate other girls don't they??
Two guys are walking down the street when they see a dog licking his balls.  The first guy says, "Man, I wish &lt;i&gt;I&lt;/i&gt; could do that. The second guy says, "Pet him, maybe he'll let you."
Aye, and there's where the debate usually ends.  Some people personify a pre-life structure, and some don't.  I hesitated in using the abortion example, cause it tends to sidetrack the flow of the conversation.  heh
As far as I can see the US is rapidly descending into medieval modes of thought where half-baked religious ideas are believed to trump objectivity, reason and common experience.  
I heard this in a comedy routine once, these exact things, but I can't remember who said it.
why is this administration still in power? looks like we need more ballsy mexicans to stage a revolt for lazy fat-arse americans - looks like we've forgotten how to stand up for ourselves!
I don't think you're looking at the big picture.  They don't have to cut ANY of these energy programs.  They can cut other non-energy related programs instead.  For example, they could cut $16 million out of the defense budget to save the ITP.
To everyone voting this guy down: It's a fucking joke.
This reminds me of a demonstration one of my teachers did back in grade school. She had a copper plate on a pedastal and a cello bow. She sprinkled salt on the plate and pulled the bow across the edge of the plate. The result was that the copper plate produced an audible tone, and the salt formed patterns similar to the ones in this video. (If I remember correctly, she was able to produce 2 or 3 different patterns. She also pretty well destroyed the horsehair on the bow.)
Shouldn't this post be at [Programming.Reddit.com](http://programming.reddit.com/)??
Finally, a game even more offensive than GTA.
i'm well aware of what PITI stands for.  the point was that the cost of a house, with those factors (and maintenance) included, is what must be balanced against the expected value of the invested cash difference. the reason i picked a 4% savings account was to give an example of something with a minimal rate of return.  again, that was sort of the point. finally, yes, i have a very good idea how fast housing prices increase.  i have a particularly good idea of how fast housing prices increase in a bubble, and the dangers of extrapolating an expected long-term rate of return from anomalous short-term gains.  housing has, historically, done well, but over the past 10 years or so, it's been insane.  a significant correction in housing seems, at this point, overdue, and if it happens, that's going to reset a lot of housing increases.
As if porn scandals were not enough
I thought it would be appropriate to use a waveform as a metaphor for your pursuit of musical goals--such as absolute pitch--or pursuit of anything for that matter.
When you see that huge square AdSense block right at the top of an article, you know it's going to be some regurgitated bullshit that's Made For AdSense.   The entire content of this article is "Don't click your own ads."  The title of this article should be "A Case Study in turning one sentence into a Made For AdSense blog post."
Hey you bunch of numb nuts do you realize that the USA team made it to the final 8 in WorldCup 2002!! They would have made it furthure if the blind ref had called the hand-ball in their final match against Germany!! Oh I'll tell you why me fellow country-men don't care.  It's bacause we didn't creat and master the sport before exporting it to Japan.
Go look up the possible translations of the Hebrew word "ma-agal".
You're half right. There are two components to the religious portion of the First Amendment: the establishment clause and the free exercise clause. They are completely separate, but they do work in tandem. What's clear from Madison (the author) and Jefferson (the progenitor of the First Amendment) is that "establishment" was intended in the Lockean sense. That is, government entities and officers in their official capacities shall be, to wit, agnostic when it comes to religion. That's something quite a lot beyond merely protecting religion from government. It's a two-sided coin.
two elephants and a drum kit fall of a cliff... badum-dum-tish
Actually you're wrong. The posts are very good every day.
It's replaced by the browse page, which lets you sort by several criteria including top, and over any of several time-periods including all time.
Well, that's truly weird.  If soccer (I come from a country that plays association football, rugby football, and Gaelic football) isn't popular in the States, what is the problem with that? I imagine that one of the reasons the ratings are so low is that the latinos are watching it on satellite to get the superior commentary. GOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAL!!!!!!!!!!!!
The version I know is this: An electron is speeding down the road, and gets pulled over by a cop. The cop asks, "Do you have any idea how fast you were going?" "Yes," the electron replies, "but I haven't the slightest clue where I am!"
If you read the blog, you'll see that the posts are good. One of the best things to do is have excellent adsense placement. I can teach you if you want. 
Somehow I'm sure the MPAA would know either way...
&gt;I personally don't think I'll ever have any political issues with homosexuals getting married (I'm not much of a political person anyway). The only problem I have there is homosexuals adopting kids.  &gt;  &gt;There's just not enough conclusive evidence (considering how recently homosexuality in this nation has been embraced) to show what the psychological effects are on a kid raised by a homosexual couple. Having grown up in an area where homosexual couples raising children is common, I can say from personal experience that there is little inherent difference between children raised by homosexual parents and children raised by a typical family. In fact, there was a higher ratio of problems with children raised by heterosexual parents, but I attribute that to small sample size. What really matters is the place. Living in an area (Cape Cod, MA) where homosexuals face less discrimination than people of minority race, the children never had to face people telling them their parents' lifestyle is **wrong**. Where I live now, in Atlanta, I would not support homosexual couples adopting children until the attitude of the general population towards homosexuality changes (and it is, slowly). All kids endure emotional trauma inflicted by other kids at school, whether for wearing glasses or being shy. But enduring emotional trauma from teachers and other adults? That could leave real scars. In a culture where my girlfriend was once told by a teacher in high school that she was going to hell because she was a methodist (and not a southern baptist), and an ex from a nearby school was told the same, except for being jewish, can you imagine the difficulty? No family exists removed from the culture surrounding it, and the stigmas of each particular culture are what really damage children, assuming a stable and happy home-life.
I'd agree with this... although there's just no substitue for experience. I mean, it's all well and good to ask budding lawyers to bone up on basic procedure and the like, but the're going to find out soon enough that most procedure is highly provincial, anyway. Local rules are where it's at.  My own advice would be this to new lawyers: don't make promises to your clients that you can't keep. Baby lawyers interview clients and are so excited about their first cases that they typically promise the world. And they can rarely, if ever, deliver.
I think it's the people: the users of something like reddit are going to be techy early adopter types, which is exactly the demographic where organized religion is weakest. So strictly speaking they're not ignorant cheap shots, but highly educated cheap shots.
Holy crap that is sweet. It would be cool to put some Linux distro and Firefox on it. &gt; runs an "up to 500MHz" AMD RISC processor, which the company says is equivalent to a 1.2GHz x86. It can come with up to 64MB of flash memory and 128MB RAM. Its really not that weak. You could attach an external hard drive to it and it seems you could still run office apps and such.
What right does this skankbag have playing reggae music.  That is the music of the poor, oppressed, and downtrodden.  It is the music of revolution and rebirth and spirituality.  paris has shown none of those qualities.  That goes for her little dog too. Of course, what passes for reggae these days is far from the roots rock I learned to play. JAH!
Not true. Taxpayers are the victims.
http://www.ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=177646
Yes, The Pirate Bay convinced ten or fifteen other organisations (some of them for-profit) to simultaneously shut down their operations, losing a lot of money for some of them, just to announce a re-design. I'm sure it's a hoax.
&gt;The days of sitting in your underwear, scratching your nuts, with a pizza, and a 6-pack, playing Metal Gear Solid all night, are over. Ha!
For some reason I am seeing a strong analogy here between little-&gt;mega churches and startups-&gt;big business. I wonder how well other concepts between the two would transfer?
A tip for finding internships (from experience): Intern somewhere that would rely on volunteer labor anyway, and they'll value you as more than a coffee-maker.
It's unconstitutional to give tax dollars to organizations when they discriminate, based on religion for example. The purpose of faith-based initiatives is to allow organizations receiving public funding to discriminate for "religious reasons," which could include all sorts of discrimination. Vouchers are unconstitutional when they go to schools that discriminate based on traits that should be irrelevant to education. (Gender discrimination is allowed b/c academic achievement in certain subjects is said to improve when the genders are separated.) My problem with public funding of religious activities is that the religious activities could be carried out in secular ways, to prevent discrimination and indoctrination.  If religious beliefs are a private matter, then they should not require government resources. People just want to use gov't resources in order to spread their own religion, gain more religious-political authority, and freeload off the public.  The Framers created a loophole for funding of religion b/c some of them, as well as those they sought to ratify the Constitution, wanted to spread their own religion. Only later in his life, did Madison realize that separation of church &amp; state would be best for preventing corruption in both spheres (see his "Detached Memoranda" http://candst.tripod.com/detach.htm ).
Last I knew you could compile Cedega from a free cvs checkout. I would assume that google can find you instructions for that. Given enough time and persistence you could narrow the whole thing down to "run this script", provided someone else has not already done it.
&lt;Edit - added some manners; I don't intend to be (and don't want to seem) disrespectful, even when I'm employing irony.&gt; &gt;The only problem I have there is homosexuals adopting kids. &gt;There's just not enough conclusive evidence (considering how recently homosexuality in this nation has been embraced) to show what the psychological effects are on a kid raised by a homosexual couple. The effects on a child of being raised by *any* loving couple - or more, come to think of it - are more positive than being raised by *any* neglectful parents. Even if there is some negative effect from having parents of the same gender (which I don't believe, but feel free to do so), that would only be true *if all other factors were equal*. There are many other factors that have much stronger negative effects: dysfunctionality, poverty, ignorance.  When you've eradicated those, *then* let's look at the effect of same-sex parents. &gt;As I've stated before on this site, in cases of rape, incest, or the possible death of the mother, I feel that the boundaries are stretched a bit more. Ooo, 'a bit more'.  How generous of you. &gt;I don't think a society full of pot heads and coke addicts benefits anyone, though. ...because of course we *all* know that as soon as pot and coke were legal, absolutely *everyone* would just *rush* to get theirs first.  If you don't mean 'full of', please say what you mean. Whether drugs are illegal or not, there will be people who use them (you'll note that the more the US, or any nation, spends to fight drug use, the more it stays about the same).  Sadly, there will also be people who misuse them, legal or not.  Many people do not drink and drive; some do, which is not a good enough reason to prohibit alcohol. Nor is it a good enough reason to ban other drugs. &gt;The kid that has emotional issues because they were raised by two men is a victim. The only reason any child raised by two men is liable to have emotional issues is because of the way society will treat that child, due to something that is no fault of its own.  It may well be true that the child is a victim, but he or she is a victim of an intolerant society, not of the two men (unless, of course, they are otherwise abusive). &gt;The kid neglected because its father is a coke addict is a victim. Yes, but the coke (or alcohol, or gambling) addiction isn't the crime with a victim; the neglect is.  Just like drinking isn't a crime, but turning someone into a quadraplegic by driving into them while drunk, is! &gt;But "live and let live" can never work because what some people are hurt by is what others consider a normal life. This statement may well embody everything that I find most repulsive about religion. No, I retract that, because it isn't just people who follow a religion who think this way.  It's what's repulsive about black-and-white thinking.  Somehow, just because *some* people hurt others as a side effect of victimless activities (for most), therefore *all* people who engage in those activities are bad. Nice work. &gt;even the best things in life cause problems sometimes. So what is truly good and what is truly bad?  &gt;That's one of the reasons that I think without an absolute truth, an absolute right/wrong, and a God, you run into all kinds of difficulties. How very interesting.  From the very same initial statement, I come to the *exact opposite conclusion*: there *is* no absolute truth, no absolute right/wrong. Even *with* a religion, there's little agreement on these issues (and please don't try to convince me that every Christian, or even any two Christians - or Moslems or Jews or Hindus - agree exactly on what's right or wrong *even though it's all written down*). &gt;I can't think of anything bad that could possibly happen to the person who truly followed all of Christ's commands. Wow.  Do you really believe that anyone who 'truly followed all of Christ's commands' would never: be mugged, be raped,  have their house broken into, get a chronic wasting disease, lose their home to a natural disaster, lose their *family* to a natural disaster...  Or is just that if you 'truly followed all of Christ's commands' none of those things would really be all that bad?
Digg called, they want their link back. 
I'm not exactly *happy* that she got stabbed to death. I am, however glad that it's one of the robbers who got killed instead of the victim. Considering the other potential outcomes of the situation, I don't think it turned out too bad.
I love understatement in the media coverage of this: &gt; West Bromwich Albion keeper Tomasz Kuszczak's hopes of   &gt; earning a FIFA World Cup starting place nosedived when he   &gt; allowed Martinez's long punt to bounce over his head into   &gt; the net in the 63rd minute.   
No, that's scientology.
He actually looks normal. I am surprised.
Thank-you Bill Frist for killing the measure. Everyone repeat after me "THANK-YOU" (NOT)
It was probably Paul Graham.
I've installed Ubuntu 6.06 as solo OS on my brand new PC. Within 4 weeks, twice the boot loader got stuck on kernel panic while booting after some update was installed and had to reinstall everything. I spent so many hours configuring everything possible but then got fed up of this instability (last installation was 1 week ago, so a pretty stable beta if they released now). Moral: yes Ubuntu is the coolest distro around, but now I've got Windows XP and I don't encounter any problems at all. Everything works great, connection is fast (yes I disabled ipv6 on linux for firefox), boot time 20 seconds or less, free antivirus, free firewall, cygwin for the tools, vim, gimp, oo, thunderbird, firefox, audacity, games, etc... If you know what you are doing, XP is a very nice piece of software that gives you way less troubles than Ubuntu gave me (and I know how to configure a system). I may consider Ubuntu in dual boot, but I'm scared that at the next update it will just crash the system.
As a Christian who grew up with the rapture meta-narrative (and who now questions that view of eschatology), I think I can make a few points:  1) American Evangelicalism isn't monolithic: while it's true that the basic rapture meta-narrative (see the "Left Behind" books for details) permeates most of the American Church, there are subtle differences in different branches.  For example, Moyers hints that there is some anti-Semitism involved.  However, there are Christian groups that could be considered very much pro-Semetic.  They might be in the rapture camp, but they also believe that all of Israel will make it through the 'tribulation' (though, admitedly, it's a bit tougher for them than it is for the Christians even in this view).  Back to the point: It's easy in American Evangelicalism to splinter off into a new group.  The split is often over some subtle difference in interpretting the book of Revelation.  2) Some Christian groups (lets call them "Post Evangelicals" - I consider myself one) are rejecting this interpretation of the book of Revelation.  The current Evangelical meta-narrative (the one that Moyers is referring too) just seems a bit too convenient: The 'true' Christians get rescued (raptured) from the earth just before all the bad stuff goes down.  It just seems a bit too _convenient_.  Also, the "right-wingers" (for lack of a better term) seem to be reading Revelation very selectively, such as ignoring the place in Chapter 12 (or is it 11?) where it says "_the time has come to destroy those who destroy the earth_".  3) (and Moyers makes the point very well) The rapture meta-narrative has led large groups of Christians to disregard the future.  "No need to care for the environment because it's all gonna burn!" is often the attitude; sort of a religiously sanctioned scorched earth policy ;-) There are other interpretations of Christian eschatology emerging.  Or maybe it would be better to say, that some Christians are investigating earlier interpretations that were prevelant before the current meta-narrative took hold in the late 1800s.  It's interesting to note that prior to that the current "Left Behind" view was considered heretical.
&gt;All of this is admirable, but it comes from a president who consistently demonstrates a disdain for areas of science that disagree with his personal ideology. Again and again, whether it is stem cells or energy policy or global warming or the dubious need to "teach the controversy," Bush has demonstrated that he is, literally, anti-rational—opposed to the assumptions about proof and inquiry without which science would be merely alchemy. &gt;It would be absurd to blame a politician for a nationwide decline in scientific interest, but it stands to reason that a president elected, and then re-elected, must in some way embody the beliefs of the electorate—here, specifically, its prioritization of science.
Americans giving to charity is not based on religion. It's ingrained in all of us, by our culture, that it is the civic duty of every American to help those less fortunate than themselves. It doesn't matter whether I'm christian, muslim, jewish or athiest. I'd still feel that pull to give to charity. In three years as a typical poor college student (poor in the waiting for parents to send money and needing financial aid sense) in Atlanta, I've probably given about $500 in handouts to homeless people on the street, plus donations for disasters, etc. I've only been inside a church a handful of times in my life, and yet I feel intense guilt when I don't give, even if I don't have the money or am just too busy to have a homeless person help me move furniture in return for a meal. And I'm not alone here. I've known only a handful of people in my life that aren't the same way (though the more jaded don't give many handouts to homeless people since many aren't actually homeless...I at least try to discern how homeless they really are myself).
Demoted for impersonating another user. I also disagree: it's not funny - I don't think she *deserved* to die. I would not execute people for robbery if I ruled the world. [This](http://www.darwinawards.com/darwin/darwin1993-06.html) is funny though.
The point of morality is to minimize suffering and maximize well-being.  The theists think that theism would accomplish that.  Nothing could be further from the truth.  When people do not understand the reality of issues, as based on evidence, and rely on superstitions to solve problems, they fail to properly address the problems.  In countries with more religious fundamentalism, there are higher rates of societal problems, like murder, rape, abortion, etc. (http://moses.creighton.edu/jrs/2005/2005-11.html).  In US states w/ more religious fundamentalism, there are also higher rates of societal problems, as well as lower performing public schools.  Now, unless you think people should endure more suffering in this life, there's no reason to "hesitate before placing moral restrictions on others" when their policies would clearly increase suffering or would be ineffective at reducing suffering.
* The National Post report was based upon a more thorough article, A colour code for Iran's "infidels", by one Amir Taheri, an Iranian expatriate and former editor of one of Iran's major newspapers, **a man with extensive neoconservative ties**.  * Most experts put Iran 5 to 10 years away from nuclear weapons.  * the widely-reported statement that Ahmadinejad supposedly made, "Israel must be wiped off the map" was, in fact, a mistranslation. ... A more accurate translation is "The occupation regime over Jerusalem should vanish from the page of time", a more passive statement.  * It's also worth noting that the Iranian president does not control the Iranian military, the Supreme Leader Ayatollah Khameini does, and the Iranian government has itself denied wanting to attack Israel.  * Documents have emerged that show in 2003, **Iran secretly offered peace with Israel** to the US, but **was rebuffed**.  * In general there is a tendency to equate Islamic opposition to Israel with the horrific tradition of European anti-Semitism, at the same time there is little recognition in the West of growing Israeli hatred towards Arabs.  * Exploiting the memory of the Holocaust to trigger a war is, as Antonia Zerbisias puts it, "about as low as a newspaper can go". --------------------------------- http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Persian_Jews The neuterality dispute is about the *term* "Persian Jews", not about the rest of the article. Guess what?  Iran will get neither get a medal for being a bastion of religious freedom, nor are they eradicating or forcably assimilating their sizable Jewish population.
Thank you!  Some of us are rightfully scared of it also.
YES...and no.  Completely separate bank accounts is just asking for trouble.  But sharing a bank account can also lead to unnecessary conflict and unspoken resentment.  The important thing is to be open, honest, and *upfront* about spending with your spouse, no matter whose name the account is in. /my 2 cents
&gt;It takes almost no effort to not be an ass Why 'almost'?  :)
I try this move *ALL THE TIME* in Winning Eleven soccer for PS2, and I have to say, it never works.  Once I got it in with my defenseman though, so I keep trying. Funny how I always get annihilated though...Winning Eleven sucks.
The "religious right"--which is synonymous with Ralph Reed, the Coalition, and those types--is not exactly fair or level-headed, my friend.  I see no problem with someone expressing an emotional rebuttal, because that group has gone way overboard and, honestly, deserves it. If he'd said "you religious morons," it might be a problem.
&gt; The effects on a child of being raised by any loving couple - or more, come to think of it - are more positive than being raised by any neglectful parents.  Even if there is some negative effect from having parents of the same gender (which I don't believe, but feel free to do so), that would only be true if all other factors were equal. &gt; There are many other factors that have much stronger negative effects: dysfunctionality, poverty, ignorance. When you've eradicated those, then let's look at the effect of same-sex parents. &gt; Ooo, 'a bit more'. How generous of you. I didn't expound on it because I've stated it before on this site and I didn't want to bore anyone. Basically in situations of rape/incest/life and death, I feel like the mother does have a right to abort the baby. That's not a situation that they put herself in (directly). Interestingly enough, you critiqued me for "black and white thinking" later on this post, but if I truly was looking at it that way, I'd say no abortions period. &gt; ...because of course we all know that as soon as pot and coke were legal, absolutely everyone would just rush to get theirs first. If you don't mean 'full of', say what you mean. "Full of" is just a manner of speech. It can also mean "many". I don't see what the point in critiqueing a few words here and there is; isn't it a distraction from the main point? If pot was legal we'd obviously have many more potheads than we do today. If they were anywhere near the level of tobacco smokers, we might have some problems considering that marijuana has a much greater immediate effect on people. &gt; Whether drugs are illegal or not, there will be people who use them. Sadly, there will also be people who misuse them, legal or not. Many people do not drink and drive; some do, which is not a good enough reason to prohibit alcohol. Nor is it a good enough reason to ban other drugs. It depends on what "other drugs" consists of. Cocaine for example has a much greater effect than alchohol. Just because some people wouldn't abuse it doesn't mean that in general its not a dangerous drug. I see no real reason something like that should be legal. &gt; The only reason any child raised by two men is liable to have emotional issues is because of the way society will treat that child, due to something that is no fault of its own. It may well be true that the child is a victim, but he or she is a victim of an intolerant society, not of the two men (unless, of course, they are otherwise abusive). Its not just an intolerant society, its all of history; I cannot think of any situation where same-sex couples have raised children. Its not a stretch to see the child thinking..."why does everyone else have a mommy and a daddy and I have a daddy and a daddy?" On top of that, males and females have completely different ways of thinking and acting. The influence two males will have on a child is completely different than the influence a male and a female will have. In a way creating individuals that are "less-balanced". &gt; Yes, but the coke (or alcohol, or gambling) addiction isn't the crime with a victim; the neglect is. Just like drinking isn't a crime, but turning someone into a quadraplegic by driving into them while drunk, is! The coke would be the direct cause of the neglect. &gt; This statement may well embody everything that I find most repulsive about religion. &gt; No, I retract that, because it isn't just people who follow a religion who think this way. It's what's repulsive about black-and-white thinking. Well if I have "black-and-white" thinking, then you are just as guilty of it. You have an opinion and I do, too, I really don't think either of us are close-minded, though.  I mean, you have already made up your mind about homosexual adoption just as I have. In that respect we perhaps are close-minded. But I think more than anything they are just differing opinions. &gt; Somehow, just because some people hurt others as a side effect of victimless activities (for most), therefore all people who engage in those activities are bad. Nice work. Never said that nor implied it; you put those words in my mouth. I don't think homosexuals are bad. I don't think women who get abortions are bad. Same goes for people who do drugs. I just believe that the activities themselves are questionable and in my mind it is in the best interest of those people not to practice said activities. &gt; Wow. Do you really believe that anyone who 'truly followed all of Christ's commands' would never: be mugged, be raped, have their house broken into, get a chronic wasting disease, lose their home to a natural disaster, lose their family to a natural disaster... Or is just that if you 'truly followed all of Christ's commands' none of those things would really be all that bad? Well, the first conclusion obviously couldn't be true because there have been a heck of a lot of Christians throughout history who have faced unpleasant times or endings.  I believe if people truly followed Christ's commands that even these unpleasant situations wouldn't be that bad. 
Me either.  Maybe this guy is sharing a little too much with his friends to begin with? I agree that spending stupidly is, well, stupid--but I also think it's stupid to not be able to express your own preferences and limitations independent of your friends.  Wasn't there a crappy movie with Jennifer Aniston about this recently?
How about "Fundamentalist Christians control the federal government"?
I paid good money for them ghod-damn Hi-Tech weapons and by-ghod I want to see explosions n' stuff...
This site really has a full account on Hillary..Know who hate her and love her..Everything said and whoever said it..The stuff's here are enough to know about her..
Ah, I see, people are religious, and that's terrible. U.S. is such a terrible country.   The teenager atheist arrogance is so stupid it's hilarious. "Look, we, the atheists, support freedom, but those pesky religious people won't let us do anything!".
Tens of millions of users time being wasted, systems destroyed, data lost: it means absolutely nothing to Microsoft.   But wasting the time of ONE friend of Ballmer's?  Restructure the company!  Something must be done about this utter travesty!
I dunno, with me the article did exactly the opposite of it intended. It could be summed up with "Yes, it has bad points, but you'll get over them, just look at the cute baby and hope for the best", which sounds to me like trying to convince yourself more than others, not a good perspective 
Yeah, that's why I'm removing Reddit from my favourites list. Reddit turned into a place for revolted brainless teenagers to express all of their arrogance.
[Standing waves.](http://www.glenbrook.k12.il.us/GBSSCI/PHYS/CLASS/sound/u11l4c.html)
I'm sorry...I didn't realize that links to public web pages have become private property.
How do someone who smokes marijuana make the taxpayer a victim? Healthcare cost?
You aren't giving and extra $1 to the government, the bank or anyone else.  The difference is that the house is cheaper in scenario #2.  The initial mortgage is 88k less, but the higher interest rate makes the payments equal.  If held for 30 years, you will have paid the same exact amount, and have paid 88k more in interest.  88k more to principal in scenario #1, but that's because there was 88k more to be paid. That additional 88k is mostly deductible, giving you ~29k actual tax savings assuming 33% tax rates. If this is wrong, show me where the extra money went.
Richard Spencer, the UK's Daily Telegraph China Correspondent, talks about his experiences with the Shanghai Foreign Affairs Office (WaiBan).
Good point... sorry for the way I expressed it. Russ
*War on drugs* Even if the war on drugs is stupid, it's still wouldn't be wasting our tax-dollars if no one did drugs. Of course, they'd probably find something else to wage war on in its place, like freedom of speech...oh, wait...
I'm skeptical about running it entirely off Ethernet power. Might be okay for the first one or two, but what about when you plug a big hub into your poor little four-port Linksys? I don't know all that much about Ethernet technology, but running 20+ of these devices on the same network seems to me like it would draw much more current than a typical router is used to providing. (EDIT: Having looked at [their marketing materials](http://www.chippc.com/resources/JackPC_Booklet.pdf), it seems that you do need to use special networking equipment that provides [power over ethernet](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Power_over_Ethernet)) But yeah, 64 MB of flash is enough to install some kind of virtual desktop system to run apps and data off a central server. Sounds sweet, if you ask me.
You mean except the several thousand dollars I've been able to invest that I couldn't have afforded if I'd bought?
I bought S+P 5 years ago, and I've made money. Dollar cost averaging... which is what you would be doing most likely with that money you save from paying rent instead of paying a mortgage. If you invested that money every month over those 5 years, you'd be in good shape. And you initially put in that amount that would have been a downpayment your account would be large enough that you don't have to pay any fees.
Besides, it's not *that* hard - look at what Cindy Sheehan managed to do!  She identifies as Christian, doesn't she?
Are these the Dem's choices: Gore or Clinton? Is that really the best they do? Jeez.
Wouldn't it be easier to tattoo a unique number on their arms --Oh, any resemblance of Germany ?
These guys generally don't like what they are doing any more than you like them doing it.  Go easy on them.  #1 seems a bit too mean.
its lame to pick the best fund over a picked range.  the same technique will show 100000000000000% annualized returns for last week's lottery winner.  Out of 10000 people who are in a casino over one night, if the casino uses one person's results, it would delude all of us into thinking working instead of gambling is absurd. To disprove buy and hold strategies, investment in the 13 dow companies 130 years ago, might just barely have broken even by today. (most went bankrupt -- only GE remains in dj).  The other problem with basing stock market returns on the best US performing indexes, is that your observations are essentially like looking at the apex of the roman empire, projecting ever-increasing greatness.  Russia's stock market went to 0 in 1917.  Japan is still down 50%-60% from 1989. If you're cherry picking, you can make cases against stocks just as easily.
Will the dumb terminal =&gt; smart terminal cycle ever end?
The original song is by Spike Jones and his City Slickers. Available on Rhino!
I'm working with the person to help moderate the website. It's only beta right now but it'll improve over time. If you wanna improve it, sign-up. Tell them that I sent you.
Learn how you can become a phenomenal speaker in the shortest amount of time! In this final part, you will learn the importance of having lots and lots of fun in whatever you do. At the end of the entry, the writer shares with you one tangible way of starting to have fun in public speaking or anything for that matter!
&gt;there is ALWAYS potential for brain death I think you misread that.  I want a definition about the potential for brain activity, or brain life.   Fortunately, that's beside the point. &gt;I think our current definition of life cessation is an accurate one. How do you know?  Why do you think that?  If I disagree with you, how do we resolve the conflict?
I'm joking. What I mean is, this link is a "digg" type of link, not a "reddit" kind of link. Of course, it's not up to me to decide that, people voted for it, it's funny, yadda yadda.  But all that can't stop me from being snarky, right? 
As long as there are non DRM'ed technologies out there, your freedom will not be restricted at all. By saying the mere presence of DRM technologies is equivalent to a threat to Freedom (in general), that's a slippery slope by insinuating that DRM is a larger threat than it actually is.
I've [heard](http://www.google.co.in/search?q=automatix+easy-ubuntu+dangerous+OR+unsafe+OR+unsecure) that Automatix is somewhat dangerous and less secure than EasyUbuntu. I don't have an authoritative source, though, and it may have been fixed by now. So I suggest doing your own research before using one or the other.
That sounds more like Campos from Mexico.   On a side note, I've played goalie and this exact type of goal happened against me.  I sucked :-)
*Do* we express our own preferences and limitations independently of our friends? Okay, I and most of my friends don't really buy stuff to imitate each other.  But I suspect this is because I was enough of a loser in grade school that it didn't matter *what* I bought, I'd still be a reject.  So I learned to define my identity outside of my possessions, and then later found friends that did the same. But isn't the holy grail of advertising to create a product that's so *cool* that you can't afford to be without it, socially?  A lot of times, people buy things not because they need them, but because their neighbor has one.  Brand-name shoes, expensive sweaters, fancy cars, diamond engagement rings - their value comes in a large part from their use as social currency.  Your friends respect them, so you buy them. Come to think of it, isn't that why we submit links to Reddit?  Social currency.  It's just that here the links are free.  But we still don't really express our preferences and limitations independently of our friends: we want that karma, so we submit stories we think other people will like.
What I was trying to point out was that yeah, its great that you had good timing and made out on the recent price increases, but can we really expect that to go on forever?  What if what some have predicted comes true, that there will be corrections in the market and home prices decrease?  Then I'm worse of than if I wait a few years and save/invest.
Me neither, but the variable rate loans were *way* discounted for a while, because clearly none of the banks thought interest rates would stay so low for very long. So I can see how someone would be tempted to gamble. I wonder if banks have ever offered fixed interest rate loans at a lower interest rate than their variable interest rate loans. When they think that interest rates are at a peak.
Kind of like lame
You know, you're right. The 11th commandment is:  "As your God, I shall never allow those translating my Word to use some poetic expression, just in case some tool on Reddit takes it too literally."
Good comment. The main point I took away from the blog was that buying is not always the best option, which is what most people tell me.
As a Christian who tries to follow the example of Christ, this  article really speaks to me.  It's sad, but I am often scared of telling people that I'm a Christian because I don't want them to associate me with the hate groups that have gotten so much media attention recently.  I always feel the urge to say "I'm a ChristianButWaitIActuallyTryToLoveMyNeighborAndNotBeJudgemental." 
Well, whoever wrote this article. And the people who've actually contributed something to this discussion which includes... uh, oh... you!
I'm guessing this person hasn't met many Christians in real life.
The fact that he is in a dispute with someone else over not mailing an Ipod that the sold her strongly indicates that Amir is in fact a crook.
They are the only two with easy access to deep pockets. We have a bunch of politicians that might make excellent presidents, but they aren't... you know... sponsored. The Republicans gutted K street for a reason. It worked.
How did you make money if it didn't go up (or down) in price?
&gt; Take a look at the comments to most recent stories on religion, politics, or science. I have. Mainly what I see is what I see everywhere else -- some people attacking Christianity in general, a larger number of people attacking ignorant extremist Christianity, a large number of people defending Christianity in general, and a small number of people defending ignorant extremist Christianity. So far I have not noticed any particular bias for or against Christianity. I think that Reddit's anti-Christian bias is about as real as Bill O'Reilly's "war on Christmas" -- which is to say, not at all. It's just easy to make it seem real because all you have to do is cherry-pick the comments and posts that support your claim. &gt; Also, take a look at api's post on this page ("Get this through your thick skulls you religious right morons"). By what reasoning do you claim that the Religious Right is synonymous with Christianity? &gt; If this topic doesn't get modded down right away, I'm sure there will be plenty of other examples on this page. Exactly my point. If this doesn't provide evidence for the claim, we'll ignore it and focus on the things that do.
The most embarrassing thing about Senator Clinton is that she just spent a ton of her political capital alienating young people. She campaigned heavily against one of our favorite pasttimes. How did Bill let her do that?
not if f(x)=e^x
I said *I* can.  First person.  I'm trained in using my hands.  I'm not trained in using a knife.  My opponent is probably not trained likewise, so if he gets hold of my knife, that's going to make him more dangerous.
This is an article I like, as it manages to give Christianity a fair 'trial' while still condemning the hypocrisy that fundamentalist Christians partake in (and I believe that to be a 'fundamentalist Christian', you have to be a hypocrite (circular logic, I know)). However, I do disagree (to an extent) with the viewpoint towards homosexuality it expresses. With the NT, Paul says that homosexuality is wrong. As he was living in Greece or Italy at the time, he would've been surrounded by a culture in which homosexuality was more openly practiced (even by married men) than ours. As such, I believe that homosexuality is a sin. However, in the same breath (figuratively speaking), Paul condemns extra- and pre-marital sex. I also believe these are sins but every one of my friends has partaken of these sins and I have, so far, managed to avoid stoning them (and even manage to /talk/ to them every so often!). The reason I have stayed my hand is that, according to the NT, all sins are equal. That means that me looking at pornography (which, of course, I never do...) is exactly as damning as my friends having sex outside of marriage which is, in turn, exactly as damning as killing someone. They all remove me from God's presence to an equal amount, once I die. This is why the NT also preaches that we're not meant to judge (which is, obviously, the only reason that I don't wear one of those nifty "I Hate Fags" T-shirts). Another epithet that I think applies is: Don't hate the sinner, hate the sin.
In what way is he focusing on hate speech? Pray tell.
There are some good ideas in there.
Sorry to be thick, but I don't quite grasp what you mean...
&gt; For the first time in our history, ideology and theology hold a monopoly of power in Washington. Theology asserts propositions that cannot be proven true; ideologues hold stoutly to a worldview despite being contradicted by what is generally accepted as reality. If not for the date on the article, I would assume he was talking about LBJ and the "Great Society".
For newbie bloggers, some tips that will make readers happy.
Though learning OCaml first will probably be easier on someone only familiar with imperative programming. Going directly from C/C++/Java to Haskell with polymorphic types, first-class functions, lazy evaluation and worst of all, monads, is like being thrown into the deep end of the pool, don't you think? Better to get your feet wet with the less mind-bending half of functional programming, IMHO.
Correct the spelling in the title: "Speech"
Well, if this is on the level I can't say I'd be surprised - (dons tin foil hat) I remember thinking at the time that it was just a little too good to be true. Two passenger planes hit the WTC, symbol of western (and specifically US) economic power.  A passenger plane hits the Pentagon, symbol of US military might.  Ground control loses contact with a fourth passenger plane, then discover it's changed course and appears to be heading directly for the Whitehouse, symbol of US political power.  Fighter jets are scrambled. (UK) News coverage goes totally silent on *the only plane still in the air* for an hour or two, then report it's "mysteriously crashed" in Pennsylvania.  Later, it's announced that there was a heroic revolt by the passengers, causing the crash. So... three planes hit their intended targets, one more is pretty obviously on its way, fighter jets are reported to have been scrambled, coverage goes silent on it for a couple of hours, and then we discover it's crashed because brave, selfless passengers somehow realise what their hijackers were up to, heroically decide to fight back and either accidentally or deliberately down the plane to prevent the terrorists achieving their nefarious ends. It's all just a little bit too pat and feelgood, especially given there was *no fucking way* the US administration was going to let that plane get within ten miles of the Whitehouse, no matter what it took. Even at the time it sounded too much like exactly the story everyone wanted to hear - the heroism of ordinary americans standing up to "the terrorists", and salvaging a small but significant victory from a day of otherwise complete loss. *Obviously* in this situation the sensible thing (in the sense of minimising the number of deaths) to do was to shoot down the plane - the hostages were effectively already dead. But that doesn't mean they'd ever (intentionally) admit to it.
Q: What happened when Helen Keller fell off a cliff? A: She screamed her hands off. --- Q: How did Helen Keller go insane? A: She tried reading a stucco wall. --- Q: How did Helen Keller's parents punish her for swearing? A: The washed her hands out with soap.   
Whats up with the working for free? The medium size engineering firm I work at has an active internship program and we pay about $10/hour. Don't most tech companies pay their interns?
Out of curiosity, does God/Jesus agree with the words of Paul, is this categorically stated?  Does he use the words wrong, as in I don't agree with it, or does he expressly say that it is a sin?  Could it be a translation problem, much like the debate about the virgin birth http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Virgin_birth#Dispute_regarding_Isaiah_7:14 ?
At the first time, you were using alpha, then later beta version of Dapper. With Windows, you don't even get to see the alpha, ever, because it wouldn't be pretty at all. A beta of Vista currently [requires](http://programming.reddit.com/goto?id=6xtr) 7 mouse clicks to remove a shortcut from your desktop, a security model gone haywire in my opinion. Linux proliferation is growing and still there are not any any comparable exploits -- the population of Linux systems around the world is much more diverse and as a result healthier, than that of Windows (because deep customization is possible with Linux, that businesses frequently require). There are things where Windows looks better polished, mostly for end user, not anywhere beyond that level to my knowledge (file sharing, printing, OLE&amp;COM+ binding between apps), but the terrible turn around their distribution model (together with proprietary complexity of say their [document format](http://reddit.com/goto?id=6c8b)) requires will slow them down to more and more inferior platform, while Linux distributions [release early and often](http://www.catb.org/~esr/writings/cathedral-bazaar/cathedral-bazaar/ar01s04.html). Windows or MS doesn't have any revenue problem or anything like that, far from it. It's just that it's very easy now to do full time job in many areas of computing without ever needing their products (where one prefers more flexibility of his tools). Of course, this is biased opinion, by someone who has been making his entire living off Linux for 3 years already, perhaps slightly misinformed about current state of Windows, if any different, as I haven't had the need to check it much during the time.  
I expect the Bush factor is a reflection of the underlying mentality rather than the cause.
We have a popular bumper sticker around here - "Who Would Jesus Bomb?"  I think that sums up your concerns pretty well.
I hate to see a serious commenter [made fun of](http://www.twainquotes.com/Ridicule.html), but these jokes are just too good!
Pretty cool! I wonder if it could be tweaked a little bit to make a general purpose screen?
They still sell square TVs in the US?
I belive there were more organisations than fifteen since the police took about 200 servers. And the police have confirmed the raid to newsagencies. No hoax.
If you're trying to turn this particular incident into a partisan issue, recall that the majority of the republican party is coming down on the side of the corrupt Democrat. If you're going to go for the usual "he said, she said" distraction tactic, at least make sure your side's saying the same as you are. In other words: before claiming the moral high ground for your side, first ensure they are actually standing next to you, not knee-deep in the same shit as the other side at the bottom of the hill.
Vote up if you don't read Reddit?
A man walks into a pharmacy and tells the druggist that he needs to buy some birth control for his 11 year old daughter. "11?  And she's sexually active?" "Nah, she just lays there like her mother."
She's not a true Christian. Remember that when Jesus was a Roman general he said to judge others before they have a chance to judge you. On his triumph through Rome he emphatically stated that his kingdom was of this world and that he was here to maintain social order. That's why true Christians support the war. Outcasts and liberals who criticize the state deserve what they get! 
Well, as a once telemarketer I have to tell you that it's a job that just induces a kind of bizarre numbness.  I knew that I was being invasive to people, and that every single person I talked to during the day wanted to get me off the phone. I had people who tried their little gags on me... you get used to them.  It's like, "ha ha sir, sure I'll give you my home phone number so you can call **me** at dinnertime. It made me think a lot about what the most compassionate thing to do with a telemarketer (and oneself) is.  You may not know this, but most telemarketers are supposed to continue on with the pitch until someone says "no" at least 2 or 3 times.   It's not the caller's idea to harass you, they are a wage slave.  Sure, they could fins something else to do, but the telemarketing companies will always find warm bodies desperate enough to work for them... for a little while at least. Ultimately the nicest (and easiest) thing to do to a person who is calling is to just get them off the phone as soon as you possibly can so they don't waste their time, or yours. Just say *immediately*:  What is the company?  Please add me to your "do not call list".  Thank you. Or, just hang up. Either way, both of those things let the telemarketer off the hook.  They don't have to suffer jokes they've heard 50 times, and they don't have to follow up with their silly script.  Maybe it's not as fun but, personally, tormenting people in a pathetic position gets kind of old for me.
The mineral occurs naturally in meteorites, but the supply of meteorites is too small for commercial purposes.  So all moissanite stones sold commercially are grown synthetically in the lab.
a
does it?  It's admittedly fake, that is a falsehood presented as truth.  Or a performance piece, i.e. art, in which case it's no better than a feel good movie.
This Monday was Peacekeepers Day. 124 UN peacekeepers died in a 1-year period, and this page is to honor them.
jennthomas.com
And there are computer programs that defeat captchas more often than that. Shitty excuse for a Turing test, but everyone knew that anyway.
This is a violation of civil rights.
He would probably let you buy the fridge. Just like you'd have to do if you owned.
The basic message of this article is good, but there are some problems.  In particular: "The early church fathers knew that Jesus' rather Buddhist message of nonviolence and voluntary poverty wouldn't fly in the Graeco-Roman world, let alone in the Middle East. The idea of a Redeemer on the other hand--someone who would voluntarily sacrifice Himself for humanity and their sins--was very popular. Instead of having to give up their worldly goods and espouse non-violence, all the Romans had to do was believe in the miraculous stories surrounding Jesus' birth and death, which was easy for them, since such stories had been told about pagan gods and heroes and were already familiar." This isn't true. For all its problems, the Catholic church always preached both good behaviour and faith in the resurrection story as necessary for salvation. It was only with the reformation that the idea of "faith alone" became popular, and only with the hardline evangelical churches that it became the only focus. I'm a lapsed catholic, so I don't really care too much, but I do think that baptists and other evangelicals give catholics and normal protestants a bad name. I think it's important that people who are angry at modern christianity learn the differences. I think the majority of modern catholics and protestants are relatively normal people trying to live according to the good parts of the Bible.
Yup, and I've even given that a try.  Honestly though, I gave up after compiling and trying to figure out how to setup Half Life 2 to work through the emulator.  The configuration was gross. It probably gets easier once you understand it, but how are you going to convince Billy down the street to switch to a desktop that doesn't play his latest L33T games without having to either create configuration files or paying (I think) 5$/month for the Cedega loader. On the other hand, I have Doom 3 &amp; Neverwinter Nights running beautifully in native mode on my Linux partition. I have a pile of Ubuntu CDs on my desk at home and I give them to whoever tells me they're willing to try an alternative operating system.  I'm just sure to warn them that they won't be able to play many games.
All this article does for me is highlight the inconsistencies of the Christian faith. In one verse, Jesus Christ tells his followers to obey every letter of the Old Testament and in another story he renounces violence, hatred, slavery, homophobia and other atrocieties that are the staple of the Old Testament. As an atheist I do think Jesus' teachings are a good moral guideline (though I do suspect Jesus as a person did not really exist).  However, to say that Jesus teachings are consistent with the teachings of the Old Testament is schizophrenic. The two are polar opposites on almost every issue that matters.
yep
"I believe it is Psalm 40:22 which says, "God sits above the circle of the earth." " No. This was literally a circle; the earth was described as a flat surface with other surfaces sitting above it. It's somewhere in Genesis, and it's completely cockamamie. No christian before the renaissance believed the earth was round. Not a single one. At best they believed in the ptolemaic universe.
Equally ignorant is using &lt;em&gt; when &lt;i&gt; or some other element makes more sense -- when you're italicizing text for reasons other than emphasis. For example! Find &lt;var&gt;x&lt;/var&gt;. &lt;em&gt;Here&lt;/em&gt; it is! &lt;i&gt;sigh&lt;/i&gt;
The patterns are called [Chladni figures](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chladni).
"There have been numerous studies that children adopted by gay couples are no more or less likely to be abused than children with heterosexual parents." Like that egg study in South Park, right?
Yup!  They 4x3 format is still around (as should stay around) as "SDTV"  I'm not sure if that means that TV stations will simulcast 16x9 and 4x3 signals or what. You can see a bunch here: http://www.bestbuy.com/site/olspage.jsp?id=cat03002&amp;type=category&amp;_DARGS=/site/en_US/catalog/fragments/product/olslinelistingsortfilter.jsp It's just an example.  I'm not selling TVs for BestBuy.
I think the big problem is, we probably won't know enough for hundreds of years to say which definition of life is right. In fact it may never be resolvable. To me the issue is a complete deadlock because the definition of life is axiomatic, and you can't push people on either side to change that axiom.
blatant rip-off from this [one](http://www.zefrank.com/donotcall/)
http://www.indymedia.ie/article/76288  link to 2003 peace offer.
Why not both at once? :-)
Interesting. The only Spike Jones I know is a single my father has with "Clink clink another drink" and on the other side a weird piece with a chicken freaking out (no idea what it was called).
Kids in primary and secondary education are not thinking about pulling down 6 figures when they graduate from college, they're just trying to get through school. I was a transplant from a foreign country around primary school age, so I got a taste of two country's public schools systems. Back in my old country, intellectual excellence is lauded at all levels of society and by your peers in school.  In America, anyone showing any such inclinations is continuously bullied and made fun of by physically stronger but usually mentally weaker kids. The primary and secondary education in America actually dumbed me down compared to my friends who stayed in the old country.  We compared notes in college, when they came over here and beat the crap (intellectually speaking) out of the natives. America does not value intellectual achievement as much as sports achievement.
vote this up for the discussion!
http://bayloraids.org/ I may hate the fundamentalists, but they're definitely doing some great work. That's from Baylor (a classically southern baptist school, like Bob Jones without the racism) and they have used tens of millions of dollars in the last decade to start some of the very first pediatric aids clinics in the third world. The head of the program came to speak at my school, and I must say he was the first truly Great Man (in the Ghandi sense) that I've met in my life. This program exists on donations from some of the worst of the worst fundamentalists (among others). So there is some good.
Right. A lot of landlords are speculative investors, who bought properties with the expectation that they would appreciate greatly. They're taking a loss, paying more in mortgages and other expenses than they're earning in rent. Now they see that property prices are not going up, and may even go down. What to do? Keep on losing money? Cut losses by selling? But too many landlords selling at once will crash the market. Many will refuse to sell at much lower prices, and will be trapped by their refusal -- losing money every month, and maybe losing equity too, as prices go into a downward spiral.
&gt;"Jesus was also a very "un-Roman" god. Christ the Jewish man dying naked on a cross crapping all over himself isn't nearly as appealing as Jupiter." &gt;"Psalm 22 which literally detail the entire crucifixion scene 1,000 years before it happened." &gt;"I believe it is Psalm 40:22 which says, God sits above the circle of the earth." I almost liked your post until you tried to once again justify your religion in terms of history and science. The fact is that Jesus' story is heavily reliant upon elements found in polytheistic religions and likely the man never really existed just like Osiris never existed either. The crucifiction is borrowed from Mithras, the bread and wine supper and resurection is reminiscent of Osiris/Dionisus celebration. The virgin birth of Mary is copied from Buddhism and Krishna. There are people who argue that virtually all stories of New Testament came from other faiths. Other than that it was a nice, thoughtful post from someone on "the other side" of the debate. Just don't try to invent "science" or "history" behind your faith. It's your beliefs and leave it at that. Stealth rationalizations will not help you make your point.
There is conclusive evidence that they thought the earth was flat. It's not in the bible but it's in the historical record for each and every country and culture from that era. If you want to give them credit, you should learn what they knew. Give them credit for the predictive power of their astronomy; we know they could predict a number of things based on astronomical record, and we think maybe they could do more than we even realize. However, give them no credit for a round earth. We know they didn't have that idea.
I think it's a sign of the times, but I really expected this to be about military action.
[Linky](http://reddit.com/info/5nur/comments).
On #ubuntu at least, the advice is that if you've used automatix to reinstall because you won't be supported. I know I've come across some odd problems in there that were caused by it.  It does things like echo "\nY\n", although this may have changed.
Nobody does confession anymore. Basically only Catholics did it 50 years ago, and now they don't bother. Fundamentalists never ever did confession. So it's more like sin-justify-sin-justify.
&gt; The only problem I have there is homosexuals adopting kids. I'm pleasantly surprised by the way you pick your battles.  I mean, I find this opinion of yours to be rather reprehensible, based on the families I know that are based around homosexual couples. I assume that you are not suggesting that the foster care system is better for children than gay parents, just because I can't imagine anyone holding that opinion. So I'm sure you have a better idea, but whatever. But I'm glad you've picked that fight. Because it's one that you'll lose. You might be uncomfortable with gay people raising children based on whatever imagined or unimagined lack of evidence, but everyone else is not. Or at least they will not be, as they become more aware of gay families. I'd normally argue vehemently against most slippery slope arguments, but this is a slippery slope. As homophobia decreases, and homosexuals are allowed to live their lives however they like, they will be permitted to adopt children. If we liberals win the other civil rights battles, we'll win this one too.
Only it's a lot more zeroes and it's not a deposit
who?
It is very difficult to predict how things will turn out, so I don't think that's a good basis for picking your life's work. Pick something that motivates *you*, so that even if you legacy is modest, you are happy to have worked on it. And even if the works concerns an idea whose time has come, you are likely to provide a uniquely valuable slant. Both Leibniz and Newton made unique contributions to mathematics; Darwin's contribution to evolutionary biology went far beyond the mere idea of evolution.
&gt; I honestly don’t need to see Deal or No Deal in widescreen. I honestly don't need to see Deal or No Deal period. I'm not buying an HDTV.  If the analog signals are no longer available after, when is it? 2008? then that'll be a good excuse to either stop watching TV altogether (which could be a very good thing) or buy one of those converter boxes.  It's good to know that our govmn't will be giving out $40off coupons for those!
I worked one summer as a telemarketer and you are absolutely correct. Do not ask to be taken off their list; they will just take you off the current list, but you will probably get called from a "different" list. However, if you ask to be added to the "Do Not Call" list, then your name should be filtered from new lists they buy. When a telemarketer calls you, the worst thing you can do is annoy them. Telemarketers keep two lists of phone numbers:  1. People to call in six months (because they said "no thank you")  2. People to call next week (because they were not home... or they were jerks!) So if you are a jerk to the telemarketer, you will only INCREASE the number of telemarketing calls you receive! You are only hurting yourself. 
American Idol loser
Tech firms typically pay interns.  I made from $15-25/hr with my college summers, depending on experience.  $20/hr seemed about the going rate for programmers/skilled webdevelopers in college.  Obviously this varies based on economic climate - I was making $16/hr with just a high school diploma at the tail-end of the dot-com boom, MIT friends were making $30/hr, but then I could only get $15/hr a year later (2002) after a year of college.  Went up to $25/hr by 2004. Humanities internships frequently do not pay.  I have lots of friends who worked on capitol hill or for newspapers for no pay.  I think those are the jobs that the article is complaining about - full employees only make about $30k/year at many English-major jobs, and now they're competing against interns who will work for free just to get a foot in the door. Just one more reason why every high school should teach economics.  Too many people get the "follow your passion" advice without realizing that oftentimes nobody will pay you for your passion.
Exclusive interview? The guy has given tons of interviews the last few days. Besides, he has no connection to TPB. And there is no information in that "interview" that is not available in Swedish mainstream press.
I have quite a decent selection of Spike Jones.  Been a fan ever since I heard a whole hour of his stuff on the local college station about 6 years ago.  Definitely some interesting stuff.
Dumb Terminal = Almost Display only, all processing happens on the server (modern versions are called thin client) Smart Terminal = Full PC, most processing except for the stuff that absolutely has to be centralized happens on the client   
If the bill passes, then nothing stops goverment from making next logical step: marking its citizen when they are born, and/or get driver license. 
Reddit is neither artificially separating by country nor artificially enforcing internationality. Reddit is simply letting the article posters choose whether to provide that context or not, and that one, linking to a US newspaper on a site based in the US, decided not to provide the context. (As an aggressively internationalized american who grew up in different countries) I know why this bothers you, but I think you're wasting your energy on it. Worry about the number of americans who can't find your country on a map, for starters.
Well, I think digg users would bitch that the content of the article is humor, not technology.  But thanks for the tip.  I'll post it on digg too and see what the comments are like there.
I bought an HDTV and am very happy with it -- it's great for movies and video games, and we get several stations over the air in HDTV. But he's right that the content is limited, and they are expensive. It comes down to your planned usage. I seldom watch TV at all; but having something that will play movies and video games nicely has real value to me. If you love SDTV, it's probably not the time to buy an HDTV. Not to mention that you can't buy cheap SDTV's much larger than thirty-some inches, and they weigh a ton. For us, a lot of the appeal was just getting a bigger image.
In settings with group decisions, the former tends to increase the chances of the latter. I think a (reasonable) number of cons happen because large groups lack individuals willing to be responsible for rejecting those cons.
America has taken the world to the very frontier of space and astronomy. They have Hubble, look it up on the Nasa website, the wonders of Pulsars, of Spiral Galaxies should dazzle you. They landed on the moon, on Mars and have various probes travelling the Solar System and out into deep space. I would not support America in many things, but to me it appears that their science is advancing all the time. I am not talking about the petty useless technological devices like Ipods and HDTV that make man more introverted and insular but the real science that advances a deeper meaning to life by understanding the universe we live in.  (Not forgetting Russia and the European Space Agency too, but that is another argument) I do not see America being remotely anti-science at all, except for a few fundamentalists who live in small towns that are insular and that no one wants to visit. 
It's not a PC! It's a palm pilot in a wall socket!
despite a lot of healthcare expense, US life expectancy is lower than in most developed countries. The point of the article is that too much surgery and procedures could explain it. IMO, Overprescribing everything for anything probably also contributes.
is this news? there is no answer to the question in the title.
A lot of that percieved value your parents are seeing is tied to their dollars losing value. You can, if you know what you are doing, make some money in real estate.  You can't expect it to be a sure thing.  There are many people that buy a house, and then find they aren't going to get the return they hoped.  YOu have incidents like the one colkassad describes, but this isn't the norm and isn't guaranteed to happen. Owning a home that you live in is a liability.  Owning a home that you rent to others for a profit is an asset.  Owning a home that you live in decreases your ability to be "agile" (lose a job, need to move, whatever).  Renting provides an easy out when you need to go. This article is good.  Houses are durable consumer goods.  The real value is the land, not the improvements.
That's gotta be training.  The 'bastard' isn't wearing any protection on his hands; there's no way he'd be allowed that close to 'the bomb' without any protection.  For that matter...I don't think they let anybody near it who doesn't have to be anyways.  Still...definite bastard. :D
Funny. So funny.
That's pretty damn cool. If it had a freely available spec and ran GNU/Linux, I'd buy it.
&gt; For although they knew God, they neither glorified him as God not gave thanks to him, but their thinking became futile and their foolish hearts were darkened. .. Therefore God gave them over in the sinful desires of their hearts to sexual impurity for the degrading of their bodies with one another... Because of this God gave them over to shameful lusts. Even their women exchanged natural relations for unnatural ones. In the same way the men also abandoned natural relations with women and were inflamed with lust for one another. Men committed indecent acts with other men, and received in themselves the due penalty for their perversion. (Romans 1:21-27) &gt;Do you not know that the wicked will not inherit the kingdom of God? Do not be deceived: Neither the sexually immoral nor idolaters nor adulterers not male prostitutes nor homosexual offenders nor thieves nor the greedy nor drunkards nor slanderers nor swindlers will inherit the kingdom of God. (1 Corinthians 6:9-10)
I knew a guy who got a call from someone selling magazines.  After saying he was interested he asked them if they came in braille.  That embarassed the telemarketer and got them off the phone quickly.
I'm not sure about that 'each country' bit.  Didn't the greeks work out the circumference of the Earth through advanced geometry/math?
&gt; Just don't try to invent "science" or "history" behind your faith. It's your beliefs and leave it at that. Stealth rationalizations will not help you make your point. What if we believe the 'science' or 'history' behind our faith?
that's the whole idea. oh dear
It did. It went down and up.  [Dollar cost averaging](http://beginnersinvest.about.com/cs/newinvestors/a/041901a.htm)
The problem with this administration (president and congress) is that it spends too much. If you think that the govt can do more than the free market to improve energy efficiency you are wrong. If gas were $5 a gallon, then THAT would encourage energy efficiency. 
what about Mark Warner?
That's what I wondered.  Also amused at *eight species* constituting "fantastic biodiversity."
That's the stupidest example ever. Look at their table 1. They spent $15000, and ended up with 746.21 shares, $11.64 each, which makes it $8686. So they basically lost $6314.
&gt;3. Vasa, 1628 If you're ever in Stockholm make sure you visit the [Vasa museum](http://www.vasamuseet.se/Vasamuseet/Om/Museet.aspx?lang=en). The whole ship has been lifted and restored. It is pretty impressive, though what stuck me with me the most was the incredible humidity.
Don't tell Homeland Security!
&gt;What if we believe the 'science' or 'history' behind our faith? Keep that to yourselves then. Don't proselytize based on the premise that the religion is "true". You'll fare better by trying to pitch Jesus' message of peace rather than by wrapping old Middle Eastern myths in pseudo-science to make them sound believeable. In particular don't try to push it into science classes under the guise of "exploring scientific alternatives" the way you've been trying to do so with Intelligent Design.
&gt;If we liberals win the other civil rights battles, we'll win this one too. Good. People should be allowed to choose whether they are homosexual or not, without restriction by law (separation of state and religion). I must also say, however, that I like the fact that it appears to be the liberals ranged against the Christians in all civil rights battles. Because, obviously, Martin Luther King wasn't a Christian. And the forces that freed the Jews (and homosexuals and Gypsies etc.) from Nazi Germany were entirely atheist. And Wibur Wilberforce didn't believe that Jesus died to save his sins. I understand that you disagree with the Christian view on homosexuality (though in no way do most of us believe that homosexuals should be prohibited by law from doing what they will), but please don't place us on the other side of /every/ civil rights debate.
Number 9 was previously [covered by Damn Interesting](http://www.damninteresting.com/?p=500) and subsequently [discussed here](http://reddit.com/info/4cfb/comments). DI's take on the story, however, was to laud the responsibility of the designer, for coming forward when he realised the mistake
I didn't know Werner von Braun was a product of the American Education System.
ONLY one in six?
I like editorializing shity article titles. Especially when, If i was 16 and got and '02 Benz would LOVE people calling me a victim (I won't even get into ages, but I think a 16 year old is perfectly capable of making decisions) Should have read something like "Ugly lady gives guy Benz in exchange for sex" 
&gt; Keep that to yourselves then. Especially don't try to push it into science classes under the guise of "exploring scientific alternatives" the way you've been trying to do so with Intelligent Design. Whoah! 'We'?! Not only do I live in Britain, I don't believe that Intelligent Design should be taught in science classes.   People need to stop assuming the fundamentalists speak for all of us. They don't! In fact, it's akin to accusing every Muslim of terrorist attacks, just because fundamentalists have been found guilty of doing so. It's simply not the case.
A friend and I were watching Patrick Stewart's "A Christmas Carol". In one scene, Scrooge asks a ghost, "why do spirits cross the earth?" Without missing a beat, my friend responded: "To get to the other side." OK, you had to be there.
AMD is fairly cooperative, it looks like their standard diskless workstation profile for which Linux kernels are available precompiled, and documentation isn't hard to find. The form factor is pretty cool, I could see wiring a new house with several of these and a reasonable server with unreasonable amounts of storage humming away in a utility closet.
Fair enough about the generalization.  My point was however, that trying to justify mystical beliefs by propping them up with elements of science or history is countreproductive to those arguing for the case. Virtually all religions are full of logical fallacies and glaring historical inconsistencies. Simply don't raise the issue or say that you don't know why your scripture is in conflict with modern science. It will make you more respected as a debater.
Ok not forgetting the man who helped develop space rockets as well :-)
It will never end for people who, instead of looking for opportunities, oversimplify and apply misleading labels.
Recomended reading for any one concerned about  poverty in Africa
This is great.  As network performance increases, it will be faster to run your applications at a datacenter on good servers than to run them on your own desk.  Additionally there will be huge savings on electricity, maintenance, and losses due to downtime.
What do you call a guitarist without a girlfriend? Homeless.
A lot of students do that. For appliances and furniture and stuff, just buy now, and then offer to sell it to the next people at the end of the term.
Those calls are illegal in Germany. They try it anyways. So just ask them for the name, company, address and maybe they realize that it's no good idea to call you. 
I clicked hoping for a few laughs, but I was sombered and saddened by the tragedies. Am I the only one for whom the word "stupid" set up false expectations?
That's an interesting analysis, thanks. I guess the real key then is, when renting, to acknowledge the savings and be actively purchasing "real" investments in lieu of buying a house. The trouble with renting is that it appears as though you've got all this extra cash flow to just spend on beer and popcorn.
&gt; please don't place us on the other side of /every/ civil rights debate Oh, no. Definitely not. But we know which side the liberals are supposed to be on. As much as the Democrats fuck it up.
GAS TAX!
assuming it isn't a doctored photo (which it certainly could be).
Of course doctors run way too many tests.  If something goes wrong, the opposition's lawyer will say "this test was available, why didn't you use it?  Who are you to put a price on human life?"  And jurors lap that up. Lots of examinations are not cost-effective in the aggregate. But, when it's *your* aorta that you want tested, you damn well want and demand every test. Maybe the answer is for people to have long-term relationships with their insurance companies.  Imagine if the insurance company said "if you get heart disease any time in the next 30 years, we'll pay for its treatment."  Then the insurance company could make rational long-term assessments of what tests are appropriate -- after all, if they fail to detect something in time, they are the ones who are going to be paying for it. As it is, most people's relationships with insurance companies are fleeting, lasting only while they are attached to a specific employer.  Thus, their response (and an entirely rational one!) is to extract as much value from the insurance company as possible, which means "let me get tested for everything under the sun." 
there's one in Vegas - the billboard says something about "eating out" - a bit crude, but still funny.
I think that this is some serious bullshit, this guy had a kid, is totally pissed that there are people without kids whose lives don't suck total nard because they don't have kids, and now wants everyone to have a kid so they're as miserable as he is and he won't feel as bad.  I mean, his arguments are essentially: "You won't need to get a minivan!  The truth is, you'll NEED to get a minivan!" or "You won't not sleep any more, you'll just be so tired you'll pass out on the bus!" or "You won't get less sex, you just won't get any sex!" or even "You life won't be hell, you'll just be surrounded by little red guys sticking pitchforks up your ass in a pit of horrible fire from which you will never return!  AWESOME!" Yeah FU, keep your screaming shit factory, and if he starts bawling in a restaurant, I'm going to throw my mashed potatos at YOU.
&gt;Newspapers and business magazines are full of articles expressing exasperation about how the Millennial-generation employee supposedly expects work to be exciting immediately, wears flip-flops to the office and has no taste for dues-paying. Ok, not all work can be exciting, but a significant amount of the utterly boring work in the corporate world is due to internal inefficiency/stupidity. Businesses would do well to cut out as much of that kind of work as possible. Some of it is externally imposed, but a lot of it isn't. There's also no good reason for making most of the office staff wear uncomfortable clothes. Sure, people interacting with customers/the public need to meet social expectations, but give everyone else a break. Comfortable employees are more productive. Dues-paying is an antiquated concept. Organizations that reward merit over going a long time without quitting or getting fired are more productive. Case in point: startups. Of course, that doesn't mean you shouldn't have to prove yourself - just the opposite - if you 'pay your dues' but don't demonstrate skill and enthusiasm, you shouldn't be rewarded.
fo' shizzle.
This is a good time to point out that all of the comments have been deleted from [a similar reddit comment page.](http://reddit.com/info/69f4/comments#c6bkj)  Still don't know why that happened, there was a lively discussion taking place there. (including [my link](http://www.informationclearinghouse.info/article12790.htm) to a story about how the comments being attributed to Iran's President about wiping Israel off the map were similarly a hoax.)
&gt; If they believe that a cluster of cells is a child, then it's their duty to try to stop abortion. Not really. There are a number of other beliefs that they'd have to hold before it would be their duty to stop that abortion. It's those other beliefs that are really reprehensible. I'm an atheist, and I'll concede that whether that cluster of cells is a child or not depends on your definition of the word. But whether or not it's a child must not reduce the mother's right to control her own body. Whatever rights that child may have, it does not have rights over her. When I've pushed this point on reddit, the fundie response I eventually got was that the child does have rights over the mother's body because her body is naturally designed to serve it. When I pushed this point on /., with Pudge, he has a considerably better argument that went a little over my head and I've since forgotten. Maybe I should dig that up. But, in response to your comment: No. Still not their duty to subjugate a woman to her fetus, whether it's a child or not.
I don't believe there is a single article on Wikipedia about Israel or Jews that is neutral.  It is all very one-sided, not altogether different than what we get through the MSM.
/me does
&gt; Simply don't raise the issue or say that you don't know why your scripture is in conflict with modern science. I don't believe that my Scriptures are in conflict with modern science. I believe that the ifrst 12 chapters of Genesis are a creation 'myth' designed more to contravene the common beliefs at the time (e.g. one God rather than many gods) than to describe the literal creation of the world. If you are referring to another part of the Scriptures, I'd be more than happy to debate that. And, although I have absolutely no hard proof at this moment in this time, I am reliably informed that there is more evidence that Jesus Christ lived than there is that Julius Caesar did (though, obviously, that doesn't prove he was the Son of God). Feel free to ignore this point, however, as I can't find a decent source for it.
Released? Fantastic!  (I knew he was innocent.) 
&gt; Yea but god doesn't even know what a circle is, he thinks Pi is 3 Rounding error? :P
Ugh this is one of the craziest videos I’ve ever seen….if you puke easily, skip it.  http://www.peta2.com/OUTTHERE/o-goriestvideo.asp?c=p2_0601v 
&gt; Nobody does confession anymore. Not true. Maybe nobody confesses through a priest, but that was never really God's intent. Jesus came down so that he could intercede for us, without any need for a priest (be they in a Jewish temple or a Catholic Church). So people do confess, but it is personal, one-on-one with God.
100 of the most significant events in Linux history
In the long run, it seems Captchas are a lost cause. But in the meantime, they can slow spam a lot. I think part of the solution is to have a lot of different brands of captchas all over the web, so it makes it expensive for the attacker to develop attacking code each time.
nope...
Very cool and very funny!
What do you know?
what does the human resources thing have to do with the punchline?
Exactly. The way law works in US makes medicine goldmine for lawyers. For some reason, the United States is the only country on earth where accidents don't happen - it's always somebody's fault, and you can sue that somebody for _neglect_. If patient dies during operation or medication, it's easier to doctor get out of the hook. But operations and medications have risks. If they are done for just to cover your ass, it's bad treatment. 
I have to agree... but I like the current legal definition, so I'll jus stick to it.  hehe
From the article: &gt; "They haven't said it doesn't work. They say it's because of other higher priorities."  These kinds of programs are the only legitimate purpose of a federal government. &gt; And no, trusting someone is not a bad thing. You're an idiot if these are the people you think we should trust.
Is there really any doubt? Looks pretty fake to me.
She's pretty thick for being so young!
Bingo.  It doesn't even have to be the high end brand name stuff.  You probably have enough shirts in your closet to last the rest of your life if all you cared about was being clothed.  But every once in a while you go out and buy a few more.  Why?  Because the old ones are getting worn out, or are out of style. Seriously, have you ever seen someone else, be it a friend or someone on TV, with something you thought was cool.  Cool phone, Playstation, nice car, stories of travelling to cool places, well furnished house, and thought, "that would be cool." Most are not as independent as they think.
I think he was trying to demonstrate what a bastard is--in writing.
Still can't.  You will be even more effective with a knife since you have trained hand-to-hand.  You might feel a bit awkward but you will still be doing more damage every time you strike.  If you fight someone 1-on-1 it will most likely go to the ground and a knife will be decisive. 
looks like a photoshop to me...  I think the second guy is a copy of the first.  He wouldn't be able to lean into the frame like that without toppling forward, his center of gravity would be way ahead of his stance.   It's a clever premise and good execution, but I find the caption too pedantic and labored.
Did you get an extra entry in the contest for posting this reply?
It takes a lot of training to defend against a knife wielded by an *un*-trained attacker, and you'll still probably get cut.  If they have training, the best defense is to get away...  or grab a weapon with more reach. 
I have a feeling this may be ripped from a Worth 1000 photoshop competition, I'm sure I've seen it before somewhere.
This article completely glosses over the extremely complex political mess Iran was in following the Second World War.  For those interested: research Shah Mohammad Reza Pahlavi, Prime Minister General Haji-Ali Razmara, the Abadan Crisis, Ayatollah Kashani, Tudeh Party, General Fazlollah Zahedi, and Ghavam os-Saltaneh.
You possibly could have come up with a worse example. I'm not really sure, though. Finding data from the 1960s (as far back as I could find on Yahoo Finance) GE is worth over 150x what it was worth 50 years ago. This includes splits and dividends. 150&gt;13. Sorry I couldn't find earlier data, but I think it would just help prove my point even more. Additionally the other **11** companies from **110 years** ago did not all go bankrupt, but were acquired or broken up. Even ignoring the value of those companies we can see GE would have made you bank. If you're cherry picking, make sure you at least pick the right cases.
You've got it backwards.  The links hit Reddit first, then Digg a few hours or days later.
&gt; Few companies successful over the long term were first to market. First to market means you get to learn from your own mistakes... and so does your competition. I think this concept is a quintessential driving force behind Web 2.0. There is huge opportunity to simpy do something better--like Flikr.
"Its called responsibility, and I think it is absolutely wrong to kill off what will be (or is) human life simply because it isn't convenient at the time. If it wasn't conventient, you shouldn't have done things which might inconvenience you." Statements like these burn my potatoes.  You're saying that the mere POTENTIAL for life is sacred?  Given what you just said, I would imagine that you are vehemently against birth control?  I suppose masturbation is out of the question as well (waste of good potential, that!) ? For the record, you can be totally responsible and get pregnant.  Rape is obviously one example.  In fact, you say: "Basically in situations of rape/incest/life and death, I feel like the mother does have a right to abort the baby. That's not a situation that they put herself in (directly)." A broken condom or other failed contraceptive where all reasonable measures were taken isn't really mom's fault either. If you value a fetus as a life, why does a women have a right to murder something just because it was conceived in an awful way?  Is that the baby's fault?
This was her first photo shoot - you can see how she's still a bit shy, but that changes quickly!
I'm not sure how you got that from my statement. I'm neither Christian nor atheist, if that has anything to do with your line of thinking. I was responding to the assertion that we (the citizens) needn't be concerned with the views of Christians because a [damned piece of paper](http://www.google.com/search?q=constitution+%22damned+piece+of+paper%22) says we're secular. The fact is that we (the citizens) are a pretty religious bunch, and our voting and policy will reflect that, whether its as cut-and-dried as a theocracy or not.
That book is pretty absurd. I read its chapter on the media. It argued that Chomsky's claims about the media's conservative bias must be false because USA Today has an affirmative action policy towards gay people. (Chomsky doesn't even claim the media has a conservative bias!) Anyway, I'm not your Chomsky quote library, but I went to his website, clicked on articles and then scrolled down to "Cambodia". It starts: "a response by the Pathet Lao and North Vietnam, who now control more of Laos than ever before, [] led to devastation and population removal on a vast scale." (1970) So maybe you can do some cursory research yourself before asking silly questions.
hehe.. that's is the coolest thing I've seen this week.
Ongoing series about a scam artist getting what he deserves!
As well as the oil deals the Brits made with themselves.
Jen will say anything if it'll get people to go to her movie. Don't believe the hype!!!!!!!
"Woo woo!"? Wow. That's hot.
Though Hillary is frankly my least favorite of the Democratic candidates, I think Gore could be one of the best presidents this country has had in decades.  Many people picture him as this preachy, stuffy, intellectual, but that's not so true.  He has admitted himself that he ran a crap 2000 campaign, guided at every turn by focus groups and political consultants. Democrats really need to understand that they can't win elections while being paralyzingly afraid of pissing off any of their supporting interest groups.  Americans (for better or worse!) vote for whoever they think A) understands the problems of people like them, and B) is trustworthy.  Karl Rove's genius is his understanding that this trumps everything else.  At the same time, Bush's loss of (B) is why his poll numbers will probably never recover, even among conservatives.
dumb...really dumb
On the other hand, having one lawyer (or in this case, law student) tell you that what you're doing is legal doesn't mean that you're not breaking the law...
my dad &gt; your dad
Either you're with us or you're against us.
There are no documents confirming the existence of Jesus outside of the biblical ones unless you count those that come much later that are clearly based on the Bible itself. &gt;Feel free to ignore this point, however, as I can't find a decent source for it. Well, I will ignore it until you do because there is really very little hard evidence to back up the claims of Jesus' existance. Really.
How could a list like this omit the Tacoma Narrows bridge collapse? (Washington State).  Or - for that matter - the sinking of the I-90 floating bridge after road resurfacing workers who were prevented from allowing "environmentally hazardous" water from their pressure sprayers to drain into the lake below, stored it into the cement pontoons that held up the bridge instead until one of them sunk and pulled the rest of the bridge down with it.   Or the collapse of the Hood Canal floating bridge over near the Bangor sub base.
Link title reminded me of this: http://www.mercurynews.com/mld/mercurynews/news/politics/14413048.htm &gt; "Another memo obtained by the Tribune, dated April 13 and addressed to all KBR project managers, deputy project managers and operations managers, indicates the company is requiring all of its personnel to undergo ***human-trafficking awareness training*** because of Casey's orders."
[Ex-marines](http://reddit.com/info/6ykg/comments) aren't the only ones who can defend themselves against violent attacks using knives. Somebody should give her a medal.
The Tacoma Narrows Bridge wasn't an engineering mistake.  Or at least, it wasn't a foreseeable or avoidable one. It was an unfortunate disaster, yes.  But the disaster wasn't the result of a correctible human error.
It's kind of sad that *Wired* couldn't get the name of the building right. 
This is handwaving, covered up by asking readers to undertake a time-intensive googling quest. If you really have something to say about this, explain what you mean by "extremely complex political mess", or give a link to another point of view.
Q: What's the difference between a lawyer and a prostitute? A: A lawyer will kiss you on the lips.
Hey everybody, let's click all his ads.
Hope someone makes it clear this is the article all the other recent 2004 Election posts were referring to (as it was not online yet).
I'm getting a warm, fuzzy feeling just *thinking* about that. Edit: [some of](http://hop.inria.fr/hop/doc#g54213) the documentation looks like it's written for a formal paper on language design, not to explain how to make stuff quickly. If any of the project maintainers are reading this - more accessable documentation would increase Hop's chances of getting popular.
Yeah, the US screwed up your democracy, but that doesn't count because that was, like, different. And stuff.
&gt; There's just not enough conclusive evidence (considering how recently homosexuality in this nation has been embraced) to show what the psychological effects are on a kid raised by a homosexual couple. You say that as if the "normal" family has been shown to work well and produce psychologically stable children.
This is just another test of my faith... just another test...
It is not handwaving. It is giving a place to start looking to people who are interested in learning about the situation. If you can't be bothered to search out information for yourself, that's not the OP's problem.
I think militant agnosticism is a much greater threat than christian fundamentalism.  Someone who says "I don't know and you don't either!" is a much greater threat to my belief in the elder gods than some loser spouting off about a pissant so-called "messiah" who couldn't even frighten schoolchildren without the aid of pedophile priests. Cthulhu P'tagn!
Thta's a pretty fucked up experiment.
There was a butcher chain in New Orleans called Wagner's Meat -- their billboards and bumper stickers read "You can't beat Wagner's Meat."  Very popular bumper stickers.
A lot of nerds made filthy amounts of money in the 90's.  If you visit any primary school today, the anti-intellectual atmosphere is still rampant. You make it sound like the guys who beat up on the nerds at school are filthy rich.  They are not.  They're pushing burgers at McDonalds because they didn't get the football scholarship. Think about your anecdotal example of the guy that went to business school.  He actually went to business school.  That in itself requires some level of work and intellectual achievement, regardless of whether he was "smarter" than the nerd next to him in physics class in 8th grade. Your argument is that the science and math work you put into school is not commensurate with the dollar rewards you get later in life.  That is true - in every society.  However that is not the reason that kids who excel intellectually in American schools (I didn't single out just science here) still routinely get put down by their peers. 
Vague philosophical debate has never been a very good guide to practical matters, but science has done quite a lot more for us in the last few thousand years.  Nobody has *ever* been observed to resume "living" once brain activity has stopped, thus the theory that "brain activity == life" is still sound.  If we find an exception, then *and only then* will we have reason to question that theory. Until then, no brain activity == no life.  If you want to prevent the loss of "potential" life, then you'd better be having sex 24/7 right now, and continue the whole time you're researching a way to force fertilized eggs to attach to the uterine wall every time.  Of course, we should also make it a crime for anyone to be unmarried/celibate (the same thing under fundamentalist law, of course) after puberty.
I like to say early in the call: "Highly interesting!  Just a second I need to put something off the stove, I'll be right back." I then turn the microphone off and walk away. They try to steel my time.  I retaliate.
"But the second you try and restrict a man or woman’s right to marry another man or woman, you’ve crossed the line." What is your definition of marriage? What do you believe is the purpose of marriage? Is marriage merely a means of conveying employee medical benefits to your chosen sex partner?
I may disagree with Bloomberg on some things, but I have to give him props for this.  Well said.
Where do I get my Mother Mary toaster?
I have taught myself to read simple Haskell and write it badly. This article gives some good information on OCaml compared to Haskell. Last time I looked at OCaml the functional bits looked a lot like Haskell.
Two guys are sitting at a bar. "You know why I love this bar?" asks the first one. "No," says the second guy.  "Why do you love this bar?" The first guy points at the window, which is six stories above the ground.  "It has a magic window," he says.  "You jump out of that window, and you can fly." The second guy just shakes his head.  "Shut up." "No," says the first guy.  "It really is a magic window.  I'll prove it to you." So the first guy gets down from his bar stool, runs at the window, jumps out of it, and flies.  He flies around the building twice, up and down, and finally comes back in.  He walks to his barstool, and takes a sip of his drink.  "See?" he says. The first guy looks confused.  He looks at his drink.  "I must be drunk," he says. "Still don't believe me?" asks the second guy.  "I'll show you again."  He gets down from his stool, runs and jumps out  of the window again.  This time he performs some impressive aerial acrobatics, spins, flips, dives.  When he finally comes back in, the second guy is staring at him, slack-jawed. "Wow," says the second guy.  "A magic window."  He gets off his barstool, takes a running jump out of the window, and promptly plummets to his death.  The first guy starts laughing. The bartender comes over to the first guy with a stern look on his face.  "Superman, you're a real asshole when you're drunk."
If nothing like that had ever happened before---and I don't think it had---then I don't see how you can fault the engineers for failing to foresee it. Was the problem one that had afflicted earlier bridges?  I thought not. 
I'm still waiting for that Fiber connection to my home, the one the government gave the TeleCos money for in the mid-1990s.
So he is old and responsible enough to drive a car, but not to have sex?
Care to name a democracy that can't be described as an extremely complex political mess? I mean, in Taiwan they've got lawmakers who'd [rather eat legislation than vote on it.](http://edition.cnn.com/2006/WORLD/asiapcf/05/30/taiwan.parliament.reut/)  Does that give mainland China the green light to go in there and stage a coup? 
The Bush administration is not misguided not incompetent.  They are wiley, smart, and cruel.  Rumsfeld and Cheney have been planning their escapades since the Nixon era.  Bush is their patsy.  Beware the vice and the secretary!
How so?  There's no reason that people shouldn't be able to switch insurance companies if they want.  The problem is that there are many government incentives in place that make it cheaper for people to be insured through their employers (you can use pre-tax dollars, for example) so that it's much more expensive to keep your previous insurance if you switch jobs. Most people take the easy way out and are insured though work, but this is only because of the distorted market incentive. Also, with socialized medicine, you can't even tell if the insurer is ripping you off, because you have nothing else to compare it to in the same country, with the same laws, taxes, and regulations.  Maybe private insurance in Canada would be much cheaper than socialized, but there's no way to tell.  On the same token, it could be much more expensive, but generally, competition tends to drive prices down.
guys, the gold rush is over.  congratulations for those who made money, but i think the advice of the article is very sound: don't expect appreciation on your house.  Buy it because you want to live in it and you can afford it.
This is a perfect example of junk science.   1.  There is a difference between "having a drink during work hours" and "being drunk at work".  2.  The group size is too small to make a claim that "one in six *Brits*" partake in excessive drinking while at work.  3.  The data is based on a survey.  Surveys are always unreliable and subject to data curruption.
MMMMM....hamburger!
That is true, if mutual funds consistently returned 12%, nobody would trade stocks (separate stocks), which return around 11% on average.
The author doesn't seem to know much about [the etymology of hack and hacker](http://www.oreilly.com/openbook/freedom/appb.html).
This is just gossip... not the sort of thing I want to read on reddit.
People have been stealing presidential elections in this country since at least 1960!
A. In a number of American cities, mortage payments for the same size property is significantly (40%) more than  rental payments for the same property. B. Historically stocks have always been the best investment over the *long term* (~20-30 years), even better than real estate, even in some of the super hot real estate marktets. I can't believe that you won't acknowledge what makes sense in one part of the country doesn't make sense in other parts.
There are almost as many brands of Christianity as there are Christians. But the president and other "Christian Conservatives" have served to represent a particular brand that many of us intensely dislike. When other Christians find and elect better spokesmen, the brand will improve.
Not true.  Many properties have exclusive contracts with realtors.
Install BeOS or OS/2.
All the proles want to play the lottery ...
I visited Intel once. Oh my! Rows and rows Chinese and Indian engineers. I wonder, if whiteboys are in minority in Intel.
From [CSMon](http://csmonitor.com/2006/0531/p02s01-uspo.html) reporting on the same story. &gt; These programs are minuscule compared with the big-ticket research programs envisioned by the White House. Mr. Bush's Hydrogen Fuel Initiative, for example, would cost $1.2 billion over five years. &gt; Proponents of the small-scale efficiency programs point out that the ITP, with 1/20th of the budget, has already saved more oil than the hydrogen-fuel program would save, if successful, by 2025. Put in that perspective it wouldn't even make sense the pursue the new initiatives.
I totally and 100% agree.  But if the pro-lifers want to sound better in these arguments, all they really gotta do is stop saying "potential life" and start saying "the potential for life in the immediate future".  It doesn't change their stance at all, but all the same...
well you're not very fun
becuase evangelical christians are a cancer on humanity and America.
Det var USA:s regering som låg bakom tillslaget mot fildelningsnätverket Pirate bay i går, enligt uppgifter till SVT:s Rapport.  En delegation med företrädare för justitiedepartementet och polisen mötte i april amerikanska myndigheter som tog upp frågan på begäran av Hollywoods intresseorganisation MPAA.   Justitiedepartementet bad sedan polis och åklagare att agera. När de svarade att rättsläget var oklart kontaktade justitieministerns statssekreterare riksåklagaren och rikspolischefen som gav order om handling, erfar Rapport. Ministerstyre The Pirate bay har öppet utmanat dem som äger rättigheterna inom film- och musikvärlden. Men många inom internetvärlden är ändå förvånade över de svenska myndigheternas ingripande.  Enligt uppgifter till Rapport har det gått till på detta sätt. Den amerikanska intresseorganisationen MPAA har tagit kontakt med regeringen i Vita Huset. Amerikanska utrikesdepartementet har sedan tagit kontakt med UD i Sverige och krävt att problemet Pirate bay måste lösas.  Enligt Rapports källa har sedan åklagare och polis blivit beordrade att agera och beskriver satssekreterarens handling med ministerstyre. ----------- It was USA’s government that was behind the closing of the filesharing network Pirate Bay yesterday, according to information given to SVT’s Rapport (state television channel). A delegation with representatives from the justice department and the police met US authorities in april. The US authorities raised the question after pressure from Hollywoods lobby organization MPAA. The (swedish) justice department asked the police and prosecutor to act. When they answered that the laws was unclear, the justice department's secretary contacted the state police and state prosecutor and ordered them to act. Ministerial Government  The Pirate Bay has openly challenged the copyright owners in the movie- and music industry. Still, many are surprised by the actions taken by the Swedish authorities. According to information given to Rapport has the following happened: The American lobby organization MPAA has contacted the White House. The American Foreign Ministry contacted the Swedish Foreign Ministry and demanded that the problem with Pirate Bay has to be solved. According to Rapport’s sources. The police and prosecutors were ordered to act. The source describes the state secretary’s actions as ministerial government (???)  Ministerstyre = when the government orders the administration to do something in a particular case. This is illegal in Sweden. -----  Please correct my translation, I haven't translated anything since university...
I think they're saying that you _could_ run it off of Ethernet power.  Of course, that wouldn't make sense as it's designed to plug into a power socket.
An old man and an old woman are together every night.  They aren't married, but for years and years they have spent every night together.  All they ever do is sit on the couch buck naked and watch TV while she holds his weiner. Every night, like clockwork, they do this - sit on the couch watching TV while she holds his weiner. One night he doesn't show up.  Then a second night goes by - no show.  She calls him up. "Where you been?"  "Oh ... I've been down at what's her name's."  "What are you doing there?"  "Pretty much the same thing we do - sitting naked on the couch watching TV while she holds my weiner."  "Well, what does she have that I don't have?"  "Parkinson's."
I wasn't aware that AMD made a low power RISC processor.  Is the article mistaken, perhaps it's an ARM processor?
Another definition of responsibility could be choosing not to bring another child into the world. I have no idea why jesus freaks think the only choice in life which entails responsibility is that to bring to term a fetus.
&gt; i agree, my point was in response to the original poster who called for a "long" relationship with an insurer, which i surmise would only happen if one were forced into such a relationship. Why in the world would people be *forced* into that relationship? This is the way that term life insurance works today.  You enter into a contract with a company of your own choosing, for a period of time that can range up to decades.  Your premiums are fixed during this time. Health insurance doesn't work this way: if you get a private policy, you can find your premiums jacked up if you get sick.  That's one of the things I'd like to see fixed with the health care industry. 
Yes it was.  Not that it matters, since the Bush Administration is above the rule of law because he loves Jesus.
There is a definite danger in making healthcare too profitable.  -- the current state of US practise. The greater the profit opportunity, the greater chance of clouding moral judgements. To be fair though, there is another explanation for poorer than expected US life expectancy: corrupt FDA and EPA can have contributed to disease.
Is there an echo in here?
Why I didn't buy an HDTV:  1. Most television programmes are shit.   2. The few which are not shit, ie which are watchable (or, rarely, interesting), are just as interesting when slightly fuzzy as they would be in absolute clarity. This is especially true given that my eyesight is appalling anyway.  3. I have a television already. It works. It does not need replacing.  4. I could buy several hundred books with that kind of money.  5. Or an oil painting.  6. Or a house in Scotland.   7. Or indeed a United States Senator.   8. I do not need to compensate for the size of any part of my body, whether through the medium of large electronic equipment or otherwise.  9. People are starving. Others are dying of curable diseases. Others have no shoes. The "quality" of my television picture is not really a comparable issue.  
&gt;Abuse isn't my concern, its the psychological effects, but as you've said, those are hard to determine regardless. &gt;I have a very hard time thinking that a kid raised by homosexual parents won't be affected in some way when the status-quo for as long as recorded history goes has never been homosexual couples raising children. Even in Rome and such where they openly practiced homosexuality, children still were never raised by same-sex couples. The same arguments were used against mixed-race couples having and/or adopting children. 
Q: Why did the other monkey fall out of the tree? A: It was stapled to the first monkey.
Of course I'm not saying that a 70MPH wind was an unforeseen circumstance.  I'm suggesting that the particular behavior that the bridge displayed in a 70MPH wind was emergent and was unlike any behavior that had been seen in a bridge before.  Many previous bridges had withstood similar winds.  There was no reason to believe that this one wouldn't also. It's all very well to say that they should have designed it to withstand a 70MPH wind, but this ignores that it *was* designed to withstand a 70MPH wind, as far as the effects of the wind on the bridge were understood beforehand.  The behavior shown by this particular bridge was different.  
That's exactly what he's saying.
It's a photoshoped ripoff of an old "The Far Side" by Gary Larson.
I think he's preaching to the choir.
At my web dev internship 3 years ago for a big pharma company I made $16 an hour and gained invaluable experience. Other students who did not take an internship were at a severe disadvantage when it came time to find jobs (i was a computer science major).   There are internship out there that are great, and internships out there that are crap.  Don't settle for the first thing that comes your way, and take it seriously.
Well, at least he's honest about it. I doubt that these CEOs act out of greed so much as fear that if they don't, somebody else *will*.  That's the whole issue with China: you refuse to go along with their censorship policies, and they just say "Sorry, goodbye" and let Baidu have the whole market.  Your defiance doesn't gain anything for the Chinese people, it just cuts you off from the market. It's a really tricky balancing act to know when you have the power to effect real change and when it's better to conserve your political capital and back off.  A lot of executives are, ironically enough, not arrogant *enough* because they've seen what happens to CEOs who do they take the plunge but misjudge their position.  So they play it safe, pursue profits (something they know how to do), and don't stick their necks out. And when a leader does stick his neck out and turns out to be wrong (like George W. Bush on Iraq), he's universally pilloried.  I join in the pillorying, because I think Bush ignored evidence that was staring him in the face that Iraq would be another Vietnam and not another World War 2.  But I also don't think Terry Semel has enough power to take on the Chinese government and win.  I dunno; I certainly *like* Google's approach better.  But if it gets them kicked out of China instead of a native company that has to cooperate with *all* requests, I don't see that as a good thing.
Those are crickets?  I could have sworn it was the sound of millions of pussies.
People who pimp Writingup.com articles.   Oh, and motivational speakers who post their mushy corporate-speak essays.
I agree that it might not be much, but working and developing skills in your area of expertise is worth a lot more than a few extra dollars.
looked to me like it was 90% crappy, lazy goal-tending
I like my boss's one: when they ask "have you got just a few minutes?" he says, "No problem! My contract rate is $75 per hour, so if I could have your credit card number before we start, that'd be great."
I wouldn't make such a hasty inference. It is by Wayne Madsen, not some amateur.
Re: limited content: it depends on what you watch.  PBS is in HD.  Why would I care that other networks are SD-only, when I never watch them anyway?  (Fox animated comedies excepted.)  So I'm quite happy with my plasma.  But it did take a significant effort to put together a MythTV box that could handle HD.
Best. Reply. Ever.
Why I Did Buy an HDTV: Err... I edit high-definition video, and I have to make sure it's in focus.  heh HDTVs may be worth their price when HD-DVD and Blu-Ray become more prevalent / less expensive.
Digg?
This article reminded me of the Hugo and Nebula award winner, Ender's Game by O. Scott Card. Pick it up and you will not be dissappointed.
&gt;How could a list like this omit the Tacoma Narrows bridge collapse? (Washington State). I almost didn't click on the link because I thought "Man, I don't want to read about Tacoma Narrows for the billionth time."  I was pleased that most of the list was new to me.
In Oregon and California (perhaps other states as well) there are limits on how much property taxes can increase in any given year.  In Oregon the limit is 3%/year.  This limit was passed in the early 90s.  Prior to that old people were often being forced out of their property because they couldn't pay the property taxes.  Now it's much easier to budget and plan.   
The final sentance is: "Isn't it funny how tough moral decisions become when there's money involved?" Well, isn't it funny how *easy* moral decisions become when you have the the benefit of hindsight?    
Actually, now that my house is paid off I like that I don't have to spend $1000/month to rent the equivilent house; Now I can invest that money.  It's  nice insurance against job loss as well (Not sure how I would have made it through 2003 if I had had to pay rent or mortgage.)
『ブロックを間接的に操作するようなライブラリ』
A guy in high school told me this sexist joke: Him: Why couldn't Helen Keller drive? Me: Because she was blind? Him: No, because she was a woman.
It was unfair of me to say "just broke even". 3% interest over 110 years would lead you to have over 25x your money.  if the 8 other companies (that didn't go bankrupt) averaged 10x their original value, then the total portfolio increase over 110 years would be 0.75 * 230/12 = 14x.  You would need the other 8 companies to be worth over 31x thier original value to come close to a 3% annual portfolio return.
no comment
great site, lost of destinations
what is going on. i am confused
umm....
Good, practical information as well as articles on hair removal products and alternatives.  It also caters to both men and women.
I spent about a week trying to set up 64-bit Ubuntu Breezy Badger on my laptop. After finding myself thwarted time and time again, I jumped onto the Ubuntu forums and decided to ask for help. The response I got: "At this point, you should probably give up. Getting 64-bit Linux to run on a laptop is hell." I've been waiting 4 months for a final version of Dapper Drake, hoping things will be different. Anyone got an advance report?
Since you are very britsh and must bristle at the bastardization of your native tongue all over the world these days,I would like to point out that the proper spelling is 'stealing'  Also, if you are going to be advertizing your blog here, might as well have ads on it.
『サンプルとしてあかつきまお氏・士崎雅雪氏・ねぐら☆なお氏・刃狂介氏の描き下ろしCG素材』
&gt;and millions of others who disapprove silently. But Tom DeLay is much more visible than Sojourners. This silent minority is group of cowards and responsible for the success of fundamentalism. They are the filthy sacks of  shit, even more than fundamentalists. If they think it's not  worth of defending the name of their religion, why feel bad when others think their religion sucks. Today you can actually defend your religion without being fed to the lions.  Where is this million name Christian address for supporting separation of religion and the state? It's has always been like this in human history, big cowardice group silently submitting to agressive minonirty.  Then comes mayhem. "It would be better to pick up a gun than to give way to the cowardice of inactivity." -- Mahatma Gandhi 
http://editorial.gettyimages.com/source/search/details_pop.aspx?iid=71061447&amp;cdi=0 http://editorial.gettyimages.com/source/search/details_pop.aspx?iid=71001189&amp;cdi=0 
Advert
There are some slight differences between them. The first has glare on his visor. There's a dark triangle on both of their collars; the bit just above/right of that has a better defined shape on the second. The same sort of thing happens with a horizontal ridge on the first guy's helmet. The creases on the second that form a triangle with the frame don't seem to have a parallel on the first. Of course, this could be due to slight manipulations, or possibly jpeg's compression algorithm. I don't know much about those suits, but they do seem too similar not to have been copied.
You spent your first day reading reddit?
No, treat them like shit so they hate their jobs, so they're more likely to quit, so the cost of hiring these guys goes up, so telemarketing gets more expensive, so fewer companies use it. Telemarketers are like spammers. Would you go easy on spammers because "they're just trying to make a buck"?
"But, in response to your comment: No. Still not their duty to subjugate a woman to her fetus, whether it's a child or not." It becomes a bit confusing at that point just who's body it is.  There is a connection between them.  Why does one side get to unilaterally decide whether or not to sever that connection, especially when the other side's life depends on it?
No, he's talking about costs.
I'm a student in high school. One of my teachers is always talking about the "achievement gap..." between white students and asian students! Maybe this a general phenomenon.
&gt; It becomes a bit confusing at that point just who's body it is. Sure. Many people think that a woman's body does not belong to her. All of y'all are fucked.  Everyone gets to "unilaterally" decide whether or not to sever their connection to anyone else. You own your body; I own mine; etc.
"There are people who argue that virtually all stories of New Testament came from other faiths." And there are people who don't. There are staggering amounts of scholarship existing on Biblical texts, and the idea that you can sum all of that up and dismiss it in a paragraph is ridiculous. Frankly, this is far too immense of a topic to be handled seriously as a subdiscussion on reddit.
Brush and floss?
So Berlin Brown [asks](http://programming.reddit.com/info/6osw/comments#c6pm5) for a comparison of Haskell and OCaml *on Reddit*, Moe gives [a good answer](http://programming.reddit.com/info/6osw/comments#c6pxm), Mr. Brown copy-pastes it to his blog, and then it gets posted back to Reddit? Also, I think Mr. Brown should have just linked to Moe's comment, or included a link at the very least.
Do you actually have any evidence of that, or is it just something you are saying? There are two many people these days who try to compare slavery/the African-American civil rights movement to the current situation with homosexuality when I believe they truly have very little in common.
"There are no documents confirming the existence of Jesus outside of the biblical ones unless you count those that come much later that are clearly based on the Bible itself." Why would there be? He was a poor carpenter living in a backwater of the Roman Empire in a time before newspapers. And why do you discount the Biblical documents as unacceptable historical texts?  Almost any historical test you use to throw out the Biblical documents will also exclude almost all historical documents of a similar age.
What I do is not funny, but it's both effective and polite: "Hi, is Mr. or Mrs. Glaxnor there?" "This is he." "Hi, Mr. Glaxnor, I'm Betty, calling on behalf of the blah blah blah.  How are you today?" "I'm fine, thank you.  How are you?" "Good! Thanks for asking.  I'm calling on behalf of blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah..." *(allow telemarketer to continue without interrupting them, until they finally get to a pause after asking you if you want to sign up for their exciting "free" crap):* "... blah blah blah.  So, can I sign you up for exciting free crap?" "Could you please take me off of the list of people to call?" "But you know that blah blah blah blah blah, so could I sign you up for exciting free crap?" "Could you please take me off of the list of people to call?" "Okay, I'll do that, sir.  Have a nice day." "Thanks, you too."
Yet, the greater the profit opportunity, the greater the drive for innovation and competition, driving profits back down.  You should ask -- who has the most to lose from competition?  It's not consumers or entrepreneurs, but the establishement and the AMA, which lobbies Congress to restrict competition in the name of consumer protection. It's entirely rational for them to use the government against potential competitors.  It's also rational for the FDA to withhold all drugs as long as possible, since the cost (to the FDA) of approving a bad drug is far more than the cost of withholding a good drug, even though bad drugs are very rare and withholding good drugs causes thousands of avoidable deaths.
This thread has so far focused on the difference between fundamentalist Christians and so-called reasonable ones.  And, as these things go, I'm more likely to take an, um, "ignorant cheap shot" at one of the former. But let's be clear: Christianity is an untenable position. There are some of us who try very hard to speak from evidence and truth and, personally, I am very uncomfortable around people who invoke magical, unsupported explanations. Especially, and this is important, in the realm of political, scientific, philosophical, or otherwise non-trivial discussions. And, well, that's what these fora are: a place to discuss these topics.  And *I don't want to discuss these topics with people who don't reason well.* Religion teaches people that it's OK sometimes, when you *feel* really strongly in your heart that the magical explanation is true, that it's OK to just *let go* and *believe.* People who think this way are boring. And, in my experience, they have a difficult time applying reason and logical thinking to other areas of discussion.
woah awesome.
Amen. **Edit:** ('Amen' in the non-religiously-affiliated sense. :)
Yeah, we were all shamed after seeing your exploits on the news.
The rest of us will have a terrible oder.
Yeah I'm an intern at an international engineering/industrial corporation and all of our interns make $20-22/hour.
&gt; Is it 'truly following all of Christ's commands' to try to force people to behave in a way that you think is in their best interests? No I don't believe that, and that's why I think those situations I spoke of are in some major gray areas. You are *forcing* that child to be raised by homosexual parents, you are *forcing* that child to not have life, and you are *forcing* others to be put into dangerous situations by drug users. It is completely out of their control. As you said yourself, these are not black-and-white situations. All of them have some kind of effect on an individual that didn't have an option to be placed in those situations.
Everything worked for me, on Opera.  It's an amazing demo.
That's the sort of thing HR does.
Dude, every peice of data moved across a wire in the United States of America is saved on the NSA's servers for who knows how long.
Agreed.  Or, how easy they become when it's *someone else's decision*, and their potential sacrifice.
Because I believe the crappiest life in the world is still better than not living at all. If the mother cannot give the child a good life, there are people out there who will adopt them and put them in a good situation.
There's no step between a supreme court decision and violent revolution. And we still have too much to lose for violence.
Q:  What do fat women do in the summer?  A:  Stink.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Citigroup_Center
He really is a great mayor, and I'm dead middle of the road (moderate independant).  That was a great speech. 
*"Some of you took anatomy with Doctor Rose; others actually enjoyed anatomy with Doctor Rose."* Dr. Rose emphatically denies any such allegations.
Pretty Cool!  Now where are those really large flash cards ... and we could go to a "carry you computer anywhere" world!  Just sit down to a monitor plugged into one of these and insert your card ... viola ... you computer is up and running!
&gt;A lot of that percieved value your parents are seeing is tied to their dollars losing value. If you mean inflation, then, yes, that's true, but it's true of every investment. It's also true when gramps goes on about how, in his day, you could buy a five course meal for a nickel.  If you mean losing value as in falling compared to other currencies, you're wrong (apologies if I've misinterpreted). The  dollar is falling against a number of currencies, true, which makes goods produced in the US more valuable. But it makes investments *in* the US (which is what has been driving the real estate market) less valuable. Why invest in a good traded in dollars when you have to battle not only inflation, but also poor future exchange rates?
&gt; You're saying that the mere POTENTIAL for life is sacred Indeed. Are you not glad you had a chance at life? &gt; Given what you just said, I would imagine that you are vehemently against birth control? I suppose masturbation is out of the question as well (waste of good potential, that!) ? No. A sperm cell by itself will not evolve into a human being. An egg cell by itself will (of course they must be in the right environment). &gt; A broken condom or other failed contraceptive where all reasonable measures were taken isn't really mom's fault either. But they were still taking actions which naturally lead to pregnancy. In situations where the condom does break or what not, you should be ready to take responsibility for your own actions. &gt; If you value a fetus as a life, why does a women have a right to murder something just because it was conceived in an awful way? Is that the baby's fault? Its not the baby's fault, but it isn't her's either. If in raising the baby it causes her to have serious emotional issues because of a situation she didn't put herself in, then something is wrong. Mother's should have the final say in situations like that. I'd prefer that she carry the baby to term, but not all women can do that. Would you rather me be against *all* abortions? If I did that you'd get on my case for being close-minded and thinking in black-and-white, but in having a mindset which is open to different situations, my stance is critiqued for being open? That doesn't make a whole lot of sense.
*All* mainstream investments always go up long term. If you actually do the math, though, buying a house is, on average, not a particularly impressive investment.
Perhaps HR because of all people she should be the one that knows whats going on
I like this initiative.  It's been criticized as not focusing on immediate infrastructure needs, but I think getting a good portion of the poorer segments of various countries familar with technology will have payoffs 20 years down the road as these countries integrate more fully into the world economy. 
&gt; I almost liked your post until you tried to once again justify your religion in terms of history and science. Yes, because it is a religion very well-supported in both realms, particularly history. What is wrong with me bringing those points up? &gt; The fact is that Jesus' story is heavily reliant upon elements found in polytheistic religions and likely the man never really existed just like Osiris never existed either. The crucifiction is borrowed from Mithras, the bread and wine supper and resurection is reminiscent of Osiris/Dionisus celebration. The virgin birth of Mary is copied from Buddhism and Krishna. There are people who argue that virtually all stories of New Testament came from other faiths. Huge assumptions. Heavily reliant or similar? According to you they "copied" other religions. Is it not possible that Christianity simply had many ideas similar to those other religions...perhaps those other religions had sparks of divine influence?   Other than that it was a nice, thoughtful post from someone on "the other side" of the debate. Just don't try to invent "science" or "history" behind your faith. It's your beliefs and leave it at that. Stealth rationalizations will not help you make your point. &gt; Other than that it was a nice, thoughtful post from someone on "the other side" of the debate. Just don't try to invent "science" or "history" behind your faith. It's your beliefs and leave it at that. Stealth rationalizations will not help you make your point. I didn't invent science. I brought up a verse in which the Hebrews mention a belief in the very least of a circular earth, and due to the Hebrew language, possibly even a spherical one. That had absolutely nothing to do with inventing science. Its not like I was sitting there trying to tell you that the sun revolves around the earth. You also act like you'd just as soon stifle discussion on this rather than have it at all.
Their print view is only showing the first page. I made this PDF for myself, to read on the subway. Unfortunately, I don't have the time to make the footnotes into real footnotes. They're just in the text where they were at the end of each webpage. I typically print two sided, and fold along the columns so it fits in my jacket pocket. http://www.littleblur.com/dotmac/reddit/rfkjr-2004-election-fraud.pdf If anyone wants to work with my crappy little word file: http://www.littleblur.com/dotmac/reddit/rfkjr-1st-attempt.doc If someone would like me to take that down (for example, after the printable version is fixed), please write me at judgmentalist@gmail.com
There are many beliefs in any society any time in history. Some of them can be settled by polite consideration and debate, some can't. Some beliefs like earth being flat, Elvis still living, faking the moon landings, etc. don't die. What we do to them? Ridicule and laughter are traditional (non violent) methods to socially control stupid and crazy aspects of society, if they try to take control over the majority (or are in control).  Western civilisations have usually approved posthumously this kind of acts (Socrates, Voltaire,...).  Today we are facing the same situation again. People are saying that Homosexuality is wrong because it reads in the book. You can't argue with that. It really says so. What can you do? Not having Voltaire and Socrates around and Paul Graham being silent on subject ;), we may have to settle for less. Cheap shot champaing against *fundamental* christians may change the public climate against them. Maybe then more moderate viewpoints can take hold in public.
You guys are big geeks.  Instead of actually getting the point and laughing at the picture you're scrutinizing details of the artist's photoshop work.
"I hard you to find a better one?" I don't think so.
&gt; No christian before the renaissance believed the earth was round. Not a single one. At best they believed in the ptolemaic universe. That's one massive claim. I now ask you to bring forward every Christian that lived before the renaissance and ask them what their view was.
"That dog would bite you!"
In CA, property taxes only get reassessed in certain circumstances, like making a major improvement or selling the property. In addition, the rate can only increase by a max of 2% a year. Since, on average, inflation is higher than 2%, property taxes will continue to dwindle. Even more, since corporations can exist indefinitely, in the long run this will be a huge boon to businesses that own property at the expense of individuals. And since it was passed by initiative, it can't be repealed by the legislature. Go Proposition 13!
Oee of the best replies I've read in a long, long time.
Just for comparison, I rent a 2 bedroom, 2+1/2 bath, with no garage, a small front yard and no backyard in Santa Barbara, CA. $2025/mo.
Wow...I can run to the beat...Do you think I should just do it?
So is this something that a developer of the game can do or the players themselves? I've heard mentions of SL, but never really looked into it.
The linked page is two hops from the source:  http://www.googlecommunity.com/about6457.html
The days of scratching my nuts with a pizza will never be over.  I'll return from the Halls of Mandos, I'm immortal. 
You know, I've met many christians outside of america that are not as bad as described in these comments. I have also met many atheists outside of America that are not as anti-religion and hateful as depicted here as well. Maybe the problem is America.  It could be that the US is a cancer on humanity and everything it touches.  :)  There is no virtue or value it cannot corrupt.  The next topic should be "What's with all the ignorant cheap shots taken against Americans?"  :D
If they're impressed with eight new species, they obviously haven't seen my fridge.
[The Voluntary Human Extinction Movement](http://vhemt.org/)   
Her anatomy looked 18, I swear.
A horse goes into a bar and the bartender says, "Hey buddy, why the long face?"
Space, the final frontier...
Samsung DLP HDTV is the way to go.  It is not crazy expensive and you get a great picture with HDMI/HDTV and the non-HD still blows away my Sony Triniton, which wasn't much cheaper.  DLP is also ideal for gamers.   
Well I've always defined the rights as those that exist in a state of nature.  Like, if you were the last remainging human being on earth, you wouldn't have a "right" to education, health, or hygienic conditions.  But you would have a right to your life and property.  Another way of saying this is that men should be permitted to live in such a way that they are not disturbed by their fellow men, and government should enforce this and nothing else, taking the funds it needs to do this from the governed.  By definition, government affects everyone within a certain area, and the people in that area are not allowed to "opt out", so for that reason I believe it should be as small as possible.  There are many things that the government does that I believe could be done more effectively outside of government, without forcing everyone to participate in them.  So really what a lot of this debate comes down to is  a) are government programs neccesary and effective and b) could the tasks assigned to said programs be done just as well or better outside government.  Liberals tend to think, for example, that the state of poverty would be considerably worse without welfare, whereas libertarians often express opinions that welfare encourages poverty.  Obviously, the reason the liberal position is more popular is that it sounds a lot more plausible that proving welfare for poor people will help their situation than hurt their situation.
the seller pays all RE commissions.  Buyer will usually have their own legal fees.
Various gambling sites, being located offshore, are very shady. Case in point, some popular poker room software is also **spyware**.  Party Poker scans your hard drive and *takes screenshots of your display*.  Information from the [WinHoldEm poker bot site](http://winholdem.net/) Since these sites are almost all located outside of U.S. jurisdiction, there isn't much recourse.   
Agreed. How many people have used an IBM computer. IBM sold Nazis computers and helped them organize the final solution.
I wonder if this is like all that impeachment chatter there was a little while back. That is to say, nothing will come of it...
I don't understand your point.  Are you going to use your extra money to take a senator to your new house in scotland and use your new books to educate him on how he can cure starvation, treat diseases, and eliminate footwear issues? What will you do with the oil painting?   Point being - most of your reasons contradict your final reason.  Please go back to logic school before posting again.   
No Democracy? I thought this was obvious back in 2000 and 2004 when Bush stole both elections. A lot of important people (more than I've mentioned below) have come up with proof too. This is just to show I'm not lying:  http://www.rollingstone.com/news/story/10432334/was_the_2004_election_stolen  http://www.gregpalast.com/detail.cfm?artid=501&amp;row=1   
By just about any rational metric, Bush's reputation has already surpassed Nixon's as one of the most sullied.
I've never used it, but I think users have access to a scripting language. They can also create their own 3D models. So people can create (and then sell) products to other users.
No. Most reasonable people would agree that the claim stands.
How easily can health care be integrated into a free market system? Just disregard the pharmaceuticals for a moment, when you are sick, broken your hip etc. exactly how much choice do you really have when you choose how you get better?  You get to choose where you get better?  How many choices locally will you have, how many hospitals are offering the same product/same cure in your area?  I would contend not many, now how far are you willing to travel to get cheaper care?  How much buying power do individual hospitals have, how many chains of hospitals are there so bulk buying is possible, how many of these are near you? This is completely disregarding the problems with medical insurance, which I'm too lazy to go into detail about. The free market for health care is not a feasible reality, well at least as a benefit for 'customers' (and with that word I think lies the problem, occasionally, you do not have a choice about which sickness/injury you want to be treated, you don't consume these products out of choice, but need)
Wasn't it meant to have a hand-crank charger?
According to the broshure I linked, it is indeed designed to run entirely from Ethernet power, with no alternative provided. You take the faceplate off the receptacle box, hook up the CAT5 directly, and then insert the computer into the box so that it's almost flush with the wall. The pictures in the original story don't quite convey this concept.
Modding up, I totally forgot about the 15 billion for AIDS in africa!
Which posts were those? 
Your particular experience with at least one technical community was not representative.  I think most people end up with better interactions.
Oops, I might have confused earth centric with flat earth...  Eratosthenes did that... and I'm totally wrong about the flat earth part. Dang.
Yea it was in poor taste  I didnt think I would get reposted.  This internet is a small place.
Agreed. Of course, none of us by clothes, books, shoes, toys, tools, electronics, or anything else made in China by labor that has no right to negotiate a fair wage. We know the conditions in China! It is amazing that people make on a person by person level every day decisions to buy their goods. I'm sure glad I'm not one of those bad people.
Its not a reasonable claim. Even if the Hebrews did not believe the earth was round (and I see no specific reason to believe they didn't), the Greeks very much did, and seeing as how early Christianity had many Greek and Roman followers, I have an extremely hard time beleving that *not a single Christian* before the renassiance believed the earth was round, which was your claim.
I wonder if he realizes this means Bush might have won the popular vote but lost the election in 2004?
What you seem to be saying is that theistic morality is bad morality, which is a perfectly valid point.  However, my point has nothing to do with that.  I am for gay marriage and abortion rights as much as the rest of you, however, I am merely pointing out that there is nothing wrong with basing your idea of a good government on your morals.  The problem, as you mention, is when your morals are bad. By the way, if you are accustomed to thinking of christianity as a bad thing, I recommend reading C.S. Lewis's book *Mere Christianity*.  My mother seems to me a devout christian but she doesn't go around condemning people.  I asked her what she thought of gays and she didn't voice any negative opinions. According to the Christian worldview, we are all sinners who fall short of the glory of God.  What Christianity preaches is that we should first of all realize that we are sinners and repent of our sins, then work on becoming better people.  So although some Christians may regard homosexuality as a sin, there's no particular reason it should deserve more attention than, say, theft.  Christians are called not condemn others so much as show them by our behaviour that they too can have a relationship with God.  That's why it bothers me so much when Christians try to enforce thier idea of what's right on other people.  As this thread shows, that can be a very ineffective procedure which is backfiring in a very big way.
Clever.
&gt; Like, if you were the last remainging human being on earth, you wouldn't have   &gt; a "right" to education, health, or hygienic conditions. But you would have a   &gt; right to your life and property.  Property is meaningless in this scenario, as indeed are 'rights'.  These things only exist in a social context, which essentially takes you out of your 'state of nature' and into the world of negotiated relations.   Unfortunately, we do have a tendency to disturb our fellow men: we are the *zoon politikon*, and government is mother's milk to us. There might, for example, be disagreement as to what constitutes disturbance. The US Constitution specifically authorizes it, when necessary. Can immoral acts (even if consensual) be disturbances to society at large?  And having admitted that what we have is a society, jointly governed, should there not be some debate on its nature? What does it mean to be an American, for example?  People seem to have a clear idea about what's anti-American, but I haven't heard so much about the other.  Should it presuppose a certain level of education, worldliness, affluence? Are these things worth aspiring to *as a society*?  What should we do if they are? My view is that some things work more efficiently when state-owned, or at least operated under public supervision.  These tend to be the things that are basic for a functioning society, and that often don't break up very easily into viable companies that will genuinely compete with one another.  Large scale public transport networks (rail, for example), power supply, education &amp; health. Not, indeed, that I would compel anyone to send their children to a state school, or force anyone into a public hospital if they were ill, but everyone would pay taxes to ensure that both were available, and first-rate, if needed. The logic is simple -- it is to the benefit of society at large to have a well-educated and healthy population.  If people want to opt out, they can have religious schools and private hospitals, but these have to conform to democratically agreed standards of what constitutes education (outside the religious sphere) and health-care (no Galenic medicine). I am not American, but have visited that fair country many times, and seen the amount of worry and privation that middle-class American families endure to give their kids the education they need to maintain their social status and have some chance of a good life.  University fees are completely ludicrous.   Obviously it is undesirable to have people on welfare, but the only solution to that is to educate them to be able to take their place in the world.  Enrich their lives, and they will manage to enrich themselves.  In the meantime, as members of your society, they will have the rights of a full citizen, to health-care and basic support. I do not deny that there is flagrant waste and abuse at every level of the system, but the crucial difference between public and private is that we have the ability and the duty to scrutinize public bodies, and to hold people accountable.  We live in democracies, and can change the rules, and the management, whenever we want.    We may need a new kind of politics, we don't need the apolitical leave-me-alone school of social atomism.
That was a really good article.  I'd be interested to hear the  counter-arguments to this.
Wow, you must think you're pretty reasonable for taking the middle ground, huh? Fuck you.
Ah yes but he hasn't been chased out of the people's mansion yet.
&gt; I didn't know Werner von Braun was a product of the American Education System. This is such a simpletons view of how NASA got men into space and the moon. Read this book, (**[Apollo](http://tinyurl.com/r8q4y)** , **ISBN 0976000806**, a story of the builders, engineers &amp; management of the Apollo moonshot mission. An absolute must for those who deal with complexity &amp; complicated design.) then come back and make a more informed comment.
Article can be summed up in two sentences: &gt; "I think the facts are clear," Bloomberg said. "What they've really done is taken what was supposed to be threat-based and just started to distribute it as normal pork." The DHS is a patronage machine. We knew that the first day it was announced.
I believe you agree that the AMA unfairly prevents competition. The FDA can't get caught approving a bad drug.  It simply needs to wink and nod at bad clinical trials or data falsification, and then when dead bodies turn up, plausibly deny fault, blame the expert peers that reviewed the study, or the company for data falsification.  The wink or nod can make billions for the drug manufacturer, if the drug is useless but addictive.
&gt; $ wc pupumonkey.txt &gt; $ 5 112 722 pupumonkey.txt yes but dmh2000 says it using 96 less words!   
Three cheers for treating others with compassion and respect. Thank you for bringing some sanity to this silly thread.
Non-flash downloadable and streaming options here:  http://www.petatv.com/tvpopup/Prefs.asp?video=gory 
This is just further proof of my theory that everything on the internet degenerates until it reaches the maturity level of the average 14 year-old.  eg. digg.
&gt;The problem is that there are many government incentives in place that make it cheaper for people to be insured through their employers (you can use pre-tax dollars, for example) so that it's much more expensive to keep your previous insurance if you switch jobs. Can someone explain the logic behind these government incentives?  My first guess was that the government was trying to create some sort of happy relationship between the employee and the employer by making it easy for the employer to provide healthcare for the employee.  But that doesn't seem like a very good reason to me.  If no one can come up with a good reason, couldn't we just drop these policies?
That bottom picture gives you the warm fuzzies, huh? Wow.
If an advanced alien species ever does visit Earth, humans won't have a lot of moral justification for avoiding a similar fate, like in the remake of War of the Worlds... MMMMM.... humanburger!
Q: Why is an elephant large and grey and wrinkled?  A: Because if it was small and white and smooth, it wouldn't be an elephant, it would be an aspirin.
It has only been days that i have used this site..but i know so much already about particular candidates for this nearing election..this site is the best tool to keep track of them..  all praise from me..everybody do a search..you'll be surprise of the load of information you need to make an informed decision for this election!  
Hahaha, you hit the nail right on the head there, man. “You can still play videogames, just for no more than 5 minutes!”
&gt;IBM sold Nazis computers and helped them organize the final solution. I suspect everyone involved in that decision is retired, and most of them are dead. Owning a Thinkpad doesn't make me feel like I'm helping Nazis.
Allen, who is a probable 2008 presidential candidate, ranking behind Rick Santorum and Hillary Clinton in terms of receiving  donations from lobbyists and PACs. Ain't that something?
I don't care what religion someone is, but when a disturbing majority of a group that you subscribe to won't even acknowledge gay rights, I tend to want to stay away from that group. [Note: Many Christians have proven me wrong on an individual basis.  Especially Mormons.  But I think 'disturbing majority' is still accurate]
hey good thing you learned about the site too..cool huh  1
